1 


9PPSf^|i^lSIII^E^fe ! 


i 




gfcg 






fj^ 


p 


SPENGER* 




■ •',■••.•■:■ ■■; .'.. . : r .■..,'.■■:■;..:.■":":■:.'■■ ':...: ■ : — ...■:•::.■.■:.'.■..•.::.■■•:•■;:::■•.::..:•: ■::,::■..■>.■:■. vi r=. -.i-i- — - 


■ 


' " 




■ 
■ 

' ■:!,. ■ : : , :. -j: ■.:: . .-■•:-. .• - : ■■■ ■. a; : ^^ i:W'- ^Iter!' vi.;;;;'!-;^ ■'•'.:•!■!'*■'■'■■':;■;!!:■; ftvMvl-'''^"-'':'! 
.:::■■ ■■■ .. .. :■,■:..'■■!•.. p&mMJ'I" '• '/■:! ■■' < -,:'.'■■■■: '. ■,/ ■'■',, , • 

■ 

/'. , ■ : ^ : ..■'.'■■ -'. : ■' ; ' ' ■ : •. . ;; ■ ;.; : ; ; t:MM^: ■ • '■'■ : '■'■■'■■ v '"'■• l ' ' ' 


ak&W^ 


■■' . ■•::■■'. •■, ■-,;:.;■ liijv :,-■■• '■.':v'-''-:' '."■';'■■;■■■ ■ '.■■'■','■'''''■.'/.■' : ' : ;,': : :i:!.! : : 
;■;:;■ ■. '' :'■.:,: ; : : '- ' ■• ■' '■..<'. : ./..:.';; ; ',:;■':' •:''■'■'''■■■•■■:. '■;■'!•■■■ '■','■■ ' '■'■''', 

■:'y'-/- i ■■'.'■ '■■' ••■■"•''. : : ' ■ ' : * : ;•':#? : ""■'':■ '"■'■' :,■'.::, ; 

■■■ . '■ ■"'■'■■' '' ■ ' ' ' ' : ;;:' ;.;;|';;/ : ;v:',V: : : ./;. " : '■ 










1 


' ; ' ' ' ; ■' 


l.;5S!;:|:;;| 


: :, .' ;: '' : '':/ V'.. : ' ' :;: :':x : .. '■'''''. •:.'■. : : ^:' : ' ;} : '' '" ' [ - y -' : ~:' ' .''■■'■'' ■':■:(- ' ■■'■:'. . .V : : y ' : . ' '':;i : 



■ 



••*■ ;?•■ I 

H 



^HH 



Digitized by the Internet Archive 

in 2011 with funding from 

Lyrasis Members and Sloan Foundation 



http://www.archive.org/details/educationintellOOspen 



EDUCATION: 



Intellectual, 

Moral, 

Physical. 



BY 
HERBERT SPENCER, 

Author of " A System of Synthetic Philosophy." 



A NEW EDITION, WITH TOPIC HEADINGS IN HEAVY TYPE 
TO ASSIST THE STUDENT. 

A. S. Cook Library 
Towson State University 
Baltimore, Maryland 21204 

NEW YORK AND CHICAGO: 

E. L. K XLbOG^ & CO. 




S.T.C. 

S7 



Copyright, 1892, by 

E. L. KELLOGG & CO. 



SPENCER'S EDUCATION. 



to 









INTRODUCTION. 



The publication of four articles on Education in the 
English Reviews previous to i860 by Mr. Herbert Spencer 
produced an impression altogether out of proportion to 
the very moderate space employed. To say that the 
thinking world was thoroughly shocked is not stating 
it too strongly. As a general rule, the best thinkers had 
nothing to say on primary education — except to counsel 
patience on the teacher's part and hard study by the 
pupil ; but Mr. Spencer, the foremost thinker of the 
day, proposed to consider education fundamentally, 
philosophically, wholly uninfluenced by the enthusiasm 
imparted by a university course, or by the tendency to 
approbate the methods usually employed because the 
persons employing them meant well. 

Men who had supposedly attained an ability to dis- 
course concerning education usually were committed to 
a training in Latin and Greek, the study given to these 
languages apparently standing out preeminent among 
the school exercises they had engaged in. Mr. Spencer, 
after subjecting the causes that produced education to 
a philosophical scrutiny, came to certain conclusions, 
among the most important of which are the following : 

1. That, the knowledge which is most influential in 
causing education is that which is most needful for the 



38r7SU 



iv Introduction. 

student to know — is that which is most closely related 
to his life. 

2. From this he infers that science should be made 
the great subject of study — not the science of books, 
but first-hand science ; that the pupil should be an in- 
vestigator, an experimenter, himself. 

3. That character, the habit of inquiry, the spirit of 
investigation, and not knowledge, should be the main 
aim — opposing cramming as an educational crime. 

4. That rewards and punishments should be natural 
and not artificial. 

5. Whether the pupil is pleased and happy in learn- 
ing lessons he considers of the first importance : if 
the subjects of study are properly chosen he believes 
he will be. 

The book is very suggestive and has produced a re- 
markable influence already on educational thought ; 
it cannot but change the mode of teaching on a single 
reading. Mr. Spencer, it must be understood, defines 
education very broadly : he means by the term the 
effect which environment produces upon mental 
power, influencing it to acquirement — and not mere ac- 
quirement, the usual definition. 



CONTENTS. 



CHAPTER I. 
What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 5 

CHAPTER II. 
IntelLectual Education ; 70 

CHAPTER III. 
Moral Education 124 

CHAPTER IV. 

Physical Education 173 

v 



EDUCATION. 



CHAPTER I. 

WHAT KNOWLEDGE IS OF MOST WORTH ? 

In Dress the Ornamental Precedes the Useful It has 

been truly remarked that, in order of time, decoration 
precedes dress. Among people who submit to great 
physical suffering that they may have themselves hand- 
somely tattooed, extremes of temperature are borne 
with but little attempt at mitigation. Humboldt tells 
us that an Orinoco Indian, though quite regardless of 
bodily comfort, will yet labor for a fortnight to pur- 
chase pigment wherewith to make himself admired ; 
and that the same woman who would not hesitate to 
leave her hut without a fragment of clothing on, would 
not dare to commit such a breach of decorum as to go 
out unpainted. Voyagers uniformly find that colored 
beads and trinkets are much more prized by wild tribes 
than are calicoes or broadcloths. And the anecdotes 
we have of the ways in which, when shirts and coats 
are given, they turn them to some ludicrous display, 
show how completely the idea of ornament predomi- 
nates over that of use. Nay, there are still more ex- 

5 



6 Education. 

treme illustrations: witness the fact narrated by Capt, 
Speke of his African attendants, who strutted about in 
their goat-skin mantles when the weather was fine, but 
when it was wet, took them off, folded them up, and went 
about naked, shivering in the rain! Indeed, the facts 
of aboriginal life seem to indicate that dress is devel- 
oped out of decorations. And when we remember that 
even among ourselves most think more about the fine- 
ness of the fabric than its warmth, and more about the 
cut than the convenience — when we see that the func- 
tion is still in great measure subordinated to the ap- 
pearance — we have further reason for inferring such an 
origin. 

In Mental Acquisition the Ornamental is more Valued 
than the Useful. — It is not a little curious that the like 
relations hold with the mind. Among mental as among 
bodily acquisitions, the ornamental comes before the 
useful. Not only in times past, but almost as much in 
our own era, that knowledge which conduces to per- 
sonal well-being has been postponed to that which 
brings applause. In the Greek schools, music, poetry, 
rhetoric, and a philosophy which, until Socrates taught, 
had but little bearing upon action, were the dominant 
subjects; while knowledge aiding the arts of life had a 
very subordinate place. And in our own universities 
and schools at the present moment the like antithesis 
holds. We are guilty of something like a platitude 
when we say that throughout his after-career a boy, in 
nine cases out of ten, applies his Latin and Greek to no 
practical purposes. The remark is trite that in his 
shop, or his office, in managing his estate or his family, 
in playing his part as director of a bank or a railway, 
he is very little aided by this knowledge he took so 
many years to acquire — so little, that generally the 
greater part of it drops out of his memory; and if he 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 7 

occasionally vents a Latin quotation, or alludes to some 
Greek myth, it is less to throw light on the topic in 
hand than for the sake of effect. If we inquire what is 
the real motive for giving boys a classical education, 
we find it to be simply conformity to public opinion. 
Men dress their children's minds as they do their 
bodies, in the prevailing fashion. As the Orinoco In- 
dian puts on his paint before leaving his hut, not with 
a view to any direct benefit, but because he would be 
ashamed to be seen without it; so, a boy's drilling in 
Latin and Greek is insisted on, not because of their in- 
trinsic value, but that he may not be disgraced by being 
found ignorant of them— that he may have "the edu- 
cation of a gentleman " — the badge marking a certain 
social position, and bringing a consequent respect. 

Especially True of Women. — This parallel is still more 
clearly displayed in the case of the other sex. In the 
treatment of both mind and body, the decorative element 
has continued to predominate in a greater degree 
among women than among men. Originally, personal 
adornment occupied the attention of both sexes equally. 
In these latter days of civilization, however, we see that 
in the dress of men the regard for appearance has in a 
considerable degree yielded to the regard for comfort; 
while in their education the useful has of late been 
trenching on the ornamental. In neither direction has 
this change gone so far with women. The wearing of 
ear-rings, finger-rings, bracelets; the elaborate dressings 
of the hair; the still occasional use of paint; the im- 
mense labor bestowed in making habiliments sufficiently 
attractive; and the great discomfort that will be sub- 
mitted to for the sake of conformity, show how greatly, 
in the attiring of women, the desire of approbation 
overrides the desire for warmth and convenience. 
And similarly in their education, the immense prepon- 



8 Education. 

derance of "accomplishments" proves how here, too, 
use is subordinated to display. Dancing, deportment, 
the piano, singing, drawing — what a large space do 
these occupy! If you ask why Italian and German are 
learnt, you will find that, under all the sham reasons 
given, the real reason is that a knowledge of those 
tongues is thought ladylike. It is not that the books 
written in them may be utilized, which they scarcely 
ever are; but that Italian and German songs may be 
sung, and that the extent of attainment may bring 
whispered admiration. The births, deaths, and mar- 
riages of kings, and other like historic trivialities, are 
committed to memory, not because of any direct bene- 
fits that can possibly result from knowing them, but 
because society considers them parts of a good educa- 
tion — because the absence of such knowledge may 
bring the contempt of others. When we have named 
reading, writing, spelling, grammar, arithmetic, and 
sewing, we have named about all the things a girl is 
taught with a view to their direct uses in life; and even 
some of these have more reference to the good opinion 
of others than to immediate personal welfare. 

The Reason of This. — Thoroughly to realize the truth 
that with the mind as with the body the ornamental 
precedes the useful, it is needful to glance at its ratio- 
nale. This lies in the fact that, from the far past down 
even to the present, social needs have subordinated in- 
dividual needs, and that the chief social need has been 
the control of individuals. It is not, as we commonly 
suppose, that there are no governments but those of 
monarchs, and parliaments, and constituted authorities. 
These acknowledged governments are supplemented by 
other unacknowledged ones, that grow up in all circles, 
in which every man or woman strives to be king or 
queen or lesser dignitary. To get above some and be 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth} 9 

reverenced by them, and to propitiate those who are 
above us, is the universal struggle in which the chief 
energies of life are expended. By the accumulation of 
wealth, by style of living, by beauty of dress, by display 
of knowledge or intellect, each tries to subjugate others ; 
and so aids in weaving that ramified network of re- 
straints by which society is kept in order. It is not the 
savage chief only who, in formidable war-paint, with 
scalps at his belt, aims to strike awe into his inferiors ; 
it is not only the belle who, by elaborate toilet, polished 
manners, and numerous accomplishments, strives to 
" make conquests ; " but the scholar, the historian, the 
philosopher, use their acquirements to the same end. 
We are none of us content with quietly unfolding our 
own individualities to the full in all directions, but 
have a restless craving to impress our individualities 
upon others, and in some way subordinate them. And 
this it is which determines the character of our educa- 
tion. Not what knowledge is of most real worth, is the 
consideration ; but what will bring most applause, 
honor, respect — what will most conduce to social posi- 
tion and influence — what will be most imposing. As, 
throughout life, not what we are, but what we shall be 
thought, is the question ; so in education, the question 
is, not the intrinsic value of knowledge, so much as its 
extrinsic effects on others. And this being our domi- 
nant idea, direct utility is scarcely more regarded than 
by the barbarian when filing his teeth and staining his 
nails. 

No Standard Fixed of Relative Values of Knowledge. 
— If there needs any further evidence of the rude, unde- 
veloped character of our education, we have it in the fact 
that the comparative worths of different kinds of knowl- 
edge have been as yet scarcely even discussed — much 
less discussed in a methodic way with definite results. 



io Education, 

Not only is it that no standard of relative values has 
yet been agreed upon ; but the existence of any such 
standard has not been conceived in any clear manner. 
And not only is it that the existence of any such stand- 
ard has not been clearly conceived ; but the need for it 
seems to have been scarcely even felt. Men read books 
on this topic, and attend lectures on that ; decide that 
their children shall be instructed in these branches of 
knowledge, and shall not be instructed in those ; and 
all under the guidance of mere custom, or liking, or 
prejudice ; without ever considering the enormous im- 
portance of determining in some rational way what 
things are really most worth learning. It is true that 
in all circles we have occasional remarks on the impor- 
tance of this or the other order of information. But 
whether the degree of its importance justifies the ex- 
penditure of the time needed to acquire it, and whether 
there are not things of more importance to which the 
time might be better devoted, are queries which, if 
raised at all, are disposed of quite summarily, accord- 
ing to personal predilections. It is true, also, that from 
time to time we hear revived the standing controversy 
respecting the comparative merits of classics and mathe- 
matics. Not only, however, is this controversy carried 
on in an empirical manner, with no reference to an as- 
certained criterion ; but the question at issue is totally 
insignificant when compared with the general question 
of which it is part. To suppose that deciding whether 
a mathematical or a classical education is the best is 
deciding what is the proper curriculum, is much the 
same thing as to suppose that the whole of dietetics lies 
in determining whether or not bread is more nutritive 
than potatoes ! 

Importance of Knowing the Relative Values. — The 
question which we contend is of such transcendent 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 



ii 



moment is, not whether such or such knowledge is of 
worth, but what is its relative worth ? When they have 
named certain advantages which a given course of study 
has secured them, persons are apt to assume that they 
have justified themselves: quite forgetting that the 
adequateness of the advantages is the point to be 
judged. There is, perhaps, not a subject to which men 
devote attention that has not some value. A year dili- 
gently spent in getting up heraldry would very possibly 
give a little further insight into ancient manners and 
morals, and into the origin of names. Any one who 
should learn the distances between all the towns in 
England might, in the course of his life, find one or 
two of the thousand facts he had acquired of some 
slight service when arranging a journey. Gathering 
together all the small gossip of a county, profitless oc- 
cupation as it would be, might yet occasionally help to 
establish some useful fact — say, a good example of he- 
reditary transmission. But in these cases, every one 
would admit that there was no proportion between the 
required labor and the probable benefit. No one would 
tolerate the proposal to devote some years of a boy's 
time to getting such information, at the cost of much 
more valuable information which he might else have 
got. And if here the test of relative value is appealed 
to and held conclusive, then should it be appealed to 
and held conclusive throughout. Had we time to mas- 
ter all subjects we need not be particular. To quote 
the old song : 

Could a man be secure 

That his days would endure 

As of old, for a thousand long years, 

What things might he know ! 

What deeds might he do ! 

And all without hurry or care. 



12 Education. . . 

"But we that have but span-long lives" must ever 
bear in mind our limited time for acquisition. And re- 
membering how narrowly this time is limited, not only 
by the shortness of life, but also still more by the busi- 
ness of life, we ought to be especially solicitous to 
employ what time we have to the greatest advantage. 
Before devoting years to some subject which fashion or 
fancy suggests, it is surely wise to weigh with great 
care the worth of the results, as compared with the 
worth of various alternative results which the same 
years might bring if otherwise applied. 

The First Question is the Relative Value. — In educa- 
tion, then, this is the question of questions, which it is 
high time we discussed in some methodic way. The 
first in importance, though the last to be considered, is 
the problem — how to decide among the conflicting 
claims of various subjects on our attention. Before 
there can be a rational curriculum, we must settle which 
things it most concerns us to know ; or, to use a word 
of Bacon's, now unfortunately obsolete — we must de- 
termine the relative values of knowledges. 

A Measure of Value Necessary — To this end, a meas- 
ure of value is the first requisite. And happily, respect- 
ing the true measure of value, as expressed in general 
terms, there can be no dispute. Every one in contend- 
ing for the worth of any particular order of information, 
does so by showing its bearing upon some part of 
life. In reply to the question, "Of what use is it?" 
the mathematician, linguist, naturalist, or philosopher 
explains the way in which his learning beneficially 
influences action — saves from evil or secures good — 
conduces to happiness. When the teacher of writing 
has pointed out how great an aid writing is to success 
in business — that is, to the obtainment of sustenance — 
that is, to satisfactory living, he is held to have proved 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 13 

his case. And when the collector of dead facts (say a 
numismatist) fails to make clear any appreciable effects 
which these facts can produce on human welfare, he is 
obliged to admit that they are comparatively valueless. 
All then, either directly or by implication, appeal to 
this as the ultimate test. 

The Essential Question — How to live ? — that is the 
essential question for us. Not how to live in the mere 
material sense only, but in the widest sense. The 
general problem which comprehends every special 
problem is — the right ruling of conduct in all directions 
under all circumstances. In what way to treat the 
body; in what way to treat the mind ; in what way to 
manage our affairs ; in what way to bring up a family; 
in what way to behave as a citizen ; in what way to 
utilize all those sources of happiness which nature 
supplies — how to use all our faculties to the greatest 
advantage of ourselves and others — how to live com- 
pletely? And this being the great thing needful for 
us to learn, is, by consequence, the great thing which 
education has to teach. To prepare us for complete 
living is the function which education has to discharge ; 
and the only rational mode of judging of any educa- 
tional course is, to judge in what degree it discharges 
such function. 

Complete Living is the End — This test, never used in 
its entirety, but rarely even partially used, and used 
then in a vague, half-conscious way, has to be applied 
consciously, methodically, and throughout all cases. It 
behoves us to set before ourselves, and ever to keep 
clearly in view, complete living as the end to be 
achieved ; so that in bringing up our children we may 
choose subjects and methods of instruction, with de- 
liberate reference to this end. Not only ought we to 
cease from the mere unthinking adoption of the current 



14 Education. 

fashion in education, which has no better warrant than 
any other fashion ; but we must also rise above that 
rude, empirical style of judging displayed by those 
more intelligent people who do bestow some care in 
overseeing the cultivation of their children's minds. 
It must not suffice simply to think that such or such in- 
formation will be useful in after-life, or that this kind 
of knowledge is of more practical value than that; but 
we must seek out some process of estimating their re- 
spective values, so that as far as possible we may posi- 
tively know which are most deserving of attention. 

Doubtless the task is difficult — perhaps never to be 
more than approximately achieved. But, considering 
the vastness of the interests at stake, its difficulty is no 
reason for pusillanimously passing it by, but rather for 
devoting every energy to its mastery. And if we only 
proceed systematically, we may very soon get at results 
of no small moment. 

Classification of Activities — Our first step must obvi- 
ously be to classify, in the order of their importance, 
the leading kinds of activity which constitute human 
life. They may be naturally arranged into: i. Those 
activities which directly minister to self-preservation; 
2. Those activities which, by securing the necessaries 
of life, indirectly minister to self-preservation; 3. Those 
activities which have for their end the rearing and 
discipline of offspring; 4. Those activities which are 
involved in the maintenance of proper social and politi- 
cal relations; 5. Those miscellaneous activities which 
make up the leisure part of life, devoted to the gratifi- 
cation of the tastes and feelings. 

Direct Self-preservation. — That these stand in some- 
thing like their true order of subordination, it needs no 
long consideration to show. The actions and precau- 
tions by which, from moment to moment, we secure 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 15 

personal safety, must clearly take precedence of all 
others. Could there be a man ignorant as an infant of 
all surrounding objects and movements, or how to 
guide himself among them, he would pretty certainly 
lose his life the first time he went into the street, not- 
withstanding any amount of learning he might have 
on other matters. And as entire ignorance in all other 
directions would be less promptly fatal than entire 
ignorance in this direction, it must be admitted that 
knowledge immediately conducive to self-preservation 
is of primary importance. 

Indirect Self-preservation. — That next after direct self- 
preservation comes the indirect self-preservation which 
consists in acquiring the means of living, none will 
question. That a man's industrial functions must be 
considered before his parental ones is manifest from the 
fact that, speaking generally, the discharge of the pa- 
rental functions is made possible only by the previous 
discharge of the industrial ones. The power of self- 
maintenance necessarily preceding the power of main- 
taining offspring, it follows that knowledge needful for 
self-maintenance has stronger claims than knowledge 
needful for family welfare — is second in value to none 
save knowledge needful for immediate self-preservation. 

The Rearing of Children. — As the family comes before 
the State in order of time — as the bringing up of chil- 
dren is possible before the State exists, or when it has 
ceased to be, whereas the State is rendered possible only 
by the bringing up of children, it follows that the duties 
of the parent demand closer attention than those of the 
citizen. Or, to use a further argument — since the good- 
ness of a society ultimately depends on the nature of its 
citizens, and since the nature of its citizens is more 
modifiable by early training than by anything else, we 
must conclude that the welfare of the family underlies 



1 6 Education. 

the welfare of society. And hence knowledge directly- 
conducing to the first must take precedence of knowl- 
edge directly conducing to the last. 

Social Demands and Citizenship. — Those various 
forms of pleasurable occupation which fill up the leisure 
left by graver occupations — the enjoyments of music, 
poetry, painting, etc. — manifestly imply a pre-existing 
society. Not only is a considerable development of 
them impossible without along-established social union ; 
but their very subject-matter consists in great part of 
social sentiments and sympathies. Not only does society 
supply the conditions to their growth, but also the 
ideas and sentiments they express. And, consequently, 
that part of human conduct which constitutes good 
citizenship is of more moment than that which goes 
ou tin accomplishments or exercise of the tastes ; and, 
in education, preparation for the one must rank before 
preparation for the other. 

These Lines not Definitely Separated. — Such then, we 
repeat, is something like the rational order of subordina- 
tion : That education which prepares for direct self- 
preservation ; that which prepares indirect self-preser- 
vation ; that which prepares for parenthood ; that 
which prepares for citizenship ; that which prepares for 
the miscellaneous refinements of life. We do not mean 
to say that these divisions are definitely separable. We 
do not deny that they are intricately entangled with 
each other in such way that there can be no training 
for any that is not in some measure a training for 
all. Nor do we question that of each division there 
are portions more important than certain portions of 
the preceding divisions : that, for instance, a man of 
much skill in business but little other faculty, may fall 
further below the standard of complete living than one 
of but moderate power of acquiring money but great 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 17 

judgment as a parent ; or that exhaustive information 
bearing on right social action, joined with entire want 
of general culture in literature and the fine arts, is less 
desirable than a more moderate share of the one joined 
with some of the other. But, after making all qualifica- 
tions, there still remain these broadly-marked divisions ; 
and it still continues substantially true that these di- 
visions subordinate one another in the foregoing order, 
because the corresponding divisions of life make one 
another possible in that order. 

The Ideal of Education.— Of course the ideal of edu- 
cation is — complete preparation in all these divisions. 
But failing this ideal, as in our phase of civilization 
every one must do more or less, the aim should be to 
maintain a due proportio?i between the degrees of prepa- 
ration in each. Not exhaustive cultivation in any one, 
supremely important though it may be — not even an 
exclusive attention to the two, three, or four divisions 
of greatest importance; but an attention to all, — great- 
est where the value is greatest, less where the value is 
less, least where the value is least. For the average 
man (not to forget the cases in which peculiar aptitude 
for some one department of knowledge rightly makes 
that one the bread-winning occupation) — for the aver- 
age man,, we say, the desideratum is, a training that 
approaches nearest to perfection in the things which 
most subserve to complete living, and falls more and 
more below perfection in the things that have more 
and more remote bearings on complete living. 

Three Kinds of Values. — In regulating education by 
this standard, there are some general considerations 
that should be ever present to us. The worth of any 
kind of culture, as aiding complete living, may be either 
necessary or more or less contingent. There is knowl- 
edge of intrinsic value, knowledge of quasi-intrinsic 



1 8 Education. 

value, and knowledge of conventional value. Such facts 
as that sensations of numbness and tingling commonly 
precede paralysis, that the resistance of water to a body 
moving through it varies as the square of the velocity, 
that chlorine is a disinfectant, — these, and the truths of 
Science in general, are of intrinsic value : they will bear 
on human conduct ten thousand years hence as they 
do now. The extra knowledge of our own language, 
which is given with an acquaintance with Latin and 
Greek, may be considered to have a value that is quasi- 
intrinsic : it'must exist for us and for other races whose 
languages owe much to these sources ; but will last 
only as long as our languages last. While that kind of 
information which, in our schools, usurps the name 
History — the mere tissue of names and dates and dead 
unmeaning events — has a conventional value only : it 
has not the remotest bearing upon any of our actions ; 
and is of use only for the avoidance of those unpleasant 
criticisms which current opinion passes upon its absence. 
Of course, as those facts which concern all mankind 
throughout all time must be held of greater moment 
than those which concern only a portion of them during 
a limited era, and of far greater moment than those 
which concern only a portion of them during the con- 
tinuance of a fashion, it follows that, in a rational esti- 
mate, knowledge of intrinsic worth must, other things 
equal, take precedence of knowledge that is of quasi- 
intrinsic or conventional worth. 

Knowledge and Discipline. — One further preliminary. 
Acquirement of every kind has two values — value as 
knowledge and value as discipline. Besides its use for 
guidance in conduct, the acquisition of each order of 
facts has also its use as mental exercise ; and its effects 
as a preparative for complete living have to be con- 
sidered under both these heads. 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 19 

These, then, are the general ideas with which we must 
set out in discussing a curriculum : Life as divided into 
several kinds of activity of successively decreasing im- 
portance ; the worth of each order of facts as regulating 
these several kinds of activity, intrinsically, quasi-in- 
trinsically, and conventionally ; and their regulative 
influences estimated both as knowledge and discipline. 



ACTIVITIES WHICH DIRECTLY MINISTER TO SELF= 
PRESERVATION. 

Nature Provides Self-preservation in Part. — Happily, 
that all-important part of education which goes to 
secure direct self-preservation is in great part already 
provided for. Too momentous to be left to our 
blundering, Nature takes it into her own hands. While 
yet in its nurse's arms, the infant, by hiding its face 
and crying at the sight of a stranger, shows the dawn- 
ing instinct to attain safety by flying from that which 
is unknown and may be dangerous ; and when it can 
walk, the terror it manifests if an unfamiliar dog comes 
near, or the screams with which it runs to its mother 
after any startling sight or sound, shows this instinct 
further developed. Moreover, knowledge subserving 
direct self-preservation is that which it is chiefly busied 
in acquiring from hour to hour. How to balance its 
body ; how to control its movements so as to avoid 
collisions ; what objects are hard, and will hurt if 
struck ; what objects are heavy, and injure if they fall 
on the limbs ; which things will bear the weight of the 
body, and which not ; the pains inflicted by fire, by 
missiles, by sharp instruments — these, and various 
other pieces of information needful for the avoidance of 
death or accident, it is ever learning. And when, a few 
years later, the energies go out in running, climbing, 



zo Education. 

and jumping, in games of strength and games of skill, 
we see in all these actions by which the muscles are 
developed, the perceptions sharpened, and the judg- 
ment quickened, a preparation for the safe conduct of 
the body among surrounding objects and movements, 
and for meeting those greater dangers that occasionally 
occur in the lives of all. Being thus, as we say, so well 
cared for by Nature, this fundamental education needs 
comparatively little care from us. What we are chiefly 
called upon to see is that there shall be free scope for 
gaining this experience, and receiving this discipline, — 
that there shall be no such thwarting of Nature as that 
by which stupid schoolmistresses commonly prevent 
the girls in their charge from the spontaneous physical 
activities they would indulge in, and so render them 
comparatively incapable of taking care of themselves in 
circumstances of peril. 

Self-preservative Efforts need Education — This, how- 
ever, is by no means all that is comprehended in the 
education that prepares for direct self-preservation. 
Besides guarding the body against mechanical damage 
or destruction, it has to be guarded against injury from 
other causes — against the disease and death that follow 
breaches of physiologic law. For complete living it is 
necessary, not only that sudden annihilations of life 
shall be warded off, but also that there shall be es- 
caped the incapacities and the slow annihilation which 
unwise habits entail. As, without health and energy, 
the industrial, the parental, the social, and all other 
activities become more or less impossible, it is clear 
that this secondary kind of direct self-preservation is 
only less important than the primary kind ; and that 
knowledge tending to secure it should rank very high. 

Learn to Obey Self-preservative Efforts. — It is true 
that here, too, guidance is in some measure ready sup- 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 21 

plied. By our various physical sensations and desires, 
Nature has insured a tolerable conformity to the chief 
requirements. Fortunately for us, want of food, great 
heat, extreme cold, produce promptings too peremptory 
to be disregarded. And would men habitually obey 
these and all like promptings when less strong, com- 
paratively few evils would arise. If fatigue of body or 
brain were in every case followed by desistance ; if the 
oppression produced by a close atmosphere always led 
to ventilation ; if there were no eating without hunger, 
or drinking without thirst, then would the system be 
but seldom out of working order. But so profound an 
ignorance is there of the laws of life, that men do not 
even know that their sensations are their natural 
guides, and (when not rendered morbid by long-con- 
tinued disobedience) their trustworthy guides. So that 
though, to speak teleologically, Nature has provided 
efficient safeguards to health, lack of knowledge makes 
them in a great measure useless. 

Disease Results from Disobedience. — If any one doubts 
the importance of an acquaintance with the funda- 
mental principles of physiology as a means to complete 
living, let him look around and see how many men 
and women he can find in middle or later life who are 
thoroughly well. Occasionally only do we meet with 
an example of vigorous health continued to old age; 
hourly do we meet with examples of acute disorder, 
chronic ailment, general debility, premature decrepi- 
tude. Scarcely is there one to whom j^ou put the 
question who has not, in the course of his life, brought 
upon himself illnesses which a little knowledge would 
have saved him from. Here is a case of heart-disease 
consequent on a rheumatic fever that followed reckless 
exposure. There is a case of eyes spoiled for life by over- 
study. Yesterday the account was of one whose long- 



22 Education. 

enduring lameness was brought on by continuing, spite 
of the pain, to use a knee after it had been slightly in- 
jured. And to-day we are told of another who has had 
to lie by for years, because he did not know that the 
palpitation he suffered from resulted from overtaxed 
brain. Now we hear of an irremediable injury that fol- 
lowed some silly feat of strength ; and, again, of a con- 
stitution that has never recovered from the effects of 
excessive work needlessly undertaken. While on all 
sides we see the perpetual minor ailments which ac- 
company feebleness. Not to dwell on the natural pain, 
the weariness, the gloom, the waste of time and money 
thus entailed, only consider how greatly ill-health hin- 
ders the discharge of all duties — makes business often 
impossible, and always more difficult ; produces an ir- 
ritability fatal to the right management of children ; 
puts the functions of citizenship out of the question ; 
and makes amusement a bore. Is it not clear that the 
physical sins — partly our forefathers' and partly our 
own — which produce this ill-health, deduct more from 
complete living than anything else? and to a great ex- 
tent make life a failure and a burden instead of a bene- 
faction and a pleasure ? 

Death also — To all which add the fact that life, be- 
sides being thus immensely deteriorated, is also cut 
short. It is not true, as we commonly suppose, that a 
disorder or disease from which we have recovered 
leaves us as before. No disturbance of the normal 
course of the functions can pass away and leave things 
exactly as they were. In all cases a permanent damage 
is done — not immediately appreciable, it may be, but 
still there — and, along with other such items which 
Nature in her strict account-keeping never drops, will 
tell against us to the inevitable shortening of our days. 
Through the accumulation of small injuries it is that 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 23 

constitutions are commonly undermined, and break 
down, long before their time. And if we call to mind 
how far the average duration of life falls before the 
possible duration, we see how immense is the loss. 
When, to the numerous partial deductions which bad 
health entails, we add this great final deduction, it re- 
sults that ordinarily more than one-half of life is 
thrown away. 

Health and Life Dependent on Knowledge. — Hence, 
knowledge which subserves direct self-preservation by 
preventing this loss of health is of primary importance. 
We do not contend that possession of such knowledge 
would by any means wholly remedy the evil. For it is 
clear that in our present phase of civilization men's 
necessities often compel them to transgress. And it is 
further clear that, even in the absence of such com- 
pulsion, their inclinations would frequently lead them, 
spite of their knowledge, to sacrifice future good to 
present gratification. But we do contend that the right 
knowledge impressed in the right way would effect 
much ; and we further contend that as the laws of 
health must be recognized before they can be fully 
conformed to, the imparting of such knowledge must 
precede a more rational living — come when that may. 
We infer that_ as vigoro u^Jhealth and its accom panying 
hig h spirits a re larger e lements of __happiness than_any 
oTrTeT things w hatever, the teaching how to maintain 
them is a teaching that yields in moment to no other 
whatever. And therefore we assert that such a course 
of physiology as is needful for the comprehension of its 
general truths, and their bearings on daily conduct, is 
an all-essential part of a rational education. 

Ignorance of Rules of Health. — Strange that the asser- 
tion should need making ! Stranger still that it should 
need defending ! Yet are there not a few by whom 



24 Education. 

such a proposition will be received with something ap- 
proaching to derision. Men who would blush if caught 
saying Iphigenia instead of Iphigenia, or would resent 
as an insult any imputation of ignorance respecting 
the fabled labors of a fabled demi-god, show not the 
slightest shame in confessing that they do not know 
where the Eustachian tubes are, what are the actions 
of the spinal cord, what is the normal rate of pulsation, 
or how the lungs are inflated. While anxious that 
their sons should be well up in the superstitions of two 
thousand years ago, they care not that they should be 
taught anything about the structure and functions of 
their own bodies — nay, would even disapprove such in- 
struction. So overwhelming is the influence of estab- 
lished routine ! So terribly in our education does the 
ornamental override the useful ! 

l/\\. ACTIVITIES WHICH, BY SECURING THE NECES= 
SARIES OF LIFE, INDIRECTLY HINISTER TO SELF= 
PRESERVATION. 

Knowledge of Gaming a Livelihood — We need not in- 
sist on the value of that knowledge which aids indirect 
self-preservation by facilitating the gaining of a liveli- 
hood. This is admitted by all ; and indeed by the 
mass is perhaps too exclusively regarded as the end of 
education. But while every one is ready to endorse the 
abstract proposition that instruction fitting youths for 
the business of life is of high importance, or even to 
consider it of supreme importance, yet scarcely any in- 
quire what instructions will so fit them. It is true that 
reading, writing, and arithmetic are taught with an in- 
telligent appreciation of their uses ; but when we have 
said this we have said nearly all. While the great bulk 
of what else is acquired has no bearing on the in- 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth} 25 

dustrial activities, an immensity of information that has 
a direct bearing on the industrial activities is entirely 
passed over. 

All are Doing Life-work. — For, leaving out only some 
very small classes, what are all men employed in ? 
They are employed in the production, preparation, and 
distribution of commodities. And on what does effi- 
ciency in the production, preparation, and distribution 
of commodities depend? It depends on the use of 
methods fitted to the respective natures of these com- 
modities ; it depends on an adequate knowledge of 
their physical, chemical, or vital properties, as the case 
may be ; that is, it depends on Science. This order of 
knowledge, which is in great part ignored in our school 
courses, is the order of knowledge underlying the 
right performance of all those processes by which civil- 
ized life is made possible. Undeniable as is this truth, 
and thrust upon us as it is at every turn, there seems to 
be no living consciousness of it ; its very familiarity 
makes it unregarded. To give due weight to our argu- 
ment, we must, therefore, realize this truth to the reader 
by a rapid review of the facts. 

Need of Mathematics. — For all the higher arts of con- 
struction some acquaintance with Mathematics is indis- 
pensable. The village carpenter, who, lacking rational 
instruction, lays out his work by empirical rules learnt 
in his apprenticeship, equally with the builder of a Bri- 
tannia Bridge, makes hourly reference to the laws of 
quantitative relations. The surveyor on whose survey 
the land is purchased ; the architect in designing a 
mansion to be built on it ; the builder in preparing his 
estimates ; his foreman in laying out the foundation ; 
the masons in cutting the stones ; and the various arti- 
sans who put up the fittings, — are all guided by geo- 
metrical truths. Railway-making is regulated from 



26 Education. 

beginning to end by mathematics ; alike in the prepara- 
tion of plans and sections ; in staking out the line ; in 
the mensuration of cuttings and embankments ; in the 
designing, estimating, and building of bridges, culverts, 
viaducts, tunnels, stations. And similarly with the har- 
bors, docks, piers, and various engineering and archi- 
tectural works that fringe the coasts and overspread the 
face of the country ; as well as the mines that run un- 
derneath it. Out of geometry, too, as applied to as- 
tronomy, the art of navigation has grown ; and so, by 
this science, has been made possible that enormous 
foreign commerce which supports a large part of our 
population, and supplies us with many necessaries and 
most of our luxuries. And nowadays even the farmer, 
for the correct laying out of his drains, has recourse to 
the level — that is, to geometrical principles. When 
from those divisions of mathematics which deal with 
space and number, some small smattering of which is 
given in schools, we turn to that other division which 
deals with force, of which even a smattering is scarcely 
ever given, we meet with another large class of activi- 
ties which this science presides over. On the applica- 
tion of rational mechanics depends the success of nearly 
all modern manufacture. The properties of the lever, 
the wheel and axle, etc., are involved in every machine 
— every machine is a solidified mechanical theorem ; 
and to machinery in these times we owe nearly all pro- 
duction. Trace the history of the breakfast-roll. The 
soil out of which it came was drained with machine- 
made tiles ; the surface was turned over by a machine ; 
the seed was put in by a machine ; the wheat was 
reaped, thrashed, and winnowed by machines ; by ma- 
chinery it was ground and bolted : and had the flour 
been sent to Gosport, it might have been made into 
biscuits by a machine. Look round the room in which 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 27 

you sit. If modern, probably the bricks in its walls 
were machine-made ; by machinery the flooring was 
sawn and planed, the mantel-shelf sawn and polished, 
the paper-hangings made and printed ; the veneer on 
the table, the turned legs of the chairs, the carpet, the 
curtains, are all products of machinery. And your 
clothing — plain, figured, or printed — is it not wholly 
woven, nay, perhaps even sewed by machinery? And 
the volume you are reading — are not its leaves fabri- 
cated by one machine and covered with these words by 
another ? Add to which, that for the means of distribu- 
tion over both land and sea,we are similarly indebted. 
And then let it be remembered that according as the 
principles of mechanics are well or ill used to these 
ends comes success or failure — individual and national. 
The engineer who misapplies his formulae for the 
strength of materials, builds a bridge that breaks 
down. The manufacturer whose apparatus is badly 
devised cannot compete with another whose apparatus 
wastes less in friction and inertia. The ship-builder 
adhering to the old model is outsailed by one who 
builds on the mechanically-justified wave-line principle 
And as the ability of a nation to hold its own against 
other nations depends on the skilled activity of its units, 
we see that on such knowledge may turn the national 
fate. Judge then the worth of mathematics. 

Need of a Knowledge of Physics — Pass next to 
Physics. Joined with mathematics, it has given us the 
steam-engine, which does the work of millions of labor- 
ers. That section of physics which deals with the laws 
of heat has taught us how to economize fuel in our 
various industries; how to increase the produce of our 
smelting furnaces by substituting the hot for the cold 
blast ; how to ventilate our mines ; how to prevent ex- 
plosions by using the safety-lamp ; and, through the 



28 Education. 

thermometer, how to regulate innumerable processes. 
That division which has the phenomena of light for its 
subject gives eyes to the old and the myopic ; aids 
-through the microscope in detecting diseases and adul- 
terations ; and by improved light-houses prevents ship- 
wrecks. Researches in electricity and magnetism have 
saved incalculable life and property by the compass; 
have subserved sundry arts by the electrotype ; and 
now, in the telegraph, have supplied us with the agency 
by which for the future all mercantile transactions will 
be regulated, political intercourse carried on, and per- 
haps national quarrels often avoided. While in the de- 
tails of indoor life, from the improved kitchen-range 
up to the stereoscope on the drawing-room table, the 
applications of advanced physics underlie our comforts 
and gratifications. 

Of Chemistry. — Still more numerous are the bearings 
of Chemistry on those activities by which men obtain 
the means of living. The bleacher, the dyer, the calico- 
printer, are severally occupied in processes that are 
well or ill done according as they do or do not con- 
form to chemical laws. The economical reduction 
from their ores of copper, tin, zinc, Jead, silver, iron, 
are in a great measure questions of chemistry. Sugar- 
refining, gas-making, soap-boiling, gunpowder manu- 
facture, are operations all partly chemical; as are also 
those by which are produced glass and porcelain. 
Whether the distiller's wort stops at the alcoholic fer- 
mentation or passes into the acetous, is a chemical 
question on which hangs his profit or loss, and the 
brewer, if his business is sufficiently large, finds it pay 
to keep a chemist on his premises. Glance through a 
work on technology, and it becomes at once apparent 
that there is now scarcely any process in the arts or 
manufactures over some part of which chemistry does 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 29 

not preside. And then, lastly, we come to the fact that, 
in these times, agriculture, to be profitably carried on, 
must have like guidance. The analysis of manures and 
soils; their adaptations to each other ; the use of gypsum 
or other substance for fixing ammonia ; the utilization 
of coprolites ; the production of artificial manures — all 
these are boons of chemistry which it behoves the 
farmer to acquaint himself with. Be it in the lucifer 
match, or in disinfected sewage, or in photographs — in 
bread made without fermentation, or perfumes extracted 
from refuse, we may perceive that chemistry affects all 
our industries ; and that, by consequence, knowledge of 
it concerns every one who is directly or indirectly con- 
nected with our industries. 

' Of Biology. — And then the science of life — Biology : 
does not this, too, bear fundamentally upon these pro- 
cesses of indirect self-preservation ? With what we ordi- 
narily call manufactures it has, indeed, little connection ; 
but with the all-essential manufacture — that of food — it 
is inseparably connected. As agriculture must conform 
its methods to the phenomena of vegetable and animal 
life, it follows necessarily that the science of these phe- 
nomena is the rational basis of agriculture. Various 
biological truths have indeed been empirically estab- 
lished and acted upon by farmers while yet there has 
been no conception of them as science : such as that 
particular manures are suited to particular plants; that 
crops of certain kinds unfit the soil for other crops ; that 
horses cannot do good work on poor food ; that such 
and such diseases of cattle and sheep are caused by 
such and such conditions. These, and the every-day 
knowledge which the agriculturist gains by experience 
respecting the right management of plants and animals, 
constitute his stock of biological facts, on the largeness 
of which greatly depends his success ; and as these bio- 



$o Education. 

logical facts, scanty, indefinite, rudimentary, though 
they are, aid him so essentially, judge what must be 
the value to him of such facts when they become posi- 
tive, definite, and exhaustive. Indeed, even now we 
may see the benefits that rational biology is conferring 
on him. The truth that the production of animal heat 
implies waste of substance, and that, therefore, prevent- 
ing loss of heat prevents the need for extra food — a 
purely theoretical conclusion — now guides the fatten- 
ing of cattle : it is found that by keeping cattle warm, 
fodder is saved. Similarly with respect to variety of 
food. The experiments of physiologists have shown 
that not only is change of diet beneficial, but that 
digestion is facilitated by a mixture of ingredients in 
each meal : both which truths are now influencing cattle- 
feeding. The discovery that a disorder known as the 
"staggers," of which many thousands of sheep have 
died annually, is caused by an entozoon which presses 
on the brain ; and that if the creature is extracted 
through the softened place in the skull which marks 
its position, the sheep usually recovers, is another debt 
which agriculture owes to biology. When we observe 
the marked contrast between our farming and farming 
on the Continent, and remember that this contrast is 
mainly due to the far greater influence science has had 
upon farming here than there ; and when we see how, 
daily, competition is making the adoption of scientific 
methods more general and necessary, we shall rightly 
infer that very soon agricultural success in England will 
be impossible without a competent knowledge of animal 
and vegetable physiology. 

Sociology. — Yet one more science have we to note as 
bearing directly on industrial success — the Science of 
Society. Without knowing it, men who daily look at 
the state of the money-market, glance over prices cur- 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 31 

rent, discuss the probable crops of corn, cotton, sugar, 
wool, silk, weigh the chances of war, and from all those 
data decide on their mercantile operations, are students 
of social science : empirical and blundering students it 
may be, but still students who gain the prizes or are 
plucked of their profits according as they do or do not 
reach the right conclusion. Not only the manufacturer 
and the merchant must guide their transactions by cal- 
culations of supply and demand, based on numerous 
facts, and tacitly recognizing sundry general principles 
of social action ; but even the retailer must do the like : 
his prosperity very greatly depending upon the correct- 
ness of his judgments respecting the future wholesale 
prices and the future rates of consumption. Manifestly, 
all who take part in the entangled commercial activities 
of a community are vitally interested in understanding 
the laws according to which those activities vary. 

Grounding in Science — Important Examples. — Thus, to 
all such as are occupied in the production, exchange, or 
distribution of commodities, acquaintance with science 
in some of its departments, is of fundamental impor- 
tance. Whoever is immediately or remotely impli- 
cated in any form of Industry (and few are not) has a 
direct interest in understanding something of the 
mathematical, physical, and chemical properties of 
things ; perhaps, also, has a direct interest in biology ; 
and certainly has in sociology. Whether he does or 
does not succeed well in that indirect self-preservation 
which we call getting a good livelihood, depends in a 
great degree on his knowledge of one or more of these 
sciences : not, it may be, a rational knowledge ; but 
still a knowledge, though empirical. For what we call 
learning a business really implies learning the science 
involved in it ; though not perhaps under the name of 
science. And hence a grounding in science is of great 



32 Education. 

importance, both because it prepares for all this, and 
because rational knowledge has an immense superiority 
over empirical knowledge. Moreover, not only is it 
that scientific culture is requisite for each, that he may 
understand the how and the why of the things and pro- 
cesses with which he is concerned as maker or dis- 
tributor ; but it is often of much moment that he 
should understand the how and the why of various other 
things and processes. In this age of joint-stock under- 
takings, nearly every man above the laborer is inter- 
ested as capitalist in some other occupation than his 
own ; and, as thus interested, his profit or loss often 
depends on his knowledge of the sciences bearing on 
this other occupation. Here is a mine, in the sinking 
of which many shareholders ruined themselves, from 
not knowing that a certain fossil belonged to the old 
red sandstone, below which no coal is found. Not 
many years ago, 20,000/. was lost in the prosecution of 
a scheme for collecting the alcohol that distils from 
bread in baking : all which would have been saved to 
the subscribers had they known that less than a hun- 
dredth part by weight of the flour is changed in fer- 
mentation. Numerous attempts have been made to 
construct electro-magnetic engines, in the hope of 
superseding steam ; but had those who supplied the 
money understood the general law of the correlation 
and equivalence of forces, they might have had better 
balances at their banker's. Daily are men induced to 
aid in carrying out inventions which a mere tyro in 
science could show to be futile. Scarcely a locality but 
has its history of fortunes thrown away over some im- 
possible project. 

More Important Every Year. — And if already the loss 
from want of science is so frequent and so great, still 
greater and more frequent will it be to those who here- 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 33 

after lack science. Just as fast as productive processes 
become more scientific, which competition will inevi- 
tably make them do; and just as fast as joint-stock 
undertakings spread, which they certainly will, so 
fast will scientific knowledge grow necessary to every 
one. 

What is Omitted from School Courses — That which 
our school courses leave almost entirely out we thus 
find to be that which most nearly concerns the business 
of life. All our industries would cease were it not for 
that information which men begin to acquire as they 
best may after their education is said to be finished. 
And were it not for this information, that has been 
from age to age accumulated and spread by unofficial 
means, these industries would never have existed. Had 
there been no teaching but such as is given in our 
public schools, England would now be what it was in 
feudal times. That increasing acquaintance with the 
laws of phenomena which has through successive ages 
enabled us to subjugate Nature to our needs, and in 
these days gives the common laborer comforts which a 
few centuries ago kings could not purchase, is scarcely 
in any degree owed to the appointed means of instruct- 
ing our youth. The vital knowledge — that by which 
we have grown as a nation to what we are, and which 
now underlies our whole existence, is a knowledge that 
has got itself taught in nooks and corners ; while the 
ordained agencies for teaching have been mumbling 
little else but dead formulas. 



III. OF ACTIVITIES WHICH HAVE FOR THEIR END THE 
REARING AND DISCIPLINE OF OFFSPRING. 

Knowledge of Rearing of Children not Given. — We 

come now to the third great division of human activities 



34 Education. 

— a division for which no preparation whatever is made. 
If by some strange chance not a vestige of us descended 
to the remote future save a pile of our schoolbooks or 
some college examination papers, we may imagine how 
puzzled an antiquary of the period would be on finding 
in them no indication that the learners were ever likely 
to be parents. " This must have been the curriculum 
for their celibates," we may fancy him concluding. " I 
perceive here an elaborate preparation for many things : 
especially for reading the books of extinct nations and 
of co-existing nations (from which indeed it seems clear 
that these people had very little worth reading in their 
own tongue) ; but I find no reference whatever to the 
bringing up of children. They could not have been so 
absurd as to omit all training for this gravest of re- 
sponsibilities. Evidently, then, this was the school 
course of one of their monastic orders." 

A Lamentable Ignorance. — Seriously, is it not an as- 
tonishing fact, that though on the treatment of off- 
spring depend their lives or deaths, and their moral 
welfare or ruin ; yet not one word of instruction on the 
treatment of offspring is ever given to those who will 
hereafter be parents ? Is it not monstrous that the fate 
of a new generation should be left to the chances of 
unreasoning custom, impulse, fancy — joined with the 
suggestions of ignorant nurses and the prejudiced 
counsel of grandmothers? If a merchant commenced 
business without any knowledge of arithmetic and 
book-keeping, we should exclaim at his folly, and look 
for disastrous consequences. Or, if before studying 
anatomy a man set up as a surgical operator, we should 
wonder at his audacity and pity his patients. But that 
parents should begin the difficult task of rearing 
children without ever having given a thought to the 
principles — physical, moral, or intellectual — which 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 35 

ought to guide them, excites neither surprise at the 
actors nor pity for their victims. 

Parents Ignorant of Important Physical Laws. — To 
tens of thousands that are killed, add hundreds of 
thousands that survive with feeble constitutions, and 
millions that grow up with constitutions not so strong 
as they should be, and you will have some idea of the 
curse inflicted on their offspring by parents ignorant of 
the laws of life. Do but consider for a moment that 
the regimen to which children are subject is hourly 
telling upon them to their life-long injury or benefit, 
and that there are twenty ways of going wrong to one 
way of going right, and you will get some idea of the 
enormous mischief that is almost everywhere inflicted 
by the thoughtless, haphazard system in common use. 
Is it decided that a boy shall be clothed in some flimsy 
short dress, and be allowed to go playing about with 
limbs reddened by cold ? The decision will tell on his 
whole future existence — either in illnesses, or in 
stunted growth, or in deficient energy, or in a maturity 
less vigorous than it ought to have been, and conse- 
quent hindrances to success and happiness. Are chil- 
dren doomed to a monotonous dietary, or a dietary that 
is deficient in nutritiveness ? Their ultimate physical 
power and their efficiency as men and women, will in- 
evitably be more or less diminished by it. Are they 
forbidden vociferous play, or (being too ill-clothed to 
bear exposure) are they kept in-doors in cold weather? 
They are certain to fall below that measure of health 
and strength to which they would else have attained. 
When sons and daughters grow up sickly and feeble, 
parents commonly regard the event as a misfortune — 
as a visitation of Providence, Thinking after the prev- 
alent chaotic fashion, they assume that these evils 
come without causes, or that the causes are super- 



36 Education. 



natural. Nothing of the kind. In some cases the 
causes are doubtless inherited ; but in most cases fool- 
ish regulations are the causes. Very generally parents 
themselves are responsible for all this pain, this debil- 
ity, this depression, this misery. They have undertaken 
to control the lives of their offspring from hour to hour ; 
with cruel carelessness they have neglected to learn 
anything about these vital processes which they are 
unceasingly affecting by their commands and prohibi- 
tions ; in utter ignorance of the simplest physiologic 
laws, they have been year by year undermining the 
constitutions of their children, and have so inflicted 
disease and premature death, not only on them but on 
their descendants. 

And of Moral Laws. — Equally great are the ignorance 
and the consequent injury when we turn from physical 
training to moral training. Consider the young mother 
and her nursery legislation. But a few years ago she 
was at school, where her memory was crammed with 
words and names and dates, and her reflective facul- 
ties scarcely in the slightest degree exercised — where 
not one idea was given her respecting the* methods of 
dealing with the opening mind of childhood ; and where 
her discipline did not in the least fit her for thinking 
out methods of her own. The intervening years have 
been passed in practising music, in fancy-work, in 
novel-reading, and in party-going : no thought having 
yet been given to the grave responsibilities of mater- 
nity ; and scarcely any of that solid intellectual culture 
obtained which would be some preparation for such 
responsibilities. And now see her with an unfolding 
human character committed to her charge — see her 
profoundly ignorant of the phenomena with which she 
has to deal, undertaking to do that which can be done 
but imperfectly even with the aid of the profoundest 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 37 

knowledge. She knows nothing about the nature of 
the emotions, their order of evolution, their functions, 
or where use ends and abuse begins. She is under the 
impression that some of the feelings are wholly bad, 
which is not true of any one of them ; and that others 
are good, however far they may be carried, which is 
also not true of any one of them. And then, ignorant 
as she is of that with which she has to deal, she is 
equally ignorant of the effects that will be produced on 
it by this or that treatment. What can be more inevi- 
table than the disastrous results we see hourly arising? 
Lacking knowledge of mental phenomena, with their 
causes and consequences, her interference is frequently 
more mischievous than absolute passivity would have 
been. This and that kind of action, which are quite 
normal and beneficial, she perpetually thwarts ; and so 
diminishes the child's happiness and profit, injures its 
temper and her own, and produces estrangement. 
Deeds which she thinks it desirable to encourage, she 
gets performed by threats and bribes, or by exciting a 
desire for applause : considering little what the inward 
motive may be, so long as the outward conduct con- 
forms ; and thus cultivating hypocrisy, and fear, and 
selfishness, in place of good feeling. While insisting 
on truthfulness, she constantly sets an example of un- 
truth, by threatening penalties which she does not in- 
flict. While inculcating self-control, she hourly visits 
on her little ones angry scoldings for acts that do 
not call for them. She has not the remotest idea 
that in the nursery, as in the world, that alone is the 
truly salutary discipline which visits on all conduct, 
good and bad, the natural consequences — the conse- 
quences, pleasurable or painful, which in the nature of 
things such conduct tends to bring. Being thus with- 
out theoretic guidance, and quite incapable of guiding 



38 Education. 

herself by tracing the mental processes going on in her 
children, her rule is impulsive, inconsistent, mischievous, 
often in the highest degree ; and would indeed be gen- 
erally ruinous, were it not that the overwhelming tend- 
ency of the growing mind to assume the moral type of 
the race usually subordinates all minor influences. 

And of Intellectual Laws. — And then the culture of 
the intellect — is not this, too, mismanaged in a similar 
manner? Grant that the phenomena of intelligence 
conform to laws ; grant that the evolution of intel- 
ligence in a child also conforms to laws, and it follows 
inevitably that education can be rightly guided only by 
a knowledge of these laws. To suppose that you can 
properly regulate this process of forming and accumu- 
lating ideas, without understanding the nature of the 
process, is absurd. How widely, then, must teaching 
as it is differ from teaching as it should be ; when 
hardly any parents, and but few teachers, know any- 
thing about psychology. As might be expected, the 
system is grievously at fault alike in matter and in 
manner. While the right class of facts is withheld, 
the wrong class is forcibly administered in the wrong 
way and in the wrong order. With that common 
limited idea of education which confines it to knowl- 
edge gained from books, parents thrust primers into 
the hands of their little ones years too soon, to their 
great injury/ Not recognizing the truth that the func- 
tion of books is supplementary, that they form an in- 
direct means to knowledge when direct means fail — a 
means of seeing through other men what you cannot 
see for yourself — they are eager to give second-hand 
facts in place of first-hand facts. 

Does not Second Spontaneous Education. — Not per- 
ceiving the enormous value of that spontaneous educa- 
tion which goes on in early years — not perceiving that 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 39 

a child's restless observation, instead of being ignored 
or checked, should be diligently administered to, and 
made as accurate and complete as possible, they insist 
on occupying its eyes and thoughts with things that 
are, for the time being, incomprehensible and repug- 
nant. Possessed by a superstition which worships the 
symbols of knowledge instead of the knowledge itself, 
they do not see that only when his acquaintance with 
the objects and processes of the household, the streets, 
and the fields is becoming tolerably exhaustive — only 
then should a child be introduced to the new sources of 
information which books supply : and this, not only 
because immediate cognition is of far greater value 
than mediate cognition, but also because the words 
contained in books can be rightly interpreted into 
ideas, only in proportion to the antecedent experience 
of things. 

Mental Development Ignored. — Observe, next, that 
this formal instruction, far too soon commenced, is 
carried on with but little reference to the laws of 
mental development. Intellectual progress is of neces- 
sity from the concrete to the abstract. But regardless 
of this, highly abstract subjects, such as grammar, 
which should come quite late, are begun quite early. 
Political geography, dead and uninteresting to a child, 
and which should be an appendage of sociological 
studies, is commenced betimes ; while physical geog- 
raphy, comprehensible and comparatively attractive to 
a child, is in great part passed over. Nearly every sub- 
ject dealt with is arranged in abnormal order : defini- 
tions, and rules, and principles being put first, instead 
of being disclosed, as they are in the order of nature, 
through the study of cases. 

Results of Rote Learning. — And then, pervading the 
whole, is the vicious system of rote learning — a system 



40 Education. 

of sacrificing the spirit to the letter. See the results. 
What with perceptions unnaturally dulled by early 
thwarting, and a coerced attention to books ; what 
with the mental confusion produced by teaching sub- 
jects before they can be understood, and in each of 
them giving generalizations before the facts of which 
these are the generalizations ; what with making the 
pupil a mere passive recipient of others' ideas, and not 
in the least leading him to be an active inquirer or self- 
instructor; and what with taxing the faculties to 
excess, there are very few minds that become as 
efficient as they might be. Examinations being once 
passed, books are laid aside ; the greater part of what 
has been acquired, being unorganized, soon drops out 
of recollection ; what remains is mostly inert — the art 
of applying knowledge not having been cultivated ; 
and there is but little power. either of accurate observa- 
tion or independent thinking. To all which add, that 
while much of the information gained is of relatively 
small value, an immense mass of information of tran- 
scendent value is entirely passed over. 

Child-Training Defective. — Thus we find the facts to 
be such as might have been inferred a priori. The 
training of children — physical, moral, and intellectual 
— is dreadfully defective. And in great measure it is 
so because parents are devoid of that knowledge by 
which this training can alone be rightly guided. What 
is to be expected when one of the most intricate of 
problems is undertaken by those who have given 
scarcely a thought to the principles on which its 
solution depends ? For shoe-making or house-building, 
for the management of a ship or a locomotive engine, a 
long apprenticeship is needful. Is it, then, that the un- 
folding of a human being in body and mind is so com- 
paratively simple a process that any one may superin- 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 4 1 

tend and regulate it with no preparation whatever ? If 
not — if the process is with one exception more complex 
than any in Nature, and the task of administering to it 
one of surpassing difficulty is it not madness to make 
no provision for such a task ? Better sacrifice accom- 
plishments than omit this all-essential instruction. 
When a father, acting on false dogmas adopted without 
examination, has alienated his sons, driven them into 
rebellion by his harsh treatment, ruined them, and 
made himself miserable, he might reflect that the 
study of Ethology would have been worth pursuing, 
even at the cost of knowing nothing about YEschylus. 
When a mother is mourning over a first-born that has 
sunk under the sequelae of scarlet-fever ; when perhaps 
a candid medical man has confirmed her suspicion that 
her child would have recovered had not its system been 
enfeebled by overstudy ; when she is prostrate under 
the pangs of combined grief and remorse, it is but a 
small consolation that she can read Dante in the origi- 
nal. 

Deep Knowledge not Proposed. — Thus we see that for 
regulating the third great division of human activities, 
a knowledge of the laws of life is the one thing needful. 
Some acquaintance with the first principles of physiol- 
ogy and the elementary truths of psychology is indis- 
pensable for the right bringing up of children. We 
doubt not that this assertion will by many be read with 
a smile. That parents in general should be expected 
to acquire a knowledge of subjects so abstruse will 
seem to them an absurdity. And if we proposed that 
an exhaustive knowledge of these subjects should be 
obtained by all fathers and mothers, the absurdity 
would indeed be glaring enough. But we do not. 
General principles only, accompanied by such detailed 
illustrations as may be needed to make them under- 



42 Education. 

stood, would suffice. And these might be readily- 
taught — if not rationally, then dogmatically. Be this 
as it may, however, here are the indisputable facts : 
that the development of children in mind and body 
rigorously obeys certain laws ; that unless these laws 
are in some degree conformed to by parents, death is 
inevitable ; that unless they are in a great degree con- 
formed to, there must result serious physical and mental 
defects ; and that only when they are completely con- 
formed to can a perfect maturity be reached. Judge, 
then, whether all who may one day be parents should 
not strive with some anxiety to learn what these laws 
are. 

IV. OF ACTIVITIES WHICH ARE INVOLVED IN THE 
MAINTENANCE OF PROPER SOCIAL AND POLITI= 
CAL RELATIONS. 

History is Studied. — From the parental functions let 
us pass now to the functions of the citizen. We have 
here to inquire what knowledge best fits a man for the 
discharge of these functions. It cannot be alleged, as 
in the last case, that the need for knowledge fitting 
him for these functions is wholly overlooked.; for our 
school courses contain certain studies which, nominally 
at least, bear upon political and social duties. Of these 
the only one that occupies a prominent place is His- 
tory. 

But it is mainly Valueless — But, as already more 
than once hinted, the historic information commonly 
given is almost valueless for purposes of guidance. 
Scarcely any of the facts set down in our school-his- 
tories, and very few even of those contained in the 
more elaborate works written for adults, give any clue 
to the right principles of political action. The biog- 
raphies of monarchs (and our children commonly learn 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 43 

little else) throw scarcely any light upon the science of 
society. Familiarity with court intrigues, plots, usur- 
pations, or the like, and with all the personalities ac- 
companying them, aids very little in elucidating the 
principles on which national welfare depends. We 
read of some squabble for power, that it led to a 
pitched battle ; that such and such were the names of 
the generals and their leading subordinates ; that they 
had each so many thousand infantry and cavalry, and 
so many cannon ; that they arranged their forces in 
this and that order ; that they manoeuvred, attacked, 
and fell back in certain ways ; that at this part of the 
day such disasters were sustained and at that such ad- 
vantages gained ; that in one particular movement 
some leading officer fell, while in another a certain 
regiment was decimated ; that after all the changing 
fortunes of the fight, the victory was gained by this or 
that army ; and that so many were killed and wounded 
on each side, and so many captured by the conquerors. 
And now, out of the accumulated details which make 
up the narrative, say which it is that helps you in de- 
ciding on your conduct as a citizen. Supposing even 
that you had diligently read, not only " The Fifteen 
Decisive Battles of the World," but accounts of all other 
battles that history mentions : how much more judi- 
cious would your vote be at the next election ? " But 
these are facts — interesting facts," you say. Without 
doubt they are facts (such, at least, as are not wholly or 
partially fictions) ; and to many they maybe interesting 
facts. But this by no means implies that they are valu- 
able. Factitious or morbid opinion often gives seeming 
value to things that have scarcely any. A tulipomaniac 
will not part with a Choice bulb for its weight in gold. 
To another man an ugly piece of cracked old china 
seems his most desirable possession. And there are 



44 Education. 

those who give high prices for the relics of cele- 
brated murderers. Will it be contended that these 
tastes are any measures of value in the things that 
gratify them ? If not, then it must be admitted that 
the liking felt for certain classes of historical facts is no 
proof of their worth ; and that we must test their 
worth as we test the worth of other facts, by asking to 
what uses they are applicable. Were some one to tell 
you that your neighbor's cat kittened yesterday, you 
would say the information was worthless. Fact though 
it might be, you would say it was an utterly useless fact 
— a fact that could in no way influence your actions in 
life — a fact that would not help you in learning how to 
live completely. Well, apply the same test to the great 
mass of historical facts, and you will get the same 
results. They are facts from which no conclusions can 
be drawn — unorganizable facts; and therefore facts 
which can be of no service in establishing principles of 
conduct, which is the chief use of facts. Read them, if 
you like, for amusement ; but do not flatter yourself 
they are instructive. 

Real History is Omitted. — That which constitutes His- 
tory, properly so called, is in great part omitted from 
works on the subject. Only of late years have his- 
torians commenced giving us, in any considerable 
quantity, the truly valuable information. As in past 
ages the king was everything and the people nothing ; 
so, in past histories the doings of the king fill the entire 
picture, to which the national life forms but an obscure 
background. While only now, when the welfare of 
nations rather than of rulers is becoming the dominant 
idea, are historians beginning to occupy themselves 
with the phenomena of social progress. That which it 
really concerns us to know is the natural history of 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 45 

society. We want all facts which help us to understand 
how a nation has grown and organized itself. 

The Government. — Among these, let us of course have 
an account of its government ; with as little as may be 
of gossip about the men who officered it, and as much 
as possible about the structure, principles, methods, 
prejudices, corruptions, etc., which it exhibited : and 
let this account not only include the nature and actions 
of the central government, but also those of local govern- 
ments, down to their minutest ramifications. 

The Church. — Let us of course also have a parallel 
description of the ecclesiastical government — its organi- 
zation, its conduct, its power, its relations to the State : 
and accompanying this, the ceremonial, creed, and relig- 
ious ideas — not only those nominally believed, but those 
really believed and acted upon. 

Society — Let us at the same time be informed of the 
control exercised by class over class, as displayed in all 
social observances — in titles, salutations, and forms of 
address. 

Customs. — Let us know, too, what were all the other 
customs which regulated the popular life out-of-doors 
and in-doors : including those which concern the rela- 
tions of the sexes, and the relations of parents to 
children. 

The superstitions, also, from the more important 
myths down to the charms in common use, should be 
indicated. 

Next should come a delineation of the industrial 
system ; showing to what extent the division of labor 
was carried ; how trades were regulated, whether by 
caste, guilds, or otherwise ; what was the connection 
between employers and employed ; what were the 
agencies for distributing commodities, what were the 
means of communication ; what was the circulating 



46 Education. 

medium. Accompanying all which should come an 
account of the industrial arts technically considered : 
stating the processes in use, and the quality of the 
products. 

Further, the intellectual condition of the nation in its 
various grades should be depicted : not only with respect 
to the kind and amount of education, but with respect 
to the progress made in science, and the prevailing 
manner of thinking. The degree of aesthetic culture, 
as displayed in architecture, sculpture, painting, dress, 
music, poetry, and fiction, should be described. 

Nor should there be omitted a sketch of the daily 
lives of the people — their food, their homes, and their 
amusements. 

And lastly, to connect the whole, should be exhibited 
the morals, theoretical and practical, of all classes : as 
indicated in their laws, habits, proverbs, deeds. 

Descriptive Sociology Needed.— AIL these facts, given 
with as much brevity as consists with clearness and 
accuracy, should be so grouped and arranged that they 
may be comprehended in their ensemble ; and thus may 
be contemplated as mutually dependent parts of one 
great whole. The aim should be so to present them 
that we may readily trace the consensus subsisting 
among them ; with the view of learning what social 
phenomena coexist with what others. And then the 
corresponding delineations of succeeding ages should 
be so managed as to show us, as clearly as may be, how 
each belief, institution, custom, and arrangement was 
modified ; and how the consensus of preceding structures 
and functions was developed into the consensus of suc- 
ceeding ones. Such alone is the kind of information 
respecting past times, which can be of service to the 
citizen for the regulation of his conduct. The only 
history that is of practical value is what may be called 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 47 

Descriptive Sociology. And the highest office which 
the historian can discharge is that of so narrating the 
lives of nations as to furnish materials for a Compara- 
tive Sociology ; and for the subsequent determination 
of the ultimate laws to which social phenomena conform. 
Science the Basis of History. — But now mark, that 
even supposing an adequate stock of this truly valu- 
able historical knowledge has been acquired, it is of 
comparatively little use without the key. And the key 
is to be found only in Science. Without an acquaint- 
ance with the general truths of biology and psychology, 
rational interpretation of social phenomena is impossible- 
Only in proportion as men obtain a certain rude, empir- 
ical knowledge of human nature are they enabled to 
understand even the simplest facts of social life : as, 
for instance, the relation between supply and demand. 
And if not even the most elementary truths of sociology 
can be reached until some knowledge is obtained of how 
men generally think, feel, and act under given circum- 
stances, then it is manifest that there can be nothing 
like a wide comprehension of sociology, unless through 
a competent knowledge of man in all his faculties, bodily 
and mental. Consider the matter in the abstract, and 
this conclusion is self-evident. Thus : Society is made 
up of individuals ; all that is done in society is done by 
the combined actions of individuals ; and therefore, in 
individual actions only can be found the solutions of 
social phenomena. But the actions of individuals de- 
pend on the laws of their natures ; and their actions 
cannot be understood until these laws are understood. 
These laws, however, when reduced to their simplest 
expression, are found to depend on the laws of body 
and mind in general. Hence it necessarily follows 
that biology and psychology are indispensable as inter- 
preters of sociology. Or, to state the conclusions still 



48 EducaHon. 

more simply : All social phenomena are phenomena of 
life — are the most complex manifestations of life — are 
ultimately dependent on the laws of life — and can be 
understood only when the laws of life are understood. 
Thus, then, we see that for the regulation of this fourth 
division of human activities we are, as before, depend- 
ent on Science. Of the knowledge commonly imparted 
in educational courses, very little is of any service in 
guiding a man in his conduct as a citizen. Only a 
small part of the history he reads is of practical value ; 
and of this small part he is not prepared to make proper 
use. He commonly lacks not only the materials for, but 
the very conception of, descriptive sociology ; and he 
also lacks that knowledge of the organic sciences with- 
out which even descriptive sociology can give him but 
little aid. 

V. OF MISCELLANEOUS ACTIVITIES WHICH MAKE UP 
THE LEISURE PART OF LIFE, DEVOTED TO THE 
GRATIFICATION OF THE TASTES AND FEELINGS. 

Our Leisure Hours. — And now we come to that re- 
maining division of human life which includes the 
relaxations, pleasures, and amusements filling leisure 
hours. After considering what training best fits for 
self-preservation, for the obtainment of sustenance, for 
the discharge of parental duties, and for the regulation 
of social and political conduct, we have now to con- 
sider what training best fits for the miscellaneous ends 
not included in these — for the enjoyments of Nature, of 
Literature, and of the Fine Arts, in all their forms. 
Postponing them as we do to things that bear more 
vitally upon human welfare, and bringing everything, 
as we have, to the test of actual value, it will perhaps 
be inferred that we are inclined to slight these less 
essential things. No greater mistake could be made, 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 49 

however. We yield to none in the value we attach to 
aesthetic culture and its pleasures. Without painting, 
sculpture, music, poetry, and the emotions produced by 
natural beauty of every kind, life would lose half its 
charm. So far from thinking that the training and 
gratification of the tastes are unimportant, we believe 
the time will come when they will occupy a much 
larger share of human life than now. When the forces 
of Nature have been fully conquered to man's use ; 
when the means of production have been brought to 
perfection ; when labor has been economized to the 
highest degree ; when education has been so systema- 
tized that a preparation for the more essential activities 
may be made with comparative rapidity ; and when, 
consequently, there is a great increase of spare time, 
then will the poetry both of Art and Nature rightly 
fill a large space in the minds of all. 

^Esthetic Culture Subordinate.— But it is one thing to 
admit that aesthetic culture is in a high degree condu- 
cive to human happiness, and another thing to admit 
that it is a fundamental requisite to human happiness. 
However important it may be, it must yield precedence 
to those kinds of culture which bear more directly upon 
the duties of life. As before hinted, literature and the 
fine arts are made possible by those activities which 
make individual and social life possible ; and mani- 
festly, that which is made possible must be postponed 
to that which makes it possible. A florist cultivates a 
plant for the sake of its flower, and regards the roots 
and leaves as of value chiefly because they are instru- 
mental in producing the flower. But while, as an ulti- 
mate product, the flower is the thing to which everything 
else is subordinate, the florist veryvvell knows that the 
root and leaves are intrinsically of greater importance ; 
because on them the evolution of the flower depends. 



50 Education. 

He bestows every care in rearing a healthy plant, and 
knows it would be folly if, in his anxiety to obtain the 
flower, he were to neglect the plant. Similarly in the 
case before us. Architecture, sculpture, painting, 
music, poetry, etc., may be truly called the efflorescence 
of civilized life. But even supposing them to be of 
such transcendent worth as to subordinate the civilized 
life out of which they grow (which can hardly be as- 
serted), it will still be admitted that the production 
of a healthy civilized life must be the first considera- 
tion, and that the knowledge conducing to this must 
occupy the highest place. 

Defect of Present Systems. — And here we see most 
distinctly the vice of our educational system. It neg- 
lects the plant for the sake of the flower. In anxiety 
for elegance, it forgets substance. While it gives no 
knowledge conducive to self-preservation ; while of 
knowledge that facilitates gaining a livelihood it gives 
but the rudiments, and leaves the greater part to be 
picked up anyhow in after life ; while for the discharge 
of parental functions it makes not the slightest pro- 
vision ; and while for the duties of citizenship it pre- 
pares by imparting a mass of facts most of which are 
irrelevant and the rest without a key, it is diligent in 
teaching everything that adds to refinement, polish, 
eclat. However fully we may admit that extensive 
acquaintance with modern languages is a valuable ac- 
complishment, which, through reading, conversation, 
and travel, aids in giving a certain finish, it by no 
means follows that this result is rightly purchased at 
the cost of that vitally important knowledge sacrificed 
to it. Supposing it true that classical education con- 
duces to elegance and correctness of style it cannot 
be said that elegance and correctness of style are com- 
parable in importance to a familiarity with the princi- 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 5 1 

pies that should guide the rearing of children. Grant 
that the taste may be greatly improved by reading 
all the poetry written in extinct languages ; yet it is 
not to be inferred that such improvement of taste is 
equivalent in value to an acquaintance with the laws of 
health. Accomplishments, the fine arts, belles-lettres, 
and all those things which, as we say, constitute the 
efflorescence of civilization, should be wholly subordi- 
nate to that knowledge and discipline in which civiliza- 
tion rests. As they occupy the leisure part of life, so should 
they occupy the leisure part of education. 

Science Above Esthetics. — Recognizing thus the true 
position of aesthetics, and holding that while the culti- 
vation of them should form a part of education from 
its commencement, such cultivation should be subsid- 
iary ; we have now to inquire what knowledge is of 
most use to this end — what knowledge best fits for this 
remaining sphere of activity. To this question the 
answer is still the same as heretofore. Unexpected as 
the assertion may be, it is nevertheless true, that the 
highest Art of every kind is based upon Science — that 
without Science there can be neither perfect production 
nor full appreciation. Science, in that limited tech- 
nical acceptation current in society, may not have been 
possessed by many artists of high repute ; but acute 
observers as they have been, they have always pos- 
sessed a stock of those empirical generalizations which 
constitute science in its lowest phase ; and they have 
habitually fallen far below perfection, partly because 
their generalizations were comparatively few and in- 
accurate. That science necessarily underlies the fine 
arts becomes manifest, a priori, when we remember 
that art-products are all more or less representative of 
objective or subjective phenomena ; that they can be 
true only in proportion as they conform to the laws of 



52 Education. 

these phenomena; and that before they can thus con- 
form the artist must know what these laws are. That 
this a priori conclusion tallies with experience we shall 
soon see. 

Take Sculpture. — Youths preparing for the practice 
of sculpture have to acquaint themselves with the 
bones and muscles of the human frame in their distri- 
bution, attachments, and movements. This is a portion 
of science ; and it has been found needful to impart it 
for the prevention of those many errors which sculptors 
who do not possess it commit. For the prevention of 
other mistakes, a knowledge of mechanical principles is 
requisite; and such knowledge not being usually pos- 
sessed, grave mechanical mistakes are frequently made. 
Take an instance. For the stability of a figure it is 
needful that the perpendicular from the centre of 
gravity — "the line of direction," as it is called — should 
fall within the base of support ; and hence it happens 
that when a man assumes the attitude known as 
" standing at ease," in which one leg is straightened 
and the other relaxed, the line of direction falls within 
the foot of the straightened leg. But sculptors unfa- 
miliar with the theory of equilibrium not uncommonly 
so represent this attitude that the line of direction falls 
midway between the feet. Ignorance of the laws of 
momentum leads to analogous errors : as witness the 
admired Discobolus, which, as it is posed, must inevita- 
bly fall forward the moment the quoit is delivered. 

Take Painting. — In painting, the necessity for scien- 
tific knowledge, empirical if not rational, is still more 
conspicuous. In what consists the grotesqueness of 
Chinese pictures, unless in their utter disregard of the 
laws of appearances — in their absurd linear perspective 
and their want of aerial perspective ? In what are the 
drawings of a child so "faulty, if not in a similar ab- 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 53 

sence of truth — an absence arising, in great part, from 
ignorance of the way in which the aspects of things 
vary with the conditions ? Do but remember the books 
and lectures by which students are instructed, or con- 
sider the criticisms of Ruskin, or look at the doings 
of the Pre-Raphaelites, and you will see that prog- 
ress in painting implies increasing knowledge of how 
effects in Nature are produced. The most diligent 
observation, if not aided by science, fails to preserve 
from error. Every painter will indorse the assertion 
that unless it is known what appearances must exist 
under given circumstances, they often will not be per- 
ceived ; and to know what appearances must exist is, 
in so far, to understand the science of appearances. 
From want of science Mr. J. Lewis, careful painter as 
he is, casts the shadow of a lattice-window in sharply- 
defined lines upon an opposite wall ; which he would 
not have done had he been familiar with the phenom- 
ena of penumbrse. From want of science, Mr. Rossetti, 
catching sight of a peculiar iridescence displayed by 
certain hairy surfaces under particular lights (an iri- 
descence caused by the diffraction of light in passing 
the hairs), commits the error of showing this irides- 
cence on surfaces and in positions where it could not 
occur. 

Take Music. — To say that music, too, has need of 
scientific aid will seem still more surprising. Yet it is 
demonstrable that music is but an idealization of the 
natural language of emotion ; and that, consequently, 
music must be good or bad according as it conforms to 
the laws of this natural language. The various inflec- 
tions of voice which accompany feelings of different 
kinds and intensities have been shown to be the germs 
out of which music is developed. It has been further 
shown that these inflections and cadences are not acci- 



54 Education. 

dental or arbitrary, but that they are determined by 
certain general principles of vital action, and that 
their expressiveness depends on this. Whence it follows 
that musical phrases and the melodies built of them 
can be effective only when they are in harmony with 
these general principles. It is difficult here properly to 
illustrate this position. But perhaps it will suffice to 
instance the swarms of worthless ballads that infest 
drawing-rooms, as compositions which science would 
forbid. They sin against science by setting to music 
ideas that are not emotional enough to prompt musical 
expression ; and they also sin against science by using 
musical phrases that have no natural relation to the 
ideas expressed, even where these are emotional. They 
are bad because they are untrue. And to say they are 
untrue is to say they are unscientific. 

Poetry. — Even in poetry the same thing holds. Like 
music, poetry has its root in those natural modes of 
expression which accompany deep feeling. Its rhythm, 
its strong and numerous metaphors, its hyperboles, its 
violent inversions, are simply exaggerations of the 
traits of excited speech. To be good, therefore, poetry 
must pay respect to those laws of nervous action 
which excited speech obeys. In intensifying and com- 
bining the traits of excited -speech, it must have due 
regard to proportion — must not use its appliances with- 
out restriction ; but, where the ideas are least emo- 
tional, must use the forms of poetical expression 
sparingly ; must use them more freely as the emotion 
rises ; and must carry them all to their greatest extent 
only where the emotion reaches a climax. The entire 
contravention of these principles results in bombast or 
doggerel. The insufficient respect for them is seen in 
didactic poetry. And it is because they are rarely fully 
obeyed that we have so much poetry that is inartistic. 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 55 

In the Mental Field. — Not only is it that the artist, of 
whatever kind, cannot produce a truthful work without 
he understands the laws of the phenomena he repre- 
sents ; but it is that he must also understand how the 
minds of spectators or listeners will be affected by the 
several peculiarities of his work — a question in psychol- 
ogy. What impression any given art-product generates, 
manifestly depends upon the mental natures of those to 
whom it is presented ; and as all mental natures have 
certain general principles in common, there must result 
certain corresponding general principles on which alone 
art-products can be successfully framed. These general 
principles cannot be fully understood and applied un- 
less the artist sees how they follow from the laws of 
mind. To ask whether the composition of a picture is 
good, is really to ask how the perceptions and feelings 
of observers will be affected by it. To ask whether a 
drama is well constructed, is to ask whether its situa- 
tions are so arranged as duly to consult the power of 
attention of an audience, and duly to avoid overtaxing 
any one class of feelings. Equally in arranging the 
leading divisions of a poem or fiction, and in combining 
the words of a single sentence, the goodness of the 
effect depends upon the skill with which the mental en- 
ergies and susceptibilities of the reader are economized. 
Every artist, in the course of his education and after- 
life, accumulates a stock of maxims by which his prac- 
tice is regulated. Trace such maxims to their roots, 
and you find they inevitably lead you down to psycho- 
logical principles. And only when the artist rationally 
understands those psychological principles and their 
various corollaries can he work in harmony with them. 

Genius Needs Science. — We do not for a moment be- 
lieve that science will make an artist. While we con- 
tend that the leading laws both of objective and sub- 



56 Education. 

jective phenomena must be understood by him, we by 
no means contend that knowledge of such laws will 
serve in place of natural perception. Not only the 
poet, but also the artist of every type, is born, not 
made. What we assert is, that innate faculty alone will 
not suffice ; but must have the aid of organized knowl- 
edge. Intuition will do much, but it will not do all. 
Only when Genius is married to Science can the highest 
results be produced. 

Science Leads to Appreciation — As we have above as- 
serted, Science is necessary not only for the most suc- 
cessful production, but also for the full appreciation of 
the fine arts. In what consists the greater ability of a 
man than of a child to perceive the beauties of a 
picture, unless it is in his more extended knowledge 
of those things in nature or life which the picture ren- 
ders? How happens the cultivated gentleman to enjoy 
a fine poem so much more than a boor does, if it is 
not because his wider acquaintance with objects and 
actions enables him to see in the poem much that the 
boor cannot see? And if, as is here so obvious, there 
must be some familiarity with the things represented 
before the representation can be appreciated, then the 
representation can be completely appreciated only in 
proportion as the things represented are completely 
understood. The fact is, that every additional truth 
which a work of art expresses gives an additional 
pleasure to the percipient mind — a pleasure that is 
missed by those ignorant of this truth. The more re- 
alities an artist indicates in any given amount of work, 
the more faculties does he appeal to, the more numer- 
ous associated ideas does he suggest, the more gratifi- 
cation does he afford. But to receive this gratification, 
the spectator, listener, or reader must know the reali- 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 57 

ties which the artist has indicated; and to know these 
realities is to know so much science. 

Science and Poetry. — And now let us not overlook 
the further great fact, that not only does science under- 
lie sculpture, painting, music, poetry, but that science 
is itself poetic. The current opinion that science and 
poetry are opposed is a delusion. It is doubtless true 
that as states of consciousness, cognition and emotion 
tend to exclude each other. And it is doubtless also 
true that an extreme activity of the reflective powers 
tends to deaden the feelings; while an extreme activity 
of the feelings tends to deaden the reflective powers; 
in which sense, indeed, all orders of activity are antag- 
onistic to each other. But it is not true that the facts 
of science are unpoetical, or that the cultivation of 
science is necessarily unfriendly to the exercise of im- 
agination or the love of the beautiful. On the contrary, 
science opens up realms of poetry where to the unscien- 
tific all is a blank. Those engaged in scientific re- 
searches constantly show us that they realize not less 
vividly, but more vividly, than others the poetry of 
their subjects. Whoever will dip into Hugh Miller's 
works on geology, or read Mr. Lewes's " Seaside 
Studies," will perceive that science excites poetry rather 
than extinguishes it. And whoever will contemplate 
the life of Goethe will see that the poet and the man of 
science can coexist in equal activity. 

Science and Highest Thought. — Is it not, indeed, an 
absurd and almost a sacrilegious belief that the more a 
man studies Nature the less he reveres it ? Think you 
that a drop of water, which to the vulgar eye is but a 
drop of water, loses anything in the eye of the physi- 
cist who knows that its elements are held together by 
a force which, if suddenly liberated, would produce a 
flash of lightning? Think you that what is carelessly 



58 Education. 

looked upon by the uninitiated as a mere snow-flake, 
does not suggest higher associations to one who has 
seen through a microscope the wondrously varied and 
elegant forms of snow-crystals ? Think you that the 
rounded rock marked with parallel scratches calls up as 
much poetry in an ignorant mind as in the mind of a 
geologist, who knows that over this rock a glacier slid 
a million years ago? The truth is, that those who have 
never entered upon scientific pursuits know not a tithe 
of the poetry by which they are surrounded. Whoever 
has not in youth collected plants and insects, knows 
not half the halo of interest which lanes and hedge- 
rows can assume. Whoever has not sought for fossils, 
has little idea of the poetical associations that surround 
the places where imbedded treasures were found. Who- 
ever at the seaside has not had a microscope and ac- 
quarium, has yet to learn what the highest pleasures of 
the seaside are. Sad, indeed, is it to see how men 
occupy themselves with trivialities, and are indifferent 
to the grandest phenomena — care not to understand the 
architecture of the Heavens, but are deeply interested 
in some contemptible controversy about the intrigues 
of Mary Queen of Scots ! — are learnedly critical over a 
Greek ode, and pass by without a glance that grand 
epic written by the finger of God upon the strata of 
the Earth! 

Science the Base for ^Esthetics. — We find, then, that 
even for this remaining division of human activities 
scientific culture is the proper preparation. We find 
that aesthetics in general are necessarily based upon 
scientific principles, and can be pursued with complete 
success only through an acquaintance with these prin- 
ciples. We find that for the criticism and due appre- 
ciation of works of art a knowledge of the constitution 
of things, or, in other words, a knowledge of science, is 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 59 

requisite. And we not only find that science is the 
handmaid to all forms of art and poetry, but that, 
rightly regarded, science is itself poetical. 

VI. FOR DISCIPLINE. 

Which is Best for Discipline? — Thus far our question 
has been, the worth of knowledge of this or that kind 
for purposes of guidance. We have now to judge the 
relative values of different kinds of knowledge for pur- 
poses of discipline. This division of our subject we are 
obliged to treat with comparative brevity ; and, happily, 
no very lengthened treatment of it is needed. Having 
found what is best for the one end, we have by implica- 
tion found what is best for the other. We maybe quite 
sure that the acquirement of those classes of facts which 
are most useful for regulating conduct, involves a men- 
tal exercise best fitted for strengthening the faculties. 
It would be utterly contrary to the beautiful economy 
of Nature if one kind of culture were needed for the 
gaining of information and another kind were needed 
as a mental gymnastic. Everywhere throughout creation 
we find faculties developed through the performance of 
those functions which it is their office to perform, — not 
through the performance of artificial exercises devised 
to fit them for these functions. The Red Indian ac- 
quires the swiftness and agility which make him a suc- 
cessful hunter by the actual pursuit of animals ; and 
by the miscellaneous activities of his life he gains a 
better balance of physical powers than gymnastics ever 
give. That skill in tracking enemies and prey which he 
has reached by long practice implies a subtlety of per- 
ception far exceeding anything produced by artificial 
training. And similarly throughout. From the Bush- 
man, whose eye, which being habitually employed in 






60 Education. 

identifying distant objects that are to be pursued or 
fled from, has acquired a quite telescopic range, to the 
accountant, whose daily practice enables him to add up 
several columns of figures simultaneously, we find that 
the highest power of a faculty results from the discharge 
of those duties which the conditions of life require it to 
discharge. And we may be certain a priori, that the 
same law holds throughout education. The education 
of most value for guidance must at the same time be 
the education of most value for discipline. Let us con- 
sider the evidence. 

Science Best for Memory-training.— One advantage 
claimed for that devotion to language-learning which 
forms so prominent a feature in the ordinary curriculum 
is, that the memory is thereby strengthened. And it is 
apparently assumed that this is an advantage peculiar 
to the study of words. But the truth is, that the 
sciences afford far wider fields for the exercise of mem- 
ory. It is no slight task to remember all the facts as- 
certained respecting our solar system ; much more to 
remember all that is known concerning the structure of 
our galaxy. The new compounds which chemistry 
daily accumulates are so numerous that few, save pro- 
fessors, know the names of them all ; and to recollect 
the atomic constitutions and affinities of all these com- 
pounds is scarcely possible without making chemistry 
the occupation of life. In the enormous mass of phe- 
nomena presented by the Earth's crust, and in the still 
more enormous mass of phenomena presented by the 
fossils.it contains, there is matter which takes the geo- 
logical student years of application to master. In each 
leading division of physics — sound, heat, light, electri- 
city — -the facts are numerous enough to alarm any one 
proposing to learn them all. And when we pass to the 
organic sciences, the effort of memory required becomes 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 6 1 

still greater. In human anatomy alone the quantity of 
detail is so great, that the young surgeon has common- 
ly to get it up half-a-dozen times before he can perma- 
nently retain it. The number of species of plants which 
botanists distinguish amounts to some 320,000, while 
the varied forms of animal life with which the zoologist 
deals are estimated at some two millions. So vast is 
the accumulation of facts which men of science have 
before them, that only by dividing and subdividing their 
labors can they deal with it. To a complete knowledge 
of its own division each adds but a general knowledge 
of the rest. Surely, then, science, cultivated ev,en to a 
very moderate extent, affords adequate exercise for 
memory. To say the very least, it involves quite as 
good a training for this faculty as language does. 

Science Cultivates the Best Kind of Memory. — But 
now mark, that while for the training of mere memory 
science is as good as, if not better than, language, it 
has an immense superiority in the kind of memory it 
cultivates. In the acquirement of language the con- 
nections of ideas to be established in the mind corre- 
spond to facts that are in great measure accidental ; 
whereas in the acquirement of science the connections 
of ideas to be established in the mind correspond to 
facts that are mostly necessary. It is true that the 
relations of words to their meaning is in one sense nat- 
ural, and that the genesis of these relations may be 
traced back a certain distance, though very rarely to 
the beginning (to which let us add the remark, that 
the laws of this genesis form a branch of mental science 
— the science of philology). But since it will not be 
contended that in the acquisition of languages, as ordi- 
narily carried on, these natural relations between words 
and their meanings are habitually traced, and the laws 
regulating them explained, it must be admitted that 



62 



Education. 



they are commonly learned as fortuitous relations. On 
the other hand, the relations which science presents are 
casual relations, and, when properly taught, are under- 
stood as such. Instead of being practically accidental, 
they are necessary, and as such give exercise to the 
reasoning faculties. While language familiarizes with 
non-rational relations, science familiarizes with rational 
relations. While the one exercises memory only, the 
other exercises both memory and understanding. 

It is Best for the Judgment. — Observe next, that a 
great superiority of science over language as a means 
of discipline is, that it cultivates the judgment. As, in 
a lecture on mental education delivered at the Royal 
Institution, Professor Faraday well remarks, the most 
common intellectual fault is deficiency of judgment. 
He contends that " society, speaking generally, is not 
only ignorant as respects education of the judgment, 
but it is also ignorant of its ignorance." And the cause 
to which he ascribes this state is want of scientific cul- 
ture. The truth of his conclusion is obvious. Correct 
judgment with regard to all surrounding things, events, 
and consequences, becomes possible only through 
knowledge of the way in which surrounding phenom- 
ena depend on each other. No extent of acquaintance 
with the meanings of words can give the power of 
forming correct inferences respecting causes and effects. 
The constant habit of drawing conclusions from data, 
and then of verifying those conclusions by observation 
and experiment, can alone give the power of judging 
correctly. And that it necessitates this habit is one of 
the immense advantages of science. 

And for Moral Discipline. — Not only, however, for 
intellectual discipline is science the best ; but also for 
moral discipline. The learning of languages tends, if 
anything, further to increase the already undue respect 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth ? 6$ 

for authority. Such and such are the meanings of these 
words, says the teacher or the dictionary. So and so 
is the rule in this case, says the grammar. By the pupil 
these dicta are received as unquestionable. His con- 
stant attitude of mind is that of submission to dogmatic 
teaching. And a necessary result is a tendency to 
accept without inquiry whatever is established. Quite 
opposite is the attitude of mind generated by the culti- 
vation of science. By science, constant appeal is made 
to individual reason. Its truths are not accepted upon 
authority alone ; but all are at liberty to test them — ■ 
nay, in many cases, the pupil is required to think out 
his own conclusions. Every step in a scientific investi- 
gation is submitted to his judgment. He is not asked 
to admit it without seeing it to be true. And the trust 
in his own powers thus produced is further increased 
by the constancy with which Nature justifies his con- 
clusions when they are correctly drawn. From all 
which there flows that independence which is a most 
valuable element in character. Nor is this the only 
moral benefit bequeathed by scientific culture. When 
carried on, as it should always be, as much as possible 
under the form of independent research, it exercises 
perseverance and sincerity. As says Professor Tyndall 
of inductive inquiry, " it requires patient industry, and 
an humble and conscientious acceptance of what Nature 
reveals. The first condition of success is an honest 
receptivity and a willingness to abandon all precon- 
ceived notions, however cherished, if they be found to 
contradict the truth. Believe me, a self-renunciation 
which has something noble in it, and of which the 
world never hears, is often enacted in the private ex- 
perience of the true votary of science." 

And for Religious Culture. — Lastly, we have to assert 
— and the assertion will, we doubt not, cause extreme 



6 4 



Education. 



surprise — that the discipline of science is superior to 
that of our ordinary education, because of the religious 
culture that it gives. Of course we do not here use the 
words scientific and religious in their ordinary limited 
acceptations, but in their widest and highest accepta- 
tions. Doubtless to the superstitions that pass under 
the name of religion science is antagonistic, but not to 
the essential religion which these superstitions merely 
hide. Doubtless, too, in much of the science that is 
current there is a pervading spirit of irreligion, but 
not in that true science which has passed beyond the 
superficial into the profound. 

"True science and true religion," says Professor Huxley at the 
close of a recent course of lectures, "are twin-sisters, and the separa- 
tion of either from the other is sure to prove the death of both. 
Science prospers exactly in proportion as it is religious, and religion 
flourishes in exact proportion to the scientific depth and firmness of its 
basis. The great deeds of philosophers have been less the fruit of 
their intellect than of the direction of that intellect by an eminently 
religious tone of mind. Truth has yielded herself rather to their 
patience, their love, their single-heartedness, and their self-denial, than 
to their logical acumen." 

Science not Irreligious, — So far from science being 
irreligious, as many think, it is the neglect of science 
that is irreligious — it is the refusal to study the sur- 
rounding creation that is irreligious. Take a humble 
simile. Suppose a writer were daily saluted with praises 
couched in superlative language. Suppose the wisdom, 
the grandeur, the beauty of his works, were the con- 
stant topics of the eulogies addressed to him. Suppose 
those who unceasingly uttered these eulogies on his 
works were- content with looking at the outsides of 
them, and had never opened them, much less tried to 
understand them. What value should we put upon 
their praises ? What should we think of their sincerity ? 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 65 

Yet, comparing small things to great, such is the con- 
duct of mankind in general in reference to the Universe 
and its Cause. Nay, it is worse. Not only do they 
pass by without study these things which they daily 
proclaim to be so wonderful, but very frequently they 
condemn as mere trifiers those who give time to the 
observation of Nature — they actually scorn those who 
show any active interest in these marvels. We repeat, 
then, that not science, but the neglect of science, is 
irreligious. Devotion to science is a tacit worship — a 
tacit recognition of worth in the things studied, and 
by implication in their Cause. It is not a mere lip- 
homage, but a homage expressed in actions; not a mere 
professed respect, but a respect proved by the sacrifice 
of time, thought, and labor. 

Why Religious. — Nor is it thus only that true science 
is essentially religious. It is religious, too, inasmuch 
as it generates a profound respect for, and an implicit 
faith in, those uniform laws which underlie all things. 
By accumulated experiences the man of science ac- 
quires a thorough belief in the unchanging relations of 
phenomena — in the invariable connection of cause and 
consequence, in the necessity of good or evil results. 
Instead of the rewards and punishments of traditional 
belief, which men vaguely hope they may gain or es- 
cape, spite of their disobedience, he finds that there 
are rewards and punishments in the ordained constitu- 
tion of things, and that the evil results of disobedience 
are inevitable. He sees that the laws to which we must 
submit are not only inexorable, but beneficent. He sees 
that in virtue of these laws the process of things is 
ever towards a greater perfection and a higher happi- 
ness. Hence he is led constantly to insist on these 
laws, and is indignant when men disregard them. And 
thus does he, by asserting the eternal principles of 



66 Education. 

things and the necessity of conforming to them, prove 
himself intrinsically religious. 

Shows us an Universal Power. — To all which add the 
further religious aspect of science, that it alone can 
give us true conceptions of ourselves and our relation 
to the mysteries of existence. At the same time that it 
shows us all which can be known, it shows us the limits 
beyond which we can know nothing. Not by dogmatic 
assertion does it teach the impossibility of compre- 
hending the ultimate cause of things, but it leads us 
clearly to recognize this impossibility by bringing us in 
every direction to boundaries we cannot cross. It real- 
izes to us in away which nothing else can, the littleness 
of human intelligence in the face of that which tran- 
scends human intelligence. While towards the tradi- 
tions and authorities of men its attitude may be proud, 
before the impenetrable veil which hides the Absolute 
its attitude is humble — a true pride and a true humility. 
Only the sincere man of science (and by this title we 
do not mean the mere calculator of distances or an- 
alyzer of compounds or labeller of species, but him 
who through lower truths seeks higher, and eventually 
the highest) — only the genuine man of science, we say, 
can truly know how utterly beyond, not only human 
knowledge, but human conception, is the Universal 
Power of which Nature and Life and Thought are 
manifestations. 

We conclude, then, that for discipline as well as for 
guidance science is of chiefest value. In all its effects, 
learning the meanings of things is better than learning 
the meanings of words. Whether for intellectual, moral, 
or religious training, the study of surrounding phe- 
nomena is immensely superior to the study of gram- 
mars and lexicons. 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth? 67 

Science is the Knowledge of Most Worth. — Thus to the 
question with which we set out — What knowledge is of 
most worth? — the uniform reply is — Science. This is 
the verdict on all the counts. 

For direct self-preservation, or the maintenance of 
life and health, the all-important knowledge is — Science. 

For that indirect self-preservation which we call gain- 
ing a livelihood, the knowledge of greatest value is — 
Science. 

For the due discharge of parental functions, the 
proper guidance is to be found only in — Science. 

For that interpretation of national life, past and 
present, without which the citizen cannot rightly regu- 
late his conduct, the indispensable key is — Science. 

Alike for the most perfect production and highest en- 
joyment of art in all its forms, the needful preparation 
is still — Science. 

And for purposes of discipline — intellectual, moral, 
religious — the most efficient study is, once more — ■ 
Science. 

The Truths of Science Eternal — The question which 
at first seemed so perplexed has become, in the course 
of our inquiry, comparatively simple. We have not to 
estimate the degrees of importance of different orders 
of human activity, and different studies as severally 
fitting us for them, since we find that the study of 
Science, in its most comprehensive meaning, is the best 
preparation for all these orders of activity. We have 
not to decide betw r een the claims of knowledge of great 
though conventional value, and knowledge of less 
though intrinsic value, seeing that the knowledge 
which we find to be of most value in all other respects 
is intrinsically most valuable: its worth is not depend- 
ent upon opinion, but is as fixed as is the relation of 
man to the surrounding world. Necessary and eternal 



68 Education. 

as are its truths, all Science concerns all mankind for 
all time. Equally at present, and in the remotest fu- 
ture, must it be of incalculable importance for the reg- 
ulation of their conduct, that men should understand 
the science of life, physical, mental, and social; and 
that they should understand all other sciences as a key 
to the science of life. 

Yet they Receive Least Attention. — And yet the knowl- 
edge which is of such transcendent value is that which, 
in our age of boasted education, receives the least at- 
tention. While this which we call civilization could 
never have arisen had it not been for science, science 
forms scarcely an appreciable element in what men 
consider civilized training. Though to the progress of 
science we owe it that millions find support where once 
there was food only for thousands, yet of these millions 
but a few thousands pay any respect to that which has 
made their existence possible. Though this increasing 
knowledge of the properties and relations of things has 
not only enabled wandering tribes to grow into popu- 
lous nations, but has given to the countless members of 
those populous nations comforts and pleasures which 
their few naked ancestors never even conceived or could 
have believed, yet is this kind of knowledge only now 
receiving a grudging recognition in our highest educa- 
tional institutions. To the slowly growing acquaint- 
ance with the uniform coexistences and sequences of 
phenomena, to the establishment of invariable laws, we 
owe our emancipation from the grossest superstitions. 
But for science we should be still worshipping fetishes; 
or, with hecatombs of victims, propitiating diabolical 
deities. And yet this science, which, in place of the 
most degrading conceptions of things, has given us 
some insight into the grandeurs of creation, is written 



What Knowledge is of Most Worth 7 69 

against in our theologies and frowned upon from our 
pulpits. 

Science must Reign Supreme. — Paraphrasing an East- 
ern fable, we may say that in the family of knowledges, 
Science is the household drudge, who in obscurity 
hides unrecognized perfections. To her has been com- 
mitted all the work ; by her skill, intelligence, and de- 
votion have all the conveniences and gratifications been 
obtained ; and while ceaselessly occupied ministering 
to the rest, she has been kept in the background, that 
her haughty sisters might flaunt their fripperies in the 
eyes of the world. The parallel holds yet further. For 
we are fast coming to the denouement, when the positions 
will be changed ; and while these haughty sisters sink 
into merited neglect, Science, proclaimed as highest 
alike in worth and beauty, will reign supreme. 



7 o 



Education. 



CHAPTER II. 



INTELLECTUAL EDUCATION. 



Teaching has been Dogmatic. — There cannot fail to be 
a relationship between the successive systems of educa- 
tion and the successive social states with which they 
have coexisted. Having a common origin in the na- 
tional mind, the institutions of each epoch, whatever be 
their special functions, must have a family likeness. 
When men received their creed and its interpretations 
from an infallible authority deigning no explanations, 
it was natural that the teaching of children should be 
purely dogmatic. While "believe and ask no ques- 
tions" was the maxim of the Church, it was fitly the 
maxim of the school. Conversely, now that Protestant- 
ism has gained for adults a right of private judgment 
and established the practice of appealing to reason, 
there is harmony in the change that has made juvenile 
instruction a process of exposition addressed to the 
understanding. Along with political despotism, stern 
in its commands, ruling by force of terror, visiting 
trifling crimes with death, and implacable in its ven- 
geance on the disloyal, there necessarily grew up an 
academic discipline similarly harsh — a discipline of 
multiplied injunctions and blows for every breach of 
them — a discipline of unlimited autocracy upheld by 
rods and ferules and the black-hole. On the other 
hand, the increase of political liberty, the abolition of 
law restricting individual action, and the amelioration 
of the criminal code have been accompanied by a kin- 
dred progress towards non-coercive education: the pupil 



Intellectual Education. 71 

is hampered by fewer restraints, and other means than 
punishments are used to govern him. In those ascetic 
days when men, acting on the greatest misery principle, 
held that the more gratifications they denied themselves 
the more virtuous they were, they, as a matter of course, 
considered that the best education which most thwarted 
the wishes of their children, and cut short all spontane- 
ous activity with "You mustn't do so." While on the 
contrary, now that happiness is coming to be regarded 
as a legitimate aim — now that hours of labor are being 
shortened and popular recreations provided, parents 
and teachers are beginning to see that most childish 
desires may rightly be gratified, that childish sports 
should be encouraged, and that the tendencies of the 
growing mind are not altogether so diabolical as was 
supposed. 

Education must be a Natural Process — The age in 
which all thought that trades must be established by 
bounties and prohibitions, that manufacturers needed 
their materials and qualities and prices to be prescribed, 
and that the value of money could be determined by law, 
was an age which unavoidably cherished the notions that 
a child's mind could be made to order, that its powers 
were to be imparted by the schoolmaster, that it was a 
receptacle into which knowledge was to be put and there 
built up after its teacher's ideal. In this free-trade era, 
however, when we are learning that there is much more 
self-regulation in things than was supposed; that labor, 
and commerce, and agriculture, and navigation can do 
better without management than with it ; that political 
governments, to be efficient, must grow up from within 
and not be imposed from without, — we are also begin- 
ning to see that there is a natural process of mental 
evolution which is not to be disturbed without injury ; 
that we may not force on the unfolding mind our arti- 



72 



Education. 



ficial forms; but that Psychology, also, discloses to us a 
law of supply and demand, to which, if we would not 
do harm, we must conform. Thus, alike in its oracular 
dogmatism, in its harsh discipline, in its multiplied re- 
strictions, in its professed ascetism, and in its faith in 
the devices of men, the old educational regime was akin 
to the social systems with which it was contemporane- 
ous ; and similarly, in the reverse of these characteris- 
tics our modern modes of culture correspond to our 
more liberal religious and political institutions. 

Education Demands the Free Working of the Mind. — 
But there remain further parallelisms to which we have 
not yet adverted : that, namely, between the processes 
by which these respective changes have been wrought 
out; and that between the several states of heteroge- 
neous opinion to which they have led. Some centuries 
ago there was uniformity of belief— religious, political, 
and educational. All men were Romanists, all were 
Monarchists, all were disciples of Aristotle, and no one 
thought of calling in question that grammar-school 
routine under which all were brought up. The same 
agency has in each case replaced this uniformity by a 
constantly increasing diversity. That tendency towards 
assertion of the individuality, which, after contributing 
to produce the great Protestant movement has since 
gone on to produce an ever-increasing number of sects ; 
that tendency which initiated political parties, and out 
of the two primary ones has in these modern days 
evolved a multiplicity to which every year adds ; that 
tendency which led to the Baconian rebellion against 
the schools, and has since originated here and abroad 
sundry hew systems of thought — is a tendency which 
in education also has caused division and the accumu- 
lation of methods. As external consequences of the 
same internal change, these processes have necessarily 



Intellectual Education. 73 

been more or less simultaneous. The decline of au- 
thority, whether papal, philosophic, kingly, or tutorial, 
is essentially one phenomenon ; in each of its aspects a 
leaning towards free action is seen alike in the working 
out of the change itself, and in the new forms of theory 
and practice to which the change has given birth. 

The Transition Stage of Thought. — While many will 
regret this multiplication of schemes of juvenile cul- 
ture, the catholic observer will discern in it a means of 
ensuring the final establishment of a rational system. 
Whatever may be thought of theological dissent, it is 
clear that dissent in education results in facilitating in- 
quiry by the division in labor. Were we in possession 
of the true method, divergence from it would, of 
course, be prejudicial ; but the true method having to 
be found, the efforts of numerous independent seekers 
carrying out their researches in different directions, 
constitute a better agency for finding it than any that 
could be devised. Each of them struck by some new 
thought which probably contains more or less of basis 
in facts ; each of them zealous on behalf of his plan, 
fertile in expedients to test its correctness, and untiring 
in his efforts to make known its success ; each of them 
merciless in his criticism on the rest — there cannot 
fail, by composition of forces, to be a gradual approxi- 
mation of all towards the right course. Whatever por- 
tion of the normal method any one of them has dis- 
covered, must, by the constant exhibition of its results, 
force itself into adoption ; whatever wrong practices he 
has joined with it must by repeated experiment and 
failure be exploded. And by this aggregation of truths 
and elimination of errors there must eventually be de- 
veloped a correct and complete body of doctrine. Of 
the three phases through which human opinion passes 
— the unanimity of the ignorant, the disagreement of 



74 



Education. 



the inquiring, and the unanimity of the wise — it is 
manifest that the second is the parent of the third. 
They are not sequences in time only: they are sequences 
in causation. However impatiently, therefore, we may 
witness the present conflict of educational systems, and 
however much we may regret its accompanying evils, 
we must recognize it as a transition stage, needful to 
be passed through, and beneficent in its ultimate effects. 

A Need of Examination into Prevailing Systems. — 
Meanwhile may we not advantageously take stock of 
our progress ? After fifty years of discussion, experi- 
ment, and comparison of results, may we not expect a 
few steps towards the goal to be already made good? 
Some old methods must by this time have fallen out of 
use, some new ones must have become established, and 
many others must be in process of general abandon- 
ment or adoption. Probably we may see in these various 
changes, when put side by side, similar characteristics 
— may find in them a common tendency ; and so, by in- 
ference, may get a clue to the direction in which expe- 
rience is leading us, and gather hints how we may 
achieve yet further improvements. Let us then, as a 
preliminary to a deeper consideration of the matter, 
glance at the leading contrasts between the education 
of the past and of the present. 

The Forcing System. — The suppression of every error 
is commonly followed by a temporary ascendency of 
the contrary one; and it so happened that after the 
ages when physical development alone was aimed at 
there came an age when culture of the mind was the 
sole solicitude — when children had lesson-books put be- 
fore them at between two and three years old, when 
school-hours were protracted, and the getting of knowl- 
edge was thought the one thing heedful. As, further, 
it usually happens, that after one of these reactions the 



Intellectual Education. 75 

next advance is achieved by co-ordinating the antago- 
nist errors, and perceiving that they are opposite sides 
of one truth, so we are now coming to the conviction 
that body and mind must both be cared for, and the 
whole being unfolded. The forcing system has been in 
great measure given up, and precocity is discouraged. 
People are beginning to see that the first requisite to 
success in life is to be a good animal. The best brain 
is found of little service if there be not enough vital 
energy to work it ; and hence to obtain the one by sac- 
rificing the source of the other is now considered a 
folly — a folly which the eventual failure of juvenile 
prodigies constantly illustrates. Thus we are discover- 
ing the wisdom of the saying, that one secret in educa- 
tion is " to know how wisely to lose time." 

The Rote-system falling into Discredit. — The once 
universal practice of learning by rote is daily falling 
more into discredit. All modern authorities condemn 
the old mechanical way of teaching the alphabet. The 
multiplication-table is now frequently taught ex- 
perimentally. In the acquirement of languages the 
grammar-school plan is being superseded by plans 
based on the spontaneous process followed by the child 
in gaining its mother-tongue. Describing the methods 
there used, the " Reports on the Training-school at 
Battersea " say: "The instruction in the whole pre- 
paratory course is chiefly oral, and is illustrated as 
much as possible by appeals to nature." And so 
throughout. The rote-system, like other systems of its 
age, made more of the forms and symbols than of the 
things symbolized. To repeat the words correctly was 
everything ; to understand their meaning nothing: and 
thus the spirit was sacrificed to the letter. It is at 
length perceived that in this case, as in others, such a 
result is not accidental, but necessary; that in propor- 



16 



Education. 



tion as there is attention to the signs there must be in- 
attention to the things signified ; or that, as Montaigne 
long ago said, Scavoir par cceur rt est pas sgavoir. 

Rule-teaching is Declining. — Along with rote-teach- 
ing is declining also the nearly allied teaching by rules. 
The particulars first, and then the generalization, in the 
new method — a method, as the Battersea School Re- 
ports remark, which, though " the reverse of the method 
usually followed, which consists in giving the pupil the 
rule first," is yet proved by experience to be the right 
one. Rule-teaching is now condemned as imparting a 
merely empirical knowledge — as producing an appear- 
ance of understanding without the reality. To give the 
net product of inquiry, without the inquiry that leads 
to it, is found to be both enervating and inefficient. 
General truths to be of due and permanent use must 
be earned. " Easy come easy go," is a saying as ap- 
plicable to knowledge as to wealth. While rules lying 
isolated in the mind — not joined to its other contents 
as outgrowths from them — are continually forgotten, 
the principles which those rules express piecemeal be- 
come, when once reached by the understanding, endur- 
ing possessions. While the rule-taught youth is at sea 
when beyond his rules, the youth instructed in princi- 
ples solves a new case as readily as an old one. Between 
a mind of rules and a mind of principles there exists a 
difference such as that between a confused heap of 
materials and the same materials organized into a com- 
plete whole, with all its parts bound together. Of 
which types this last has not only the advantage that 
its constituent parts are better retained, but the much 
greater advantage, that it forms an efficient agent for 
inquiry, for independent thought, for discovery — ends 
for which the first is useless. Nor let it be supposed 
that this is a simile only : it is the literal truth. The 



Intellectual Education. 77 

union of facts into generalizations is the organization 
of knowledge, whether considered as an objective 
phenomenon or a subjective one : and the mental grasp 
may be measured by the extent to which this organiza- 
tion is carried. 

The Study of Grammar is Placed Later. — From the 
substitution of principles for rules, and the necessarily 
co-ordinate practice of leaving abstractions untaught 
until the mind has been familiarized with the facts 
from which they are subtracted, has resulted the post- 
ponement of some once early studies to a late period. 
This is exemplified in the abandonment of that in- 
tensely stupid custom, the teaching of grammar to 
children. As M. Marcel says : "It may without hesita- 
tion be affirmed that grammar is not the stepping- 
stone, but the finishing instrument." As Mr. Wyse 
argues : " Grammar and Syntax are a collection of 
law and rules. Rules are gathered from practice ; they 
are the results of induction to which we come by long 
observation and comparison of facts. It is, in fine, the 
science, the philosophy, of language. In following 
the process of nature, neither individuals nor nations 
ever arrive at the science first. A language is spoken, 
and poetry written, many years before either a gram- 
mar or prosody is even thought of. Men did not wait 
until Aristotle had constructed his logic, to reason. In 
short, as grammar was made after language, so ought it 
to be taught after language, an inference which all who 
recognize the relationship between the evolution of the 
race and of the individual will see to be unavoidable." 

Observation Cultivated. — Of new practices that have 
grown up during the decline of these old ones, the 
most important is the systematic culture of the powers 
of observation. After long ages of blindness men are at 
last seeing that the spontaneous activity of the observ- 



78 Education. 

ing faculties in children has a meaning and a use. 
What was once thought mere purposeless action or 
play or mischief, as the case might be,, is now rec- 
ognized as the process of acquiring a knowledge on 
which all after-knowledge is based. Hence the well- 
conceived but ill-conducted system of object-lessons. The 
saying of Bacon, that physics is the mother of sciences, 
has come to have a meaning in education. Without 
an accurate acquaintance with the visible and tangible 
properties of things, our conceptions must be er- 
roneous, our inferences fallacious, and our operations 
unsuccessful. " The education of the senses neglected, 
all after-education partakes of a drowsiness, a haziness, 
an insufficiency, which it is impossible to cure." Indeed, 
if we consider it, we shall find that exhaustive observa- 
tion is an element in all great success. It is not to 
artists, naturalists, and men of science only that it is 
needful ; it is not only that the skilful physician de- 
pends on it for the correctness of his diagnosis, and 
that to the good engineer it is so important that some 
years in the workshop are prescribed for him ; — but we 
may see that the philosopher also is fundamentally one 
who observes relationships of things which others had 
overlooked, and that the poet, too, is one who sees the 
fine facts in nature which all recognize when pointed 
out, but did not before remark. Nothing requires more 
to be insisted on than that vivid and complete impres- 
sions are all essential. No sound fabric of wisdom can 
be woven out of raw material. 

The Study of the Concrete Encouraged. — While the 
old method of presenting truths in the abstract has 
been falling out of use, there has been a corresponding 
adoption of the new method of presenting them in the 
concrete. The rudimentary facts of exact science are 
now being learnt by direct intuition, as textures and 



Intellectual Education. 79 

tastes and colors are learnt. Employing the ball-frame 
for first lessons in arithmetic exemplifies this. It is well 
illustrated, too, in Professor De Morgan's mode of ex- 
plaining the decimal notation. M. Marcel, rightly re- 
pudiating the old system of tables, teaches weights and 
measures by referring to the actual yard and foot, 
pound and ounce, gallon and quart ; and lets the dis- 
covery of their relationships be experimental. The use 
of geographical models and models of the regular bod- 
ies, etc., as introductory to geography and geometry 
respectively, are facts of the same class. Manifestly a 
common trait of these methods is that they carry each 
child's mind through a process like that which the mind 
of humanity at large has gone through. The truths 
of number, of form, of relationship in position, were 
all originally drawn from objects ; and to present 
these truths to the child in the concrete is to let him 
learn them as the race learnt them. By and by, per- 
haps, it will be seen that he cannot possibly learn them 
in any other way ; for that if he is made to repeat them 
as abstractions, the abstractions can have no meaning 
for him until he finds that they are simply statements 
of what he intuitively discerns. 

Instruction Made Pleasurable. — But of all the changes 
taking place, the most significant is the growing desire 
to make the acquirement of knowledge pleasurable 
rather than painful — a desire based on the more or less 
distinct perception that at each age the intellectual ac- 
tion which a child likes is a healthful one for it ; and 
conversely. There is a spreading opinion that the rise 
of an appetite for any kind of knowledge implies that 
the unfolding mind has become fit to assimilate it, and 
needs it for the purposes of growth ; and that, on the 
other hand, the disgust felt towards any kind of knowl- 
edge is a sign either that it is prematurely presented, or 



So 



Education. 



that it is presented in an indigestible form. Hence the 
efforts to make early education amusing, and all educa- 
tion interesting. Hence the lectures on the value of 
play. Hence the defence of nursery rhymes and fairy 
tales. Daily we more and more conform our plans to 
juvenile opinion. Does the child like this or that kind 
of teaching? does he take to it? we constantly ask. 
" His natural desire of variety should be indulged," 
says M. Marcel ; " and the gratification of his curiosity 
should be combined with his improvement." " Lessons," 
he again remarks, " should cease before the child evinces 
symptoms of weariness." And so with later education. 
Short breaks during school-hours, excursions into the 
country, amusing lectures, choral songs — in these and 
many like traits the change may be discerned. Asceti- 
cism is disappearing out of education as out of life ; 
and the usual test of political legislation — its tendency 
to promote happiness — is beginning to be, in a great 
degree, the test of legislation for the school and the 
nursery. 

Nature is Followed. — What now is the common char- 
acteristic of these several changes ? Is it not an increas- 
ing conformity to the methods of nature ? The relinq- 
uishment of early forcing, against which nature ever 
rebels, and the leaving of the first years for exercise of 
the limbs and senses, show this. The superseding of 
rote-learnt lessons by lessons orally and experimentally 
given, like those of the field and play-ground, shows 
this. The disuse of rule-teaching, and the adoption of 
teaching by principles — that is, the leaving of general- 
ization until there are particulars to base them on — 
show this. The system of object-lessons shows this. 
The teaching of the rudiments of science in the con- 
crete instead of the abstract shows this. And above 
all, this tendency is shown in the variously directed 



Intellectual Education. 81 

efforts to present knowledge in attractive forms, and so 
to make the acquirement of it pleasurable. For as it is 
the order of nature in all creatures that the gratifica- 
tion accompanying the fulfilment of needful functions 
serves as a stimulus to their fulfilment, — as during the 
self-education of the young child the delight taken in 
the biting of corals and the pulling to pieces of toys 
becomes the prompter to actions which teach it the 
properties of matter, — it follows that, in choosing the 
succession of subjects and the modes of instruction 
which most interest the pupil, we are fulfilling nature's 
behests, and adjusting our proceedings to the laws of 
life. 

Education must be Conformed to Mental Evolution.— 
Thus, then, we are on the highway towards the doctrine 
long ago enunciated by Pestalozzi, that alike in its 
order and its methods education must conform to the 
natural process of mental evolution; that there is a 
certain sequence in which the faculties spontaneously 
develop, and a certain kind of knowledge which each 
requires during its development ; and that it is for us 
to ascertain this sequence and supply this knowledge. 
All the improvements above alluded to are partial ap- 
plications of this general principle. A nebulous percep- 
tion of it now prevails among teachers, and it is daily 
more insisted on in educational works. " The method 
of nature is the archetype of all methods," says M. 
Marcel. " The vital principle in the pursuit is to enable 
the pupil rightly to instruct himself," writes Mr. Wyse. 
The more science familiarizes us with the constitution 
of things, the more do we see in them an inherent self- 
sufficingness. A higher knowledge tends continually to 
limit our interference with the processes of life. As in 
medicine the old " heroic treatment " has given place 
to mild treatment, and often no treatment save a 



82 



Education. 



normal regimen; as we have found that it is not needful 
to mould the bodies of babes by bandaging them in 
papoose fashion or otherwise ; as in jails it is being 
discovered that no cunningly-devised discipline of ours 
is so efficient in producing reformation as the natural 
discipline, the making prisoners maintain themselves by 
productive labor, — so in education we are finding that 
success is to be achieved only by rendering our measures 
subservient to that spontaneous unfolding which all 
minds go through in their progress to maturity. 

The Mode of Teaching Depends on the State of De- 
velopment. — Of course this fundamental principle of 
tuition, that the arrangement of matter and method 
must correspond with the order of evolution and mode 
of activity of the faculties — a principle so obviously 
true, that once stated it seems almost self-evident — has 
never been wholly disregarded. Teachers have un- 
avoidably made their school-courses coincide with it in 
some degree, for the simple reason that education is pos- 
sible only on that condition. Boys were never taught 
the rule-of-three until after they had learnt addition. 
They were not set to write exercises before they had 
got into their copy-books. Conic sections have always 
been preceded by Euclid. But the error of the old 
methods consists in this, that they do not recognize in 
detail what they are obliged to recognize in the general. 
Yet the principle applies throughout. If from the time 
when a child is able to conceive two things as related 
in position, years must elapse before it can form a true 
concept of the earth, as a sphere made up of land and 
sea, covered with mountains, forests, rivers, and cities, 
revolving on its axis, and sweeping round the sun; if it 
gets from the one concept to the other by degrees; if 
the intermediate concepts Which it forms are consecu- 
tively larger and more complicated, — is it not manifest 



Intellectual Education. 83 

that there is a general succession through which only 
it can pass ; that each larger concept is made by the 
combination of smaller ones, and presupposes them ; 
and that to present any of these compound concepts 
before the child is in possession of its constituent ones, 
is only less absurd than to present the final concept of 
the series before the initial one? In the mastering of 
every subject some course of increasingly complex ideas 
has to be gone through. The evolution of the corre- 
sponding faculties consists in the assimilation of these, 
which in any true sense is impossible without they are 
put into mind in the normal order. And when this 
order is riot followed, the result is, that they are re- 
ceived with apathy or disgust; and that unless the 
pupil is intelligent enough to eventually fill up the 
gaps himself, they lie in his memory as dead facts, 
capable of being turned to little or no use. 

The Direction of Activity yet Dependent on Human 
Judgment. — " Why trouble ourselves about any curricu- 
lum at all?" it may be asked. " If it be true that the 
mind, like the body, has a predetermined course of 
evolution ; if it unfolds spontaneously; if its succes- 
sive desires for this or that kind of information arise 
when these are severally required for its nutrition; if 
there thus exists in itself a prompter to the right species 
of activity at the right time, — why interfere in any way ? 
Why not leave children wholly to the discipline of 
nature? why not remain quite passive, and let them 
get knowledge as, they best can ? why not be con- 
sistent throughout?" This is an awkward-looking 
question. Plausibly implying, as it does, that a system 
of complete laissez-faire is the logical outcome of the 
doctrines set forth, it seems to furnish a disproof of 
them by reductio ad absurdum. In truth, however, 
they do not, when rightly understood, commit us to 



8 4 



Education. 



any such untenable position. A glance at the physical 
analogies will clearly show this. It is a general law of 
all life that the more complex the organism to be pro- 
duced, the longer the period during which it is depend- 
ent on a parent organism for food and protection. 
The contrast between the minute, rapidly-formed, and 
self-moving spore of a conferva, and the slowly-de- 
veloped seed of a tree, with its multiplied envelopes 
and large stock of nutriment laid by to nourish the 
germ during its first stages of growth, illustrates this 
law in its application to the vegetable world. Among 
animal organisms we may trace it in a series of con- 
trasts from the monad whose spontaneously-divided 
halves are as self-sufficing the moment after their sepa- 
ration as was the original whole ; up to man, whose 
offspring not only passes through a protracted gesta- 
tion, and subsequently long depends on the breast for 
sustenance ; but after that must have its food artificially 
administered ; must, after it has learned to feed itself, 
continue to have bread, clothing, and shelter provided ; 
and does not acquire the power of complete self-support 
until a time varying from fifteen to twenty years after 
its birth. Now this law applies to the mind as to the 
body. For mental pabulum also, every higher creature, 
and especially man, is at first dependent on adult aid. 
Lacking the ability to move about, the babe is as power- 
less to get materials on which to exercise its percep- 
tions as it is to get supplies for its stomach. Unable 
to prepare its own food, it is in like manner unable to 
reduce many kinds of knowledge to a fit form for as- 
similation. The language through which all higher 
truths are to be gained it wholly derives from those 
surrounding it. And we see in such an example as the 
Wild Boy of Aveyron the arrest of development that 
results when no help is received from parents and 



Intellectual Education. 85 

nurses. Thus, in providing from day to day the right 
kind of facts, prepared in the right manner, and giving 
them in due abundance at appropriate intervals, there 
is as much scope for active ministration to a child's 
mind as to its body. In either case it is the chief func- 
tion of parents to see that the conditions requisite to 
growth are maintained. And as in supplying aliment 
and clothing and shelter they may fulfil this function 
without at all interfering with the spontaneous develop- 
ment of the limbs and viscera either in their order or 
mode, so they may supply sounds for imitation, ob- 
jects for examination, books for reading, problems for 
solution, and, if they use neither direct nor indirect 
coercion, may do this without in any way disturbing 
the normal process of mental evolution ; or rather, may 
greatly facilitate that process. Hence the admission 
of the doctrines enunciated does not, as some might 
argue, involve the abandonment of all teaching ; but 
leaves ample room for an active and elaborate course 
of culture. 

Teaching Demands Skill — Passing from generalities 
to special considerations it is to be remarked that in 
practice the Pestalozzian system seems scarcely to have 
fulfilled the promise of its theory. We hear of children 
not at all interested in its lessons — disgusted with them 
rather; and, so far as we can gather, the Pestalozzian 
schools have not turned out any unusual proportion of 
distinguished men — if even they have reached the aver- 
age. We are not surprised at this. The success of 
every appliance depends mainly upon the intelligence 
with which it is used. It is a trite remark, that, having 
the choicest tools, an unskilful artisan will botch his 
work ; and bad teachers will fail even with the best 
methods. Indeed, the goodness of the method becomes 
in such case a cause of failure ; as, to continue the 



86 



Education. 



simile, the perfection of the tool becomes in undisci- 
plined hands a source of imperfection in results. A 
simple unchanging, almost mechanical routine of tuition 
may be carried out by the commonest intellects, with 
such small beneficial effect as it is capable of producing; 
but a complete system, — a system as heterogeneous in 
its appliances as the mind in its faculties, — a system 
proposing a special means for each special end, de- 
mands for its right employment powers such as few 
teachers possess. The mistress of a dame-school can 
hear spelling-lessons ; any hedge-schoolmaster can drill 
boys in the multiplication-table ; but to teach spelling 
rightly by using the powers of the letters instead of 
their names, or to instruct in numerical combinations by 
experimental synthesis, a modicum of understanding is 
needful : and to pursue a like rational course through- 
out the entire ranges of studies asks an amount of 
judgment, of invention, of intellectual sympathy, of 
analytical faculty, which we shall never see applied to 
it while the tutorial office is held in such small esteem. 
The true education is practicable only to the true phi- 
losopher. Judge, then, what prospect a philosophical 
method now has of being acted out ! Knowing so little 
as we yet do of Pyschology, and ignorant as our 
teachers are of that little, what chance has a system 
which requires Psychology for its basis? 

Pestalozzi Right in Theory. — Further hindrance and 
discouragement has arisen from confounding the Pes- 
talozzian principle with the forms in which it has been 
embodied. Because particular plans have not answered 
expectations, discredit has been cast upon the doctrine 
associated with them, no inquiry being made whether 
these plans truly conform to such doctrine. Judging as 
usual by the concrete rather than the abstract, men 
have blamed the theory for the bunglings of the prac- 



Intellectual Education. 87 

tice. It is as though Papin's futile attempt to construct 
a steam-engine had been held to prove that steam could 
not be used as a motive power. Let it be constantly- 
borne in mind that while right in his fundamental ideas 
Pestalozzi was not therefore right in all his applications 
of them ; and we believe the fact to be that he was 
often wrong. As described even by his admirers, Pes- 
talozzi was a man of partial intuitions, a man who had 
occasional flashes of insight, rather than a man of sys- 
tematic thought. His first great success at Stantz was 
achieved when he had no books or appliances of ordi- 
nary teaching, and when " the only object of his atten- 
tion was to find out at each moment what instruction 
his children stood particularly in need of, and what was 
the best manner of connecting it with the knowledge 
they already possessed." Much of his power was due, 
not to calmly reasoned-out plans of culture, but to his 
profound sympathy, which gave him an instinctive per- 
ception of childish needs and difficulties. He lacked 
the ability logically to co-ordinate and develop the 
truths which he thus from time to time laid hold of ; 
and had in great measure to leave this to his assistants, 
Kruesi, Tobler, Buss, Niederer, and Schmid. The 
result is that in their details his own plans, and those 
vicariously devised, contain numerous crudities and 
inconsistencies. His nursery-method, described in 
"The Mother's Manual," beginning as it does with a 
nomenclature of the different parts of the body, and 
proceeding next to specify their relative positions, and 
next their connections, may be proved not at all in 
accordance with the initial stages of mental evolution. 
His process of teaching the mother-tongue by formal 
exercises in the meanings of words and in the construc- 
tion of sentences, is quite needless, and must entail on 
the pupil loss of time, labor, and happiness. His pro- 



88 



Education. 



posed mode of teaching geography is utterly unpesta- 
lozzian. And often where his plans are essentially 
sound they are either incomplete or vitiated by some 
remnant of the old regime. While, therefore, we would 
defend in its entire extent the general doctrine which 
Pestalozzi inaugurated, we think great evil likely to 
result from an uncritical reception of his specific devices. 
That tendency which mankind constantly exhibit to 
canonize the forms and practices along with which any 
great truth has been bequeathed to them, their liabil- 
ity to prostrate their intellects before the prophet and 
swear by his every word, their proneness to mistake 
the clothing of the idea for the idea itself, renders it 
needful to insist strongly upon the distinction between 
the fundamental principle of the Pestalozzian system 
and the set of expedients devised for its practice, and 
to suggest that while the one may be considered as 
established, the other is probably nothing but an adum- 
bration of the normal course. Indeed, on looking at 
the state of our knowledge we may be quite sure that 
this is the case. 

How Obtain Right Methods. — Before our educational 
methods can be made to harmonize in character and 
arrangement with the faculties in their mode and order 
of unfolding, it is first needful that we ascertain with 
some completeness how the faculties do unfold. At 
present our knowledge of the matter extends only to a 
few general notions. These general notions must be 
developed in detail, must be transformed into a multi- 
tude of specific propositions, before we can be said to 
possess that science on which the art of education must 
be based. And then when we have definitely made out 
in what succession and in what combinations the men- 
tal powers become active, it remains to choose out of the 
many possible ways of exercising each of them that 



Intellectual Education. 89 

which best conforms to its natural mode of action. 
Evidently, therefore, it is not to be supposed that even 
our most advanced modes of teaching are the right 
ones, or nearly the right ones. 

There must be Guiding Principles. — Bearing in mind, 
then, this distinction between the principle and the 
practice of Pestalozzi, and inferring from the grounds 
assigned that the last must necessarily be very defective, 
the reader will rate at its true worth the dissatisfaction 
with the system which some have expressed, and will 
see that the due realization of the Pestalozzian idea re- 
mains to be achieved. Should he argue, however, from 
what has just been said that no such realization is at 
present practicable, and that all effort ought to be de- 
voted to the preliminary inquiry, we reply, that though 
it is not possible for a scheme of culture to be perfected 
either in matter or form until a rational Psychology has 
been established, it is possible, with the aid of certain 
guiding principles, to make empirical approximations 
towards a perfect scheme. To prepare the way for 
further research we will now specify these principles. 
Some of them have already been more or less distinctly 
implied in the foregoing pages, but it will be well here 
to state them all in logical order. 

(1) From the Simple to the Complex That in educa- 
tion we should proceed from the simple to the complex 
is a truth which has always been to some extent acted 
upon ; not professedly, indeed, nor by any means con- 
sistently. The mind grows. Like all things that grow, 
it progresses from the homogeneous to the heterogene- 
ous ; and a normal training-system being an objective 
counterpart of this subjective process, must exhibit the 
like progression. Moreover, regarding it from this 
point of view, we may see that this formula has much 
wider applications than at first appears. For its ratio- 



9 o 



Education. 



nale involves not only that we should proceed from the 
single to the combined in the teaching of each branch 
of knowledge, but that we should do the like with 
knowledge as a whole. As the mind, consisting at first 
of but few active faculties, has its later-completed facul- 
ties successively awakened, and ultimately comes to 
have all its faculties in simultaneous action, it follows 
that our teaching should begin with but few subjects at 
once, and successively adding to these, should finally 
carry on all subjects abreast — that not only in its de- 
tails should education proceed from the simple to the 
complex, but in its ensemble also. 

(2) From the Concrete to the Abstract. — To say that our 
lessons ought to start from the concrete and end in the 
abstract, may be considered as in part a repetition of 
the foregoing. Nevertheless it is a maxim that needs to 
be stated, if with no other view than with the view of 
showing in certain cases what are truly the simple and 
the complex. For unfortunately there has been much 
misunderstanding on this point. General formulas 
which men have devised to express groups of details, 
and which have severally simplified their conceptions by 
uniting many facts into one fact, they have supposed 
must simplify the conceptions of the child also; quite 
forgetting that a generalization is simple only in com- 
parison with the whole mass of particular truths it 
comprehends, that it is more complex than any one of 
these truths taken singly, that only after many of these 
single truths have been acquired does the generalization 
ease the memory and help the reason, and that to the 
child not possessing these single truths it is necessarily 
a mystery. Thus confounding two kinds of simplifica- 
tion, teachers have constantly erred by setting out with 
"first principles : " a proceeding essentially, though not 
apparently, at variance with the primary rule, which 



Intellectual Education. 91 

implies that the mind should be introduced to princi- 
ples through the medium of examples, and so should 
be led from the particular to the general, from the 
concrete to the abstract. 

(3) Historical Evolution and Individual Evolution. — 
The education of the child must accord in both mode 
and arrangement with the education of mankind as con- 
sidered historically ; or in other words, the genesis of 
knowledge in the individual must follow the same 
course as the genesis of knowledge in the race. To M. 
Comte we believe society owes the enunciation of this 
doctrine — a doctrine which we may accept without 
committing ourselves to his theory of the genesis of 
knowledge either in its causes or its order. In support 
of this doctrine two reasons may be assigned, either of 
them sufficient to establish it. One is deducible from 
the law of hereditary transmission as considered in its 
wider consequences. For if it be true that men exhibit 
likeness to ancestry both in aspect and character ; if it 
be true that certain mental manifestations, as insanity, 
will occur in successive members of the same family at 
the same age ; if, passing from individual cases in 
which the traits of many dead ancestors mixing with 
those of a few living ones greatly obscure the law, we 
turn to national types, and remark how the contrasts 
between them are persistent from age to age ; if we re- 
member that these respective types came from a com- 
mon stock, and that hence the present marked differ- 
ences between them must have arisen from the action 
of modifying circumstances upon successive genera- 
tions, who severally transmitted the accumulated effects 
to their descendants, if we find the differences to be 
now organic, so that the French child grows into a 
French man even when brought up among strangers ; 
and if the general fact thus illustrated is true of the 



3 * 7SU 



92 Education. 

whole nature, intellect inclusive, — then it follows that if 
there be an order in which the human race has mas- 
tered its various kinds of knowledge there will arise in 
every child an aptitude to acquire these kinds of knowl- 
edge in the same order. So that even were the order 
intrinsically indifferent, it would facilitate education to 
lead the individual mind through the steps traversed 
by the general mind. But the order is not intrinsically 
indifferent ; and hence the fundamental reason why ed- 
ucation should be a repetition of civilization in little. It 
is alike provable that the historical sequence was, in its 
main outlines, a necessary one, and that the causes 
which determined it apply to the child as to the race. 
Not to specify these causes in detail, it will suffice here 
to point out that as the mind of humanity placed in the 
midst of phenomena and striving to comprehend them 
has, after endless comparisons, speculations, experi- 
ments, and theories, reached its present knowledge of 
each subject by a specific route, it may rationally be 
inferred that the relationship between mind and phe- 
nomena is such as to prevent this knowledge from be- 
ing reached by any other route; and that as each child's 
mind stands in this same relationship to phenomena, 
they can be accessible to it only through the same 
route. Hence in deciding upon the right method of 
education, an inquiry into the method of civilization 
will help to guide us. 

(4) From the Empirical to the Rational. — One of the 
conclusions to which such an inquiry leads is, that in 
each branch of instruction we should proceed from the 
empirical to the rational. A leading fact in human 
progress is, that every science is evolved out of its cor- 
responding art. It results from the necessity we are 
under, both individually and as a race, of reaching the 
abstract by way of the concrete, that there must be 



Intellectual Education. 93 

practice and an accruing experience with its empirical 
generalizations, before there can be science. Science 
is organized knowledge ; and before knowledge can be 
organized, some of it must first be possessed. Every 
study, therefore, should have a purely experimental in- 
troduction ; and only after an ample fund of observa- 
tions has been accumulated, should reasoning begin. 
As illustrative applications of this rule, we may instance 
the modern course of placing grammar, not before lan- 
guage, but after it; or the ordinary custom of prefacing 
perspective by practical drawing. By and by further 
applications of it will be indicated. 

(5) Encourage Self-teaching.— A second corollary 
from the foregoing general principle, and one which 
cannot be too strenuously insisted upon, is, that in edu- 
cation the process of self-development should be en- 
couraged to the fullest extent. Children should be led 
to make their own investigations, and to draw their own 
inferences. They should be told as little as possible, 
and induced to discover as much as possible. Humanity 
has progressed solely by self-instruction ; and that to 
achieve the best results each mind must progress some- 
what after the same fashion, is continually proved by 
the marked success of self-made men. Those who have 
been brought up under the ordinary school-drill, and 
have carried away with them the idea that education is 
practicable only in that style, will think it hopeless to 
make children their own teachers. If, however, they 
will call to mind that the all-important knowledge of 
surrounding objects which a child gets in its early years 
is got without help ; if they will remember that the 
child is self-taught in the use of its mother-tongue ; if 
they vail estimate the amount of that experience of 
life, that out-of-school wisdom, which every boy gathers 
for himself ; if they will mark the unusual intelligence 



94 Education. 

of the uncared-for London gamin, as shown in all the 
directions in which his faculties have been tasked ; if, 
further, they will think how many minds have struggled 
up unaided, not only through the mysteries of our irra- 
tionally planned curriculum, but through hosts of other 
obstacles besides, they will find it a not unreasonable 
conclusion, that if the subject be put before him in 
right order and right form, any pupil of ordinary ca- 
pacity will surmount his successive difficulties with but 
little assistance. Who indeed can watch the ceaseless 
observation and inquiry and inference going on in a 
child's mind, or listen to its acute remarks on matters 
within the range of its faculties, without perceiving 
that these powers which it manifests, if brought to 
bear systematically upon any studies within the same 
range, would readily master them without help? 

The Effect of Stupid Teaching. — This need for per-i 
petual telling is the result of our stupidity, not of the 
child's. We drag it away from the facts in which it is 
interested, and which it is actively assimilating of itself; 
we put before it facts far too complex for it to under- 
stand, and therefore distasteful to it ; finding that it 
will not voluntarily acquire these facts, we thrust them 
into its mind by force of threats and punishment ; by 
thus denying the knowledge it craves, and cramming it 
with knowledge it cannot digest, we produce a morbid 
state of its faculties, and a consequent disgust for 
knowledge in general ; and when, as a result partly of 
the stolid indolence we have brought on, and partly of 
still continued unfitness in its studies, the child can 
understand nothing without explanation, and. becomes 
a mere passive recipient of our instruction, we infer 
that education must necessarily be carried on thus. 
Having by our method induced helplessness, we 
straightway make the helplessness a reason for our 



Intellectual Education. 95 

method. Clearly, then, the experience of pedagogues 
cannot rationally be quoted against the doctrine we are 
defending. And whoever sees this will see that we may 
safely follow the method of nature throughout — may, 
by a skilful ministration, make the mind as self-develop- ■ 
ing in its later stages as it is in its earlier ones ; and 
that only by doing this can we produce the highest 
power and activity. 

(6) Right Education is Pleasurable — As a final test 
by which to judge any plan of culture should come the 
question, Does it create a pleasurable excitement in 1 : 
the pupils ? When in doubt whether a particular mode 
or arrangement is or is not more in harmony with the 
foregoing principles than some other, we may safely 
abide by this criterion. Even when, as considered 
theoretically, the proposed course seems the best, yet if 
it produce no interest, or less interest than another 
course, we should relinquish it ; for a child's intellec- 
tual instincts are more trustworthy than our reasonings. 
In respect to the knowing faculties, we may confidently 
trust in the general law, that under normal conditions 
healthful action is pleasurable, while action which gives 
pain is not healthful. Though at present very incom- 
pletely conformed to by the emotional nature, yet by 
the intellectual nature, or at least by those parts of it 
which the child exhibits, this law is almost wholly con- 
formed to. The repugnances to this and that study 
which vex the ordinary teacher, are not innate, but 
result from his unwise system. Fellenberg says, " Ex- 
perience has taught me that indolence in young persons 
is so directly opposite to their natural disposition to 
activity, that unless it is the consequence of bad edu- 
cation, it is almost invariably connected with some con- 
stitutional defect." And the spontaneous activity to 
which children are thus prone is simply the pursuit cf 



9 6 



Education. 



those pleasures which the healthful exercise of the 
faculties gives. It is true that some of the higher men- 
tal powers as yet but little developed in the race, and 
congenitally possessed in any considerable degree only 
by the most advanced, are indisposed to the amount of 
exertion required of them. But these, in virtue of their 
very complexity, will, in a normal course of culture, 
come last into exercise, and will therefore have no de- 
mands made upon them until the pupil has arrived at 
an age when ulterior motives can be brought into play, 
and an indirect pleasure made to counterbalance a 
direct displeasure. With all faculties lower than these, 
however, the direct gratification consequent on activity 
is the normal stimulus ; and under good management 
the only needful stimulus. When we are obliged to fall 
back on some other, we must take the fact as evidence 
that we are on the wrong track. Experience is daily 
showing with greater clearness that there is always a 
method to be found productive of interest — even of 
delight ; and it ever turns out that this is the method 
proved by all other tests to be the right one. 

With most, these guiding principles will weigh but 
little if left in this abstract form. Partly, therefore, to 
exemplify their application, and partly with a view of 
making sundry specific suggestions, we propose now to 
pass from the theory of education to the practice of it. 

Begin Education in the Cradle. — It was the opinion 
of Pestalozzi — an opinion which has ever since his day 
been gaining ground — that education of some kind 
should begin from the cradle. Whoever has watched 
with any discernment the wide-eyed gaze of the infant 
at surrounding objects, knows very well that education 
does begin thus early, whether we intend it or not : and 
that these fingerings and suckings of everything it can 
lay hold of, these open-mouthed listenings to every 



Intellectual Education. 97 

sound, are the first steps in the series which ends in the 
discovery of unseen planets, the invention of calculating 
engines, the production of great paintings, or the com- 
position of symphonies and operas. This activity of 
the faculties from the very first being spontaneous and 
inevitable, the question is whether we shall supply in 
due variety the materials on which they may exercise 
themselves ; and to the question so put, none but an 
affirmative answer can be given. As before said, how- 
ever, agreement with Pestalozzi's theory does not in- 
volve agreement with his practice ; and here occurs a 
case in point. Treating of instruction in spelling, he 
says : 

' ' The spelling-book ought, therefore, to contain all the sounds of 
the language, and these ought to be taught in every family from the 
earliest infancy. The child who learns his spelling-book ought to 
repeat them to the infant in the cradle, before it is able to pronounce 
even one of them, so that they may be deeply impressed upon its mind 
by frequent repetition." 

Joining this with the suggestion for "a nursery- 
method," as set down in his " Mother's Manual," in 
which he makes the names, positions, connections, num- 
bers, properties, and uses of the limbs and body his first 
lessons, it becomes clear that Pestalozzi's notions on 
early mental development were too crude to enable him 
to devise judicious planes. Let us inquire into the 
course which Psychology dictates. 

Provide Objects to Supply Impressions. — The earliest 
impressions which the mind can assimilate are those 
given to it by the undecomposable sensations — resist- 
ance, light, sound, etc. Manifestly decomposable states 
of consciousness cannot exist before the states of con- 
sciousness out of which they are composed. There can 
be no idea of form until some familiarity with light in 
its gradations and.qualities, or resistance in its different 




98 Education. 

intensities, has been acquired ; for, as has been long 
known, we recognize visible form by means of varieties 
of light, and tangible form by means of varieties of 
resistance. Similarly, no articulate sound is cognizable 
until the inarticulate sounds which go to make it up have 
been learned. And thus must it be in every other case. 
Following, therefore, the necessary law of progression 
from the simple to the complex, we should provide for 
the infant a sufficiency of objects presenting different 
degrees and kinds of resistance, a sufficiency of objects 
reflecting different amounts and qualities of light, and 
a sufficiency of sounds contrasted in their loudness, 
their pitch, and their timbre. How fully this a priori con- 
clusion is confirmed by infantile instincts all will see on 
being reminded of the delight which every young child 
has in biting its toys, in feeling its brother's bright 
jacket-buttons, and pulling papa's whiskers; how ab- 
sorbed it becomes in gazing at any gaudily painted ob- 
ject, to which it applies the word "pretty," when it can 
pronounce it, wholly in virtue of the bright colors; and 
how its face broadens into a laugh at the tattlings of its 
nurse, the snapping of a visitor's fingers, or any sound 
which it has not before heard. Fortunately, the- ordi- 
nary practices of the nursery fulfil these early require- 
ments of education to a considerable degree. Much, 
however, remains to be done ; and it is of more import- 
ance that it should be done than at first appears. Every 
faculty during the period of its greatest activity — the 
period in which it is spontaneously evolving itself — is 
capable of receiving more vivid impressions than at any 
other period. Moreover, as these simplest elements 
must eventually be mastered, and as the mastery of 
them whenever achieved must take time, it becomes an 
economy of time to occupy this first stage of childhood, 
during which no other intellectual action is possible, in 



Intellectual Education. 99 

gaining a complete familiarity with them in all their 
modifications. Add to which, that both temper and 
health will be improved by the continual gratification 
resulting from a due supply of these impressions which 
every child so greedily assimilates. Space, could it be 
spared, might here be well filled by some suggestions 
towards a more systematic ministration to these sim- 
plest of the perceptions. But it must suffice to point 
out that any such ministration ought to be based upon 
the general truth, that in the development of every 
faculty markedly contrasted impressions are the first 
to be distinguished ; that hence sounds greatly differing 
in loudness and pitch, colors very remote from each 
other, and substances widely unlike in hardness or 
texture, should be the first supplied ; and that in each 
case the progression must be by slow degrees to impres- 
sions more nearly allied. 

Lessons from Objects. — Passing on to object-lessons, 
which manifestly form a natural continuation of this 
primary culture of the senses, it is to be remarked, that 
the system commonly pursued is wholly at variance 
with the method of nature, as alike exhibited in in- 
fancy, in adult life, and in the course of civilization. 
"The child," says M. Marcel, "must be shown how all 
the parts of an object -are connected, etc.;" and the 
various manuals of these object-lessons severally con- 
tain lists of the facts which the child is to be told 
respecting each of the things put before it. Now it 
needs but a glance at the daily life of the infant to see 
that all the knowledge of things which is gained before 
the acquirement of speech is self-gained ; that the 
qualities of hardness and weight associated with certain 
visual appearances, the possession of particular forms 
and colors by particular persons, the production of 
special sounds by animals of special aspects, are 



Education. 



phenomena which it observes for itself. In manhood 
too, when there are no longer teachers at hand, the 
observations and inferences required for daily guid- 
ance must be made unhelped, and success in life de- 
pends upon the accuracy and completeness with which 
they are made. Is it probable, then, that while the pro- 
cess displayed in the evolution of humanity at large is 
repeated alike by the infant and the man, a reverse 
process must be followed during the period between 
infancy and manhood, — and that, too, even in so simple 
a thing as learning the properties of objects ? Is it not 
obvious, on the contrary, that one method must be 
pursued throughout? And is not nature perpetually 
thrusting this method upon us, if we had but the wit to 
see it and the humility to adopt it ? What can be more 
manifest than the desire of children for intellectual 
sympathy? Mark how the infant sitting on your knee 
thrusts into your face the toy it holds, that you too 
may look at it. See when it makes a creak with its wet 
finger on the table, how it turns and looks at you ; does 
it again, and again looks at you ; thus saying as clearly 
as it can : " Hear this new sound." Watch how the 
elder children come into the room, exclaiming, 
"Mamma, see what a curious thing," "Mamma, look 
at this," " Mamma, look at that ;" and would continue 
the habit, did not the silly mamma tell them not to 
tease her. Observe how, when out with the nurse-maid, 
each little one runs up to her with the new flower it has 
gathered, to show her how pretty it is, and to get 
her also to say it is pretty. Listen to the eager volu- 
bility with which every urchin describes any novelty he 
has been to see, if only he can find some one who will 
attend with any interest. Does not the induction lie 
on the surface? Is it not clear that we must conform 
our course to these intellectual instincts — that we must 



Intellectual Education. T6i 

just systematize the natural process — that we must 
listen to all the child has to tell us about each object, 
must induce it to say everything it can think of about 
such object, must occasionally draw its attention to 
facts it has not yet observed, with the view of leading 
it to notice them itself whenever they recur, and must 
go on by and by to indicate or supply new series of 
things for a like exhaustive examination ? 

The Mother's Way. — See the way in which, on this 
method, the intelligent mother conducts her lessons. 
Step by step she familiarizes her little boy with the 
names of the simpler attributes, hardness, softness, 
color, taste, size, etc.; in doing which she finds him. 
eagerly help by bringing this to show her that it is red, 
and the other to make her feel that it is hard, as fast as 
she gives him words for these properties. Each addi- 
tional property, as she draws his attention to it in some 
fresh thing which he brings her, she takes care to men- 
tion in connection with those he already knows ; so 
that by the natural tendency to imitate he may get 
into the habit of repeating them one after another. 
Gradually, as there occur cases in which he omits to 
name one or more of the properties he has become ac- 
quainted with, she introduces the practice of asking 
him whether there is not something more that he can 
tell her about the thing he has got. Probably he does 
not understand. After letting him puzzle awhile she 
tells him, perhaps laughing at him a little for his 
failure. A few recurrences of this, and he perceives 
what is to be done. When next she says she knows 
something more about the object than he has told her, 
his pride is roused ; he looks at it intently ; he thinks 
over all that he has heard ; and the problem being easy, 
presently finds it out. He is full of glee at his success, 
and she sympathizes with him. In common with every 



i02 Education. 

child, he delights in the discovery of his powers. He 
wishes for more victories, and goes in quest of more 
things about which to tell her. 

She Aids Self -evolution. — As his faculties unfold she 
adds quality after quality to his list ; progressing from 
hardness and softness to roughness and smoothness, 
from color to polish, from simple bodies to composite 
ones — thus constantly complicating the problem as he 
gains competence, constantly taxing his attention and 
memory to a greater extent, constantly maintaining his 
interest by supplying him with new impressions such 
as his mind can assimilate, and constantly gratifying 
him by conquest over such small difficulties as he can 
master. In doing this she is manifestly but following 
out that spontaneous process that was going on during 
a still earlier period — simply aiding self-evolution ; and 
is aiding it in the mode suggested by the boy's instinc- 
tive behavior to her. Manifestly, too, the course she is 
pursuing is the one best calculated to establish a habit 
of exhaustive observation — which is the professed aim 
of these lessons. 

Telling Not Teaching.— To tell a child this and to 
show it the other, is not to teach it how to observe, but 
to make it a mere recipient of another's observations : 
a proceeding which weakens rather than strengthens 
its powers of self-instruction, which deprives it of the 
pleasures resulting from successful activity, which pre- 
sents this all-attractive knowledge under the aspect of 
formal tuition, and which thus generates that indiffer- 
ence and even disgust with which these object-lessons 
are not unfrequently regarded. On the other hand, to 
pursue the course above described is simply to guide 
the intellect to its appropriate food ; to join with the 
intellectual appetites their natural adjuncts — amour 
propre and the desire for sympathy; to induce by the 



Intellectual Education. 103 

union of all these an intensity of attention which in- 
sures perceptions alike vivid and complete ; and to 
habituate the mind from the beginning to that practice 
of self-help which it must ultimately follow. 

The Study of Objects should be Carried into a Wide 
Range. — Object-lessons should not only be carried on 
after quite a different fashion from that commonly pur- 
sued, but should be extended to a range of things far 
wider, and continue to a period far later, than now. 
They should not be limited to the contents of the 
house, but should include those of the fields and 
hedges, the quarry and the sea-shore. They should 
not cease with early childhood, but should be so kept 
up during youth as insensibly to merge into the investi- 
gations of the naturalist and the man of science. Here, 
again, we have but to follow nature's leadings. Where 
can be seen an intenser delight than that of children 
picking up new flowers and watching new insects, or 
hoarding pebbles and shells ? And who is there but 
perceives that by sympathizing with them they may be 
led on to any extent of inquiry into the qualities and 
structures of these things? Every botanist who has 
had children with him in the woods and the lanes must 
have noticed how eagerly they join in his pursuits, 
how keenly they searched out plants for him, how in- 
tently they watched whilst he examined them, how 
they overwhelmed him with questions. The consistent 
follower of Bacon — the " servant and interpreter of 
nature " — will see that we ought modestly to adopt the 
course of culture thus indicated. 

Animal and Plant Life. — Having gained due familiar- 
ity with the simpler properties of inorganic objects, the 
child should by the same process be led on to a like 
exhaustive examination of the things it picks up in its 
daily walks — the less complex facts they present being 



io4 



Education. 



alone noticed at first : in plants, the color, number, and 
forms of the petals and shapes of the stalks and leaves ; 
in insects, the numbers of the wings, legs, and antennae, 
and their colors. As these become fully appreciated 
and invariably observed, further facts may be succes- 
sively introduced: in the one case, the numbers of 
stamens and pistils, the forms of the flowers, whether 
radial or bilateral in symmetry, the arrangement and 
character of the leaves, whether opposite or alternate, 
stalked or sessile, smooth or hair}'', serrated, toothed, 
or crenate; in the other, the divisions of the body, the 
segments of the abdomen, the markings of the wings 
the number of joints in the legs, and the forms of the 
smaller organs, — the system pursued throughout being 
that of making it the child's ambition to say respecting 
everything it finds all that can be said. Then, when a 
fit age has been reached, the means of preserving these 
plants which have become so interesting in virtue of 
the knowledge obtained of them, may as a great favor 
be supplied ; and eventually, as a still greater favor, 
may also be supplied the apparatus needful for keeping 
the larvae of our common butterflies and moths through 
their transformations — a practice which, as we can per- 
sonally testify, yields the highest gratification, is con- 
tinued with ardor for years, when joined with the 
formation of an entomological collection adds immense 
interest to Saturday-afternoon rambles, and forms an 
admirable introduction to the study of physiology. 

The Broad Way the Best Way — We are quite pre- 
pared to hear from many that all this is throwing away 
time and energy, and that children would be much 
better occupied in writing their copies or learning their 
pence-tables, and so fitting themselves for the business 
of life. We regret that such crude ideas of what con- 
stitutes education and such a narrow conception of 



Intellectual Education. 105 

utility should still be generally prevalent. Saying 
nothing on the need for a systematic culture of the 
perceptions and the value of the practices above incul- 
cated as subserving that need, we are prepared to 
defend them even on the score of the knowledge gained. 
If men are to be mere cits, mere porers over ledgers, with 
no ideas beyond their trades ; if it is well that they should 
be as the cockney whose conception of rural pleasures 
extends no further than sitting in a tea-garden smoking 
pipes and drinking porter ; or as the squire who thinks 
of woods as places for shooting in, of uncultivated 
plants as nothing but weeds, and who classifies animals 
into game, vermin, and stock — then indeed it is needless 
for men to learn anything that does not directly help 
to replenish the till and fill the larder. But if there is 
a more worthy aim for us than to be drudges, if there 
are other uses in the things around us than their power 
to bring money, if there are higher faculties to be 
exercised than acquisitive and sensual ones, if the 
pleasures which poetry and art and science and phi- 
losophy can bring are of any moment, then is it de- 
sirable that the instinctive inclination which every 
child shows to observe natural beauties and investigate 
natural phenomena should be encouraged. 

But this gross utilitarianism, which is content to 
come into the world and quit it again without knowing 
what kind of a world it is or what it contains, may be 
met on its own ground. It will by and by be found 
that a knowledge of the laws of life is more important 
than any other knowledge whatever ; that the laws of 
life include not only all bodily and mental processes, 
but by implication all the transactions of the house and 
the street, all commerce, all politics, all morals ; and 
that therefore without a due acquaintance with them 
neither personal nor social conduct can be rightly regu- 



106 Education. 

lated. It will eventually be seen, too, that the laws of 
life are essentially the same throughout the whole 
organic creation ; and further, that they cannot be 
properly understood in their complex manifestations 
until they have been studied in their simpler ones. 
And when this is seen, it will be .also seen that in aiding 
the child to acquire the out-of-door information for 
which it shows so great an avidity, and in encouraging 
the acquisition of such information throughout youth, 
we are simply inducing it to store up the raw material 
for future organization — the facts that will one day 
bring home to it with due force those great generaliza- 
tions of science by which actions may be rightly guided. 
The Study of Drawing. — The spreading recognition 
of drawing as an element of education is one amongst 
many signs of the more rational views on mental culture 
now beginning to prevail. Once more it may be re- 
marked, that teachers are at length adopting the course 
which nature has for ages been pressing upon their no- 
tice. The spontaneous efforts made by children to rep- 
resent the men, houses, trees, and animals around them 
— on a slate if they can get nothing better, or with 
lead-pencil on paper, if they can beg them — are familiar 
to all. To be shown through a picture-book is one of 
their highest gratifications ; and as usual, their strong 
imitative tendency presently generates in them the 
ambition to make pictures themselves also. This at- 
tempt to depict the striking things they see is a further 
instinctive exercise of the perceptions — a means whereby 
still greater accuracy and completeness of observation 
is induced. And alike by seeking to interest us in their 
discoveries of the sensible properties of things, and by 
their endeavors to draw, they solicit from us just that 
kind of culture which they most need. 



Intellectual Education. 107 

Use of Color. — Had teachers been guided by nature's 
hints not only in the making of drawing a part of edu- 
cation, but in the choice of their modes of teaching it, 
they would have done still better than they have done. 
What is ft that the child first tries to represent ? Things 
that are large, things that are attractive in color, things 
round which its pleasurable associations must cluster — 
human beings from whom it has received so many 
emotions, cows and dogs which interest by the many 
phenomena they present, houses that are hourly visible 
and strike by their size and contrast of parts. And 
which of all the processes of representation gives it 
most delight ? Coloring. Paper and pencil are good 
in default of something better ; but a box of paints and 
a brush — these are the treasures. The drawing of out- 
lines immediately becomes secondary to coloring — is 
gone through mainly with a view to the coloring ; and 
if leave can be got to color a book of prints, how great 
is the favor! Now, ridiculous as such a position will 
seem to drawing-masters, who postpone coloring and 
who teach form by a dreary discipline of copying lines, 
we believe that the course of culture thus indicated is 
the right one. That priority of color to form, which, 
as already pointed out, as a psychological basis, and in 
virtue of which psychological basis arises this strong 
preference in the child, should be recognized from the 
very beginning ; and from the very beginning also the 
things imitated should be real. 

Color Related to Form. — That greater delight in color, 
which is not only conspicuous in children but persists 
in most persons throughout life, should be continuously 
employed as the natural stimulus to the mastery of the 
comparatively difficult and unattractive form — should 
be the prospective reward for the achievement of form. 
And these instinctive attempts to represent interesting 



ioS 



Education. 



actualities should be all along encouraged, in the con- 
viction that as, by a widening experience, smaller and 
more practicable objects become interesting they too 
will be attempted ; and that so a gradual approximation 
will be made towards imitations having some resem- 
blance to the realities. No matter how grotesque the 
shapes produced, no matter how daubed and glaring 
the colors. The question is not whether the child is 
producing good drawings : the question is, whether it 
is developing its faculties. It has first to gain some 
command over its fingers, some crude notions of like- 
ness ; and this practice is better than any other for 
these ends, seeing that it is the spontaneous and the 
interesting one. During these early years, be it re- 
membered, no formal drawing-lessons are possible : 
shall we therefore repress, o*r neglect to aid, these 
efforts at self-culture? or shall we encourage and guide 
them as normal exercises of the perceptions and the 
powers of manipulation ? If by the supply of cheap 
woodcuts to be colored, and simple contour-maps to 
have their boundary-lines tinted, we can not only pleas- 
urably draw out the faculty of color, but can incident- 
ally produce some familiarity with the outlines of things 
and countries, and some ability to move the brush 
steadily; and if by the supply of temptingly-painted 
objects we can keep up the instinctive practice of mak- 
ing representations, however rough, it must happen 
that by the time drawing is commonly commenced 
there will exist a facility that would else have been 
absent. Time will have been gained, and trouble both 
to teacher and pupil saved. 

Drawing from Copies Wrong — From all that has been 
said, it may be readily inferred that we wholly disap- 
prove of the practice of drawing from copies ; and still 
more so of that formal discipline in making straight 



Intellectual Education. 109 

lines and curved lines and compound lines, with which 
it is the fashion of some teachers to begin. We regret 
to find that the Society of Arts has recently, in its 
series of manuals on "Rudimentary Art-Instruction," 
given its countenance to an elementary drawing-book, 
which is the most vicious in principle that we have 
seen. We refer to the "Outline from Outline, or from 
the Flat," by John Bell, sculptor. As expressed in the 
prefatory note, this publication proposes " to place 
before the student a simple, yet logical mode of in- 
struction " ; and to this end sets out with a number of 
definitions thus : 

" A simple line in drawing is a thin mark drawn from one point to 
another. 

' ' Lines may be divided, as to their nature in drawing, into two 
classes : 

" 1. Straight, which are marks that go the shortest road between 
two points, as A B. 

" 2. Or Curved, which are marks which do not go the shortest 
road between two points, as C D." 

And so the introduction progresses to horizontal lines, 
perpendicular lines, oblique lines, angles of the several 
kinds, and the various figures which lines and angles 
make up. The work is, in short, a grammar of form, 
with exercises. And thus the system of commencing 
with a dry analysis of elements, which in the teaching 
of language has been exploded, is to be reinstituted in 
the teaching of drawing. The abstract is to be pre- 
liminary to the concrete. Scientific conceptions are to 
precede empirical experiences. That this is an inver- 
sion of the normal order, we need scarcely repeat. 

Why Draw from. Objects.— It has been well said con- 
cerning the custom of prefacing the art of speaking any 
tongue by a drilling in the parts of speech and their 
functions, that it is about as reasonable as prefacing 



no Education. 

the art of walking by a course of lessons on the bones, 
muscles, and nerves of the legs ; and much the same 
thing may be said of the proposal to preface the art of 
representing objects by a nomenclature and definitions 
of the lines which they yield on analysis. These tech- 
nicalities are alike repulsive and needless. They render 
the study distasteful at the very outset ; and all with 
the view of teaching that which in the course of prac- 
tice will be learnt unconsciously. Just as the child 
incidentally gathers the meanings of ordinary words 
from the conversations going on around it without the 
help of dictionaries, so from the remarks on objects, 
pictures, and its own drawings will it presently acquire, 
not only without effort, but even pleasurably, those same 
scientific terms which if presented at first are a mys- 
tery and a weariness. 

Suggestions as to Drawing — If any dependence is to 
be placed upon the general principles of education that 
have been laid down, the process of learning to draw 
should be throughout continuous with those efforts of 
early childhood described above as so worthy of en- 
couragement. By the time that the voluntary practice 
thus initiated has given some steadiness of hand and 
some tolerable ideas of proportion, there will have 
arisen a vague notion of body as presenting its three 
dimensions in perspective. And when, after sundry 
abortive, Chinese-like attempts to render this appear- 
ance on paper there has grown up a pretty clear per- 
ception of the thing to be achieved, and a desire to 
achieve it, a first lesson in empirical perspective may 
be given by means of the apparatus occasionally used 
in explaining perspective as a science. This sounds 
formidable ; but the experiment is both comprehensive 
and interesting to any boy or girl of ordinary intelli- 
gence. 



Intellectual Education. 1 1 1 

Ideas of Perspective. — A plate of glass, so framed as 
to stand vertically on the table, being placed before the 
pupil, and a book or like simple object laid on the 
other side of it, he is requested, whilst keeping the eye 
in one position, to make ink dots upon the. glass so that 
they may coincide with or hide the corners of this ob- 
ject. He is then told to join these dots by lines ; on 
doing which he perceives that the lines he makes hide, 
or coincide with, the outlines of the object. And then, 
on being asked to put a sheet of paper on the other 
side of the glass, he discovers that the lines he has thus 
drawn represent the object as he. saw it. They not only 
look like it, but he perceives that they must be like it, 
because he made them agree with its outlines ; and by 
removing the paper he can repeatedly convince himself 
that they do agree with its outlines. The fact is new 
and striking, and serves him as an experimental demon- 
stration, that lines of certain lengths, placed in certain 
directions on a plane, can represent lines of other 
lengths, and having other directions in space. 

Subsequently, by gradually changing the position of 
the object he may be led to observe how some lines 
shorten and disappear, whilst others come into sight 
and lengthen. The convergence of parallel lines, and 
indeed all the leading facts of perspective, may from 
time to time be similarly illustrated to him. If he has 
been duly accustomed to self-help, he will gladly, when 
it is suggested, make the attempt to draw one of these 
outlines upon paper by the eye only ; and it may soon 
be made an exciting aim to produce, unassisted, a rep- 
resentation, as like as he can, to one subsequently 
sketched on the glass. Thus, without the unintelligent 
mechanical practice of copying other drawings, but by a 
method at once simple and attractive, rational yet not 
abstract, a familiarity with the linear appearances of 



1 1 2 Education. 

things, and a faculty of rendering them, may be step by 
step acquired. To- which advantages add these: that 
even thus early the pupil learns, almost unconsciously, 
the true theory of a picture — namely, that it is a delin- 
eation of objects as they appear when projected on a 
plane placed between them and the eye ; and that when 
he reaches a fit age for commencing scientific perspec- 
tive he is already thoroughly acquainted with the facts 
which form its logical basis. 

Primary Ideas of Geometry — As exhibiting a rational 
mode of communicating primary conceptions in geome- 
try, we cannot do better than quote the following pas- 
sage from Mr. Wyse: 

' ' A child has been in the habit of using cubes for arithmetic : let 
him use them also for the elements of geometry. I would begin with 
solids — the reverse of the usual plan. It saves all the difficulty of ab- 
surd definitions, and bad explanations on points, lines, and surfaces, 
which are nothing but abstractions. ... A cube presents many of the 
principal elements of geometry ; it at once exhibits points, straight 
lines, parallel lines, angles, parallelograms, etc., etc. These cubes are 
divisible into various parts. The pupil has already been familiarized 
with such divisions in numeration, and he now proceeds to a compar- 
ison of their several parts, and of the relation of these parts to each 
other. . . . From thence he advances to globes, which furnish him 
with elementary notions of the circle, of curves generally, etc., etc. 

" Being tolerably familiar with solids, he may now substitute planes. 
The transition may be made very easy. Let the cube, .for instance, be 
cut into thin divisions, and placed on paper ; he will then see as many 
plane rectangles as he has divisions : so with all the others. Globes 
may be treated in the same manner ; he will thus see how surfaces 
really are generated, and be enabled to abstract them with facility in 
every solid. 

" He has thus acquired the alphabet and reading of geometry. He 
now proceeds to write it. 

"The simplest operation, and therefore the first, is merely to place 
these planes on a piece of paper, and pass the pencil round them. When 
this has been frequently done, the plane may be put at a little distance, 
and the child required to copy it, and so on." 



Intellectual Education. 713 

Try First, then Measure. — A stock of geometrical con- 
ceptions having been obtained, in some such manner as 
this recommended by Mr. Wyse, a further step may in 
course of time be taken by introducing the practice of 
testing the correctness of all figures drawn by the eye ; 
thus alike exciting an ambition to make them exact, 
and continually illustrating the difficulty of fulfilling 
that ambition. There can be little doubt that geome- 
try had its origin (as, indeed, the word implies) in the 
methods discovered by artisans and others of making 
accurate measurement for the foundations of buildings, 
areas of inclosures, and the like, and that its truths 
came to be treasured up merely with a view to their 
immediate utility. They should be introduced to the 
pupil under analogous relationships. In the cutting 
out of pieces for his card-houses, in the drawing of or- 
namental diagrams for coloring, and in those various 
instructive occupations which an inventive teacher will 
lead him into, he may be for a length of time advanta- 
geously left, like the primitive builder, to tentative pro- 
cesses, and will so gain an abundant experience of the 
difficulty of achieving his aims by the unaided senses. 

The Next Stage. — When, having meanwhile under- 
gone a valuable discipline of the perceptions, he has 
reached a fit age for using a pair of compasses, he will, 
whilst duly appreciating these as enabling him to verify 
his ocular guesses, be still hindered by the difficulties of 
the approximative method. In this stage he may be 
left for a further period : partly as being yet too young 
for anything higher, partly because it is desirable that he 
should be made to feel still more strongly the want of sys- 
tematic contrivances. If the acquisition of knowledge 
is to be made continuously interesting, and if in the 
early civilization of the child, as in the early civilization 
of the race, science becomes attractive only as minister- 



ii4 Education. 

ing to art, it is manifest that the proper preliminary to 
geometry is a long practice in those constructive pro- 
cesses which geometry will facilitate. Observe that here, 
too, nature points the way. Almost invariably children 
show a strong propensity to cut out things in paper, to 
make, to build — a propensity which, if duly encouraged 
and directed, will not only prepare the way for scientific 
conceptions, but will develop those powers of manipu- 
tion in which most people are so deficient. 

Then Empirical Geometry. — When the observing and 
inventive faculties have attained the requisite power, 
the pupil may be introduced to empirical geometry ; 
that is, geometry dealing with methodical solutions, 
but not with the demonstrations of them. Like all 
other transitions in education, this should be made not 
formally, but incidentally ; and the relationship to con- 
structive art should still be maintained. To make a 
tetrahedron in cardboard, like one given to him, is a 
problem which will alike interest the pupil and serve 
as a convenient starting-point. In attempting this he 
finds it needful to draw four equilateral triangles 
arranged in special positions. Being unable in the 
absence of an exact method to do this accurately, he 
discovers on putting the triangles into their respective 
positions that he cannot make their sides fit, and that 
their angles do not properly meet at the apex. He 
may now be shown how by describing a couple of 
circles each of these triangles may be drawn with per- 
fect correctness and without guessing ; and after his 
failure he will duly value the information. Having 
thus helped him to the solution of his first problem, 
with the view of illustrating the nature of geometrical 
methods, he is in future to be left altogether to his own 
ingenuity in solving the questions put to him. To 
bisect a line, to erect a perpendicular, to describe a 



Intellectual Education. 1 1 5 

square, to bisect an angle, to draw a line parallel to a 
given line, to describe a hexagon, are problems which 
a little patience will enable him to find out. And from 
these he may be led on step by step to questions of a 
more complex kind ; all of which, under judicious man- 
agement, he will puzzle through unhelped. Doubtless 
many of those brought up under the old regime will 
look upon this assertion sceptically. We speak from 
facts, however, and those neither few nor special. We 
have seen a class of boys become so interested in 
making out solutions to these problems as to look 
forward to their geometry lesson as a chief event of the 
week. Within the last month we have been told of one 
girls' school in which some of the young ladies volun- 
tarily occupy themselves with geometrical questions 
out of school-hours ; and of another, in which they not 
only do this, but in which one of them is begging for 
problems to find out during the holidays — both which 
facts we state on the authority of the teacher. There" 
could indeed be no stronger proofs than are thus af- 
forded of the practicability and the immense advantage 
of self-development. 

Geometry Full of Interest. — A branch of knowledge 
which as commonly taught is dry and even repulsive, 
may, by following the method of nature, be made ex- 
tremely interesting and profoundly beneficial. We say 
profoundly beneficial, because the effects are not con- 
fined to the gaining of geometrical facts, but often revo- 
lutionize the whole state of mind. It has repeatedly 
occurred that those who have been stupefied by the 
ordinary school-drill — by its abstract formulas, by its 
wearisome tasks, by its cramming — have suddenly had 
their intellects roused by thus ceasing to make them 
passive recipients, and inducing them to become active 
discoverers. The discouragement brought about by 



n6 Education. 

bad teaching having been diminished by a little sym- 
pathy, and sufficient perseverance induced to achieve 
a first success, there arises a revulsion of feeling affect- 
ing the whole nature. They no longer find themselves 
incompetent : they too can do something. And gradu- 
ally as success follows success the incubus of despair 
disappears, and they attack the difficulties of their 
other studies with a courage that insures conquest. 

Rational Geometry will Follow. — This empirical ge- 
ometry, which presents an endless series of problems, 
and should be continued along with other studies for 
years, may throughout be advantageously accompanied 
by those concrete applications of its principles which 
serve as its preliminary. After the cube, the octahedron, 
and the various forms of pyramid and prism have been 
mastered, may come the more complex regular bodies 
— the dodecahedron, and the icosahedron — to construct 
which out of single pieces of cardboard requires con- 
siderable ingenuity. From these the transition may 
naturally be made to such modified forms of the regular 
bodies as are met with in crystals — the truncated cube, 
the cube with its dihedral as well as its solid angles 
truncated, the octahedron and the various prisms as 
similarly modified ; in imitating which numerous forms 
assumed by different metals and salts, an acquaintance 
with the leading facts of mineralogy will be incidentally 
gained. After long continuance in exercises of this 
kind, rational geometry, as may be supposed, presents 
no obstacles. Constantly habituated to contemplate 
relationships of form and quantity, and vaguely per- 
ceiving from time to time the necessity of certain re- 
sults as reached by certain means, the pupil comes to 
regard the demonstrations of Euclid as the missing 
supplements to his familiar problems. His well-disci- 
plined faculties enable him easil3 r to master its successive 



Intellectual Education. 117 

propositions, and to appreciate their value ; and he has 
the occasional gratification of finding some of his own 
methods proved to be true. Thus he enjoys what is 
to the unprepared a dreary task. It only remains to 
add, that his mind will presently arrive at a fit condi- 
tion for that most valuable of all exercises for the 
reflective faculties — the making of original demonstra- 
tions. Such theorems as those appended to the succes- 
sive books of the Messrs. Chambers' Euclid will soon 
become practicable to him; and in proving them the 
process of self-development will be not intellectual only, 
but moral. 

This Method the Natural One — To continue much 
further these suggestions would be to write a detailed 
treatise on education, which we do not purpose. The 
foregoing outlines of plans for exercising the percep- 
tions in early childhood for conducting object-lessons 
for teaching drawing and geometry must be considered 
as roughly-sketched illustrations of the method dictated 
by the general principles previously specified. We be- 
lieve that on examination they will be found not only 
to progress from the simple to the complex, from the 
concrete to the abstract, from the empirical to the 
rational, but to satisfy the further requirements, that 
education shall be a repetition of civilization in little, 
that it shall be as much as possible a process of self- 
evolution, and that it shall be pleasurable. That there 
should be one type of method capable of satisfying all 
these conditions, tends alike to verify the conditions, 
and to prove that type of method the right one. 
And when we add that this method is the logical out- 
come of the tendency characterizing all modern systems 
of instruction; that it is but an adoption in full of the 
method of nature which they adopt partially; that it 
displays this complete adoption of the method of nature 



u8 Education. 

not only by conforming to the above principles, but by 
following the suggestions which the unfolding mind it- 
self gives, facilitating its spontaneous activities, and so 
aiding the developments which nature is busy with — 
when we add this, there seems abundant reason to con- 
clude that the mode of procedure above exemplified 
closely approximates to the true one. 

Self-instruction the Great Principle, and Mental Pleas- 
ure. — A few paragraphs must be appended in further in- 
culcation of the two general principles, alike the most 
important and the. least attended to: we mean the prin- 
ciple that throughout youth, as in early childhood and 
in maturity, the process shall be one of self-instruction; 
and the obverse principle that the mental action in- 
duced by this process shall be throughout intrinsically 
grateful. If progression from simple to complex and 
from concrete to abstract be considered the essential 
requirements 'as dictated by abstract psychology, then 
do these requirements that knowledge shall be self- 
mastered and pleasurably mastered become the tests by 
which we may judge whether the dictates of abstract 
psychology are being fulfilled. If the first embody the 
leading generalizations of the science of mental growth, 
the last are the chief canons of the art of fostering 
mental growth. For manifestly if the steps in our 
curriculum are so arranged that they can be succes- 
sively ascended by the pupil himself with little or no 
help, they must correspond with the stages of evolu- 
tion in his faculties ; and manifestly if the successive 
achievements of these steps are intrinsically gratifying 
to him, it follows th»at they require no more than a 
normal exercise of his powers. 

Such Knowledge Permanent — But the making educa- 
tion a process of self-evolution has other advantages 
than this of keeping our lessons in the right order. In 



Intellectual Education. 119 

the first place, it guarantees a vividness and permanency 
of impression which the usual methods can never pro- 
duce. Any piece of knowledge which the pupil has 
himself acquired, any problem which he has himself 
solved, becomes by virtue of the conquest much more 
thoroughly his than it could else be. The preliminary 
activity of mind which his success implies, the concen- 
tration of thought necessary to it, and the excitement 
consequent on his triumph conspire to register all the 
facts in his memory in a way that no mere information 
heard from a teacher or read in a school-book can be 
registered. Even if he fails, the tension to which his 
faculties have been wound up insures his remembrance 
of the solution, when given to him, better than half a 
dozen repetitions would. Observe again, that this dis- 
cipline necessitates a continuous organization of the 
knowledge he acquires. It is in the very nature of facts 
and inferences, assimilated in this normal manner, that 
they successively become the premises of further con- 
clusions,— the means of solving still further questions. 
The solution of yesterday's problem helps the pupil in 
mastering to-day's. Thus the knowledge is turned into 
faculty as soon as it is taken in, and forthwith aids in 
the general function of thinking — does not lie merely 
written in the pages of an internal library, as when 
r*ote-learnt. 

Gives Moral Culture. — Mark further, the importance 
of the moral culture which this constant self-help in- 
volves. Courage in attacking difficulties, patient con- 
centration of the attention, perseverance through fail- 
ures — these are characteristics which after-life specially 
requires ; and these are characteristics which this sys- 
tem of making the mind work for its food specially 
produces. That it is thoroughly practicable to carry 
out instruction after this fashion we can ourselves tes- 



120 Education. 

tify, having been in youth thus led to successively 
solve the comparatively complex problems of Perspec- 
tive. And that leading teachers have been gradually 
tending in this direction is indicated alike in the saying 
of Fellenberg, that " the individual, independent activ- 
ity of the pupil is of much greater importance than the 
ordinary busy officiousness of many who assume the 
office of educators ; " in the opinion of Horace Mann, 
that "unfortunately education amongst us at present 
consists too much in telling, not in training j" and in 
the remark of M. Marcel, that " what the learner dis- 
covers by mental exertion is better known than what is 
told to him." 

Pleasure Favors Mental Action. — Similarly with the 
correlative requirement, that the method of culture 
pursued shall be one productive of an intrinsically 
happy activity, — an activit)r not happy in virtue of 
extrinsic rewards to be obtained, but in virtue of its 
own healthfulness. Conformity to this requirement 
not only guards us against thwarting the normal 
process of evolution, but incidentally secures positive 
benefits of importance. Unless we are to return to an 
ascetic morality, the maintenance of youthful happiness 
must be considered as in itself a worthy aim. Not to 
dwell upon this, however, we go on to remark that a 
pleasurable state of feeling is far more favorable to in- 
tellectual action than one of indifference or disgust. 
Every one knows that things read, heard, or seen with 
interest are better remembered than those read, heard, 
or seen with apathy. In the one case the faculties ap- 
pealed to are actively occupied with the subject pre- 
sented ; in the other they are inactively occupied with 
it, and the attention is continually drawn away after 
more attractive thoughts. Hence the impressions are 
respectively strong and weak. Moreover, the intellect- 



Intellectual Education. 121 

ual listlessness which a pupil's lack of interest in any 
study involves, is further complicated by his anxiety, by 
his fear of consequences, which distract his attention, 
and increase the difficulty he finds in bringing his facul- 
ties to bear upon these facts that are repugnant to 
them. Clearly, therefore, the efficiency of any intellect- 
ual action will, other things equal, be proportionate to 
the gratification with which it is performed. 

Moral Consequences. — It should be considered also, 
that important moral consequences depend upon the 
habitual pleasure or pain which daily lessons produce. 
No one can compare the faces and manners of two boys 
— the one made happy by mastering interesting subjects, 
and the other made miserable by disgust with his stud- 
ies, by consequent failure, by cold looks, by threats, by 
punishment — without seeing that the disposition of the 
one is being benefited, and that of the other greatly 
injured. Whoever has marked the effect of intellectual 
success upon the mind, and the power of the mind over 
the body, will see that in the one case both temper and 
health are favorably affected ; whilst in the other there 
is danger of permanent moroseness, of permanent timid- 
ity, and even of permanent constitutional depression. 
To all which considerations we must add the further 
one, that the relationship between teachers and their 
pupils is, other things equal, rendered friendly and 
influential, or antagonistic and powerless, according as 
the system of culture produces happiness or misery. 
Human beings are at the mercy of their associated 
ideas. 

The Teacher Who is Beloved. — A daily minister of pain 
cannot fail to be regarded with a secret dislike, and if 
he causes no emotions but painful ones, will inevitably 
be hated. Conversely, he who constantly aids children 
to their ends, hourly provides them with the satisfactions 



122 Education. 

of conquest, hourly encourages them through their dif- 
ficulties and sympathizes in their successes, cannot fail 
to be liked ; nay, if his behavior is consistent through- 
out, must be loved. And when we remember how effi- 
cient and benign is the control of a master who is felt 
to be a friend, when compared with the control of one 
who is looked upon with aversion or at best indifference, 
we may infer that the indirect advantages of conduct- 
ing education on the happiness principle do not fall far 
short of the direct ones. To all who question the pos- 
sibility of acting out the system here advocated, we 
reply as before, that not only does theory point to it, 
but experience commends it. To the many verdicts of 
distinguished teachers who since Pestalozzi's time have 
testified this, may be here added that of Professor Pill- 
ans, who asserts that "where young people are taught 
as they ought to be, they are quite as happy in school 
as at play, seldom less delighted, nay, often more, with 
the well-directed exercise of their mental energies than 
with that of their muscular powers." 

The Two Principles Yield Permanence. — As suggesting 
a final reason for making education a process of self- 
instruction, and by consequence a process of pleasurable 
instruction, we may advert to the fact that, in propor- 
tion as it is made so, is there a probability that educa- 
tion will not cease when school-days end. As long as 
the acquisition of knowledge is rendered habitually re- 
pugnant, so long will there be a prevailing tendency to 
discontinue it when free from the coercion of parents 
and masters. And when the acquisition of knowledge 
has been rendered habitually gratifying, then will be 
there as prevailing a tendency to continue without 
superintendence that same self-culture previously car- 
ried on under superintendence. These results are inevi- 
table. While the laws of mental association remain true 



Intellectual Education. 123 

— while men dislike the things and places that suggest 
painful recollections, and delight in those which call to 
mind bygone pleasures — painful lessons will make 
knowledge repulsive, and pleasurable lessons will make 
it attractive. The men to whom in boyhood informa- 
tion came in dreary tasks along with threats of punish- 
ment, and who were never led into habits of independ- 
ent inquiry, are unlikely to be students in after years ; 
while those to whom it came in the natural forms, at 
the proper times, and who remember its facts as not 
only interesting in themselves, but as the occasions of 
a long series of gratifying successes, are likely to con- 
tinue through life that self-instruction commenced in 
youth. 



1 24 Education. 



CHAPTER III. 



MORAL EDUCATION. 



Knowledge of the Training of Children Necessary. — 
Strangely enough, the most glaring defect in our pro- 
grammes of education is entirely overlooked. While 
much is being done in the detailed improvement of our 
systems in respect both of matter and manner, the most 
pressing desideratum has not yet been even recognized 
as a desideratum. To prepare the young for the 
duties of life is tacitly admitted by all to be the end 
which parents and school-masters should have in view ; 
and happily the value of the things taught, and the 
goodness of the method followed in teaching them, are 
now ostensibly judged by their fitness to this end. 
The propriety of substituting for an exclusively classi- 
cal training a training in which the modern languages 
shall have a share, is argued on this ground. The 
necessity of increasing the amount of science is urged 
for like reasons. But though some care is taken to fit 
youth of both sexes for society and citizenship, no care 
whatever is taken to fit them for the still more impor- 
tant position they will ultimately have to fill — the posi- 
tion of parents. While it is seen that for the purpose 
of gaining a livelihood an elaborate preparation is 
needed, it appears to be thought that for the bringing 
up of children no preparation whatever is needed. 
While many years are spent by a boy in gaining knowl- 
edge, of which the chief value is that it constitutes " the 
education of a gentleman," and while many years are 



Moral Education. 125 

spent by a girl in those decorative acquirements which 
fit her for evening parties, not an hour is spent by 
either of them in preparation for that gravest of all 
responsibilities — the management of a family. Is it 
that this responsibility is but a remote contingency? 
On the contrary, it is certain to devolve on nine out of 
ten. Is it that the discharge of it is easy ? Certainly 
not : of all functions which the adult has to fulfil this 
is the most difficult. Is it that each may be trusted by 
self-instruction to fit himself or herself for the office of 
parent ? No : not only is the need for such self -instruc- 
tion unrecognized, but the complexity of the subject 
renders it the one of all others in which self-instruction 
is least likely to succeed. 

No rational plea can be put forward for leaving the 
Art of Education out of our curriculum. Whether as 
bearing upon the happiness of parents themselves, or 
whether as affecting the characters and lives of their 
children and remote descendants, we must admit that 
a knowledge of the right methods of juvenile culture, 
physical, intellectual, and moral, is a knowledge second 
to none in importance. This topic should occupy the 
highest and last place in the course of instruction passed 
through by each man and woman. As physical matur- 
ity is marked by the ability to produce offspring, so 
mental maturity is marked by the ability to train those 
offspring. The subject which involves all other subjects, and 
therefore the siibject in which the education of every one 
should culminate, is the Theory and Practice of Education. 

Ideas upon the Training of Children very Crude. — In 
the absence of this preparation, the management of 
children, and more especially the moral management, 
is lamentably bad. Parents either never think about 
the matter at all, or else their conclusions are crude and 
inconsistent. In most cases, and especially on the part 



1 2 6 Education. 

of mothers, the treatment adopted on every occasion is 
that which the impulse of the moment prompts : it 
springs not from any reasoned-out conviction as to 
what will most conduce to the child's welfare, but 
merely expresses the passing parental feelings, whether 
good or ill ; and varies from hour to hour as these feel- 
ings vary. Or if these blind dictates of passion are 
supplemented by any definite doctrines and methods, 
they are those that have been handed down from the 
past, or those suggested by the remembrances of child- 
hood, or those adopted from nurses and servants — 
methods devised not by the enlightenment but by the 
ignorance of the time. Commenting on the chaotic 
state of opinion and practice relative to family govern- 
ment, Richter writes : 

" If the secret variances of a large class of ordinary fathers were 
brought to light, and laid down as a plan of studies and reading cata- 
logued for a moral education, they would run somewhat after this 
fashion : In the first hour ' pure morality must be read to the child, 
either by myself or the tutor ; ' in the second, ' mixed morality, or that 
which may be applied to one's own advantage ; ' in the third, ' do you 
not see that your father does so and so ? ' in the fourth, ' you are little, 
and this is only fit for grown-up people ; ' in the fifth, ' the chief matter 
is that you should succeed in the world, and become something in the 
state ; ' in the sixth, ' not the temporary, but the eternal, determines 
the worth of a man ; ' in the seventh, ' therefore rather suffer injustice, 
and be kind ; ' in the eighth, ' but defend yourself bravely if any one 
attack you ;' in the ninth, ' do not make a noise, dear child ;' in the 
tenth, ' a boy must not sit so quiet ; ' in the eleventh, ' you must obey 
your parents better ; ' in the twelfth, ' and educate yourself. ' So by 
the hourly change of his principles the father conceals their untenable- 
ness and onesidedness. As for his wife, she is neither like him, nor 
yet like that harlequin who came on to the stage with a bundle of 
papers under each arm, and answered to the inquiry, what he had 
under his right arm, ' orders,' and to what he had under his left arm, 
'counter-orders.' But the mother might be much better compared to 
a giant Briareus, who had a hundred arms, and a bundle of papers 
under each. " 



Moral Education. 1 2 7 

This state of things is not to be readily changed. 
Generations must pass before any great amelioration of 
it can be expected. Like political constitutions, educa- 
tional systems are not made, but grow; and within 
brief periods growth is insensible. Slow, however, as 
must be any improvement, even that improvement im- 
plies the use of means ; and among the means is dis- 
cussion. 

Education cannot Ensure Perfection. — We are not 
among those who believe in Lord Palmerston's dogma, 
that "all children are born good." On the whole, the 
opposite dogma, untenable as it is, seems to us less wide 
of the truth. Nor do we agree with those who think 
that by skilful discipline children may be made alto- 
gether what they should be. Contrariwise, we are 
satisfied that though imperfections of nature may be 
diminished by wise management, they cannot be re- 
moved by it. The notion that an ideal humanity might 
be forthwith produced by a perfect system of education, 
is near akin to that shadowed forth in the poems of 
Shelley, that, would mankind give up their old institu- 
tions, prejudices, and errors,. all the evils in the world 
would at once disappear : neither notion being accept- 
able to such as have dispassionately studied human 
affairs. 

Not that we are without sympathy with those who 
entertain these too sanguine hopes. Enthusiasm, pushed 
even to fanaticism, is a useful motive-power — perhaps 
an indispensable one. It is clear that the ardent poli- 
tician would never undergo the labors and make the 
sacrifices he does did he not believe that the reform he 
fights for is the one thing needful. But for his convic- 
tion that drunkenness is the root of almost all social 
evils, the teetotaler would agitate far less energetically. 
In philanthropy as in other things great advantage re- 



128 Education. 

suits from division of labor; and that there may be 
division of labor, each class of philanthropists must be 
more or less subordinated to its function — must have 
an exaggerated faith in its work. 

Value of Enthusiasm. — Hence, of those who regard 
education, intellectual or moral, as the panacea, their 
undue expectations are not without use ; and that per- 
haps it is part of the beneficent order of things that 
their confidence cannot be shaken. 

Education Fails Greatly because of Parental Influence. 
— Even were it true, however, that by some possible 
system of moral government children could be moulded 
into the desired form, and even could every parent be 
duly indoctrinated with this system, we should still be 
far from achieving the object in view. It is forgotten 
that the carrying out of any such system presupposes 
on the part of adults a degree of intelligence, of good- 
ness, of self-control, possessed by no one. The great 
error made by those who discuss questions of juvenile 
discipline is in ascribing all the faults and difficulties 
to the children, and none to the parents. The current 
assumption respecting family government, as respect- 
ing national government, is, that the virtues are with 
the rulers and the vices with the ruled. Judging by 
educational theories, men and women are entirely trans- 
figured in the domestic relation. The citizens we do 
business with, the people we meet in the world, we all 
know to be very imperfect creatures. In the daily 
scandals, in the quarrels of friends, in bankruptcy dis- 
closures, in lawsuits, in police reports, we have con- 
stantly thrust before us the pervading selfishness, dis- 
honesty, brutality. Yet when we criticise nursery 
management, and canvass the misbehavior of juveniles, 
we habitually take for granted that these culpable men 



Moral Education . 129 

and women are free from moral delinquency in the 
treatment of their offspring ! 

Effect of Parental Misdoing. — So far is this from the 
truth, that we do not hesitate to say that to parental 
misconduct is traceable a great part of the domestic 
disorder commonly ascribed to the perversity of chil- 
dren. We do not assert this of the more sympathetic 
and self-restrained, among whom we hope most of our 
readers may be classed, but we assert it of the mass. 
What kind of moral discipline is to be expected from a 
mother who, time after time, angrily shakes her infant 
because it will not suckle her, which we once saw a 
mother do ? How much love of justice and generosity 
is likely to be instilled by a father who, on having his 
attention drawn by his child's scream to the fact that 
its finger is jammed between the window sash and the 
sill, forthwith begins to beat the child instead of re- 
leasing it ? Yet that there are such fathers is testified 
to us by an eye-witness. Or, to take a still stronger 
case, also vouched for by direct testimony — what are 
the educational prospects of the boy who, on being 
taken home with a dislocated thigh, is saluted with a 
castigation ? It is true that these are extreme instances 
— instances exhibiting in human beings that blind in- 
stinct which impels brutes to destroy the weakly and 
injured of their own race. But extreme though they 
are, they typify feelings and conduct daily observable 
in many families. 

Other Cases. — Who has not repeatedly seen a child 
slapped by nurse or parent for a fretfulness probably 
resulting from bodily derangement ? Who, when watch- 
ing a mother snatch up a fallen little one, has not often 
traced, both in the rough manner and in the sharply- 
uttered exclamation — "You stupid little thing!" — an 
irascibility foretelling endless future squabbles? Is 



130 Education. 

there not in the harsh tones in which a father bids his 
children be quiet, evidence of a deficient fellow-feel- 
ing with them ? Are not the constant, and often quite 
needless, thwartings that the young experience — the 
injunctions to sit still, which an active child cannot obey 
without suffering great nervous irritation; the com- 
mands not to look out of the window when travelling 
by railway, which on a child of any intelligence entails 
serious deprivation — are not these thwartings, we ask, 
signs of a terrible lack of sympathy ? 

Want of Success Comes from Both Parents and Chil- 
dren. — The truth is, that the difficulties of moral educa- 
tion are necessarily of dual origin — necessarily result 
from the combined faults of parents and children. If 
hereditary transmission is a law of nature, as every 
naturalist knows it to be, and as our daily remarks and 
current proverbs admit it to be, then on the average of 
cases the defects of children mirror the defects of their 
parents ; — on the average of cases, we say, because, 
complicated as the results are by the transmitted traits 
of remoter ancestors, the correspondence is not special, 
but only general. And if, on the average of cases, this 
inheritance of defects exists, then the evil passions 
which parents have to check in their children imply 
like evil passions in themselves — hidden, it may be, 
from the public eye, or perhaps obscured by other feel- 
ings, but still there. Evidently, therefore, the general 
practice of any ideal system of discipline is hopeless: 
parents are not good enough. 

The Standard Must Not be Too High. — Moreover, even 
were there methods by which the desired end could be 
at once effected, and even had fathers and mothers suf- 
ficient insight, sympathy, and self-command to employ 
these methods consistently, it might still be contended 
that it would be of no use to reform family discipline 



Moral Education. 131 

faster than other things are reformed. What is it that 
we aim to do? Is it not that education of what- 
ever kind has for its proximate end to prepare a 
child for the business of life — to produce a citizen who, 
at the same time that he is well conducted, is also able 
to make his way in the world ? And does not making 
his way in the world (by which we mean, not the ac- 
quirement of wealth, but of the means requisite for 
properly bringing up a family) — does not this imply a 
certain fitness for the world as it now is ? And if by 
any system of culture an ideal human being could be 
produced, is it not doubtful whether he would be fit for 
the world as it now is? May we not, on the contrary, 
suspect that his too keen sense of rectitude and too ele- 
vated standard of conduct would make life alike intol- 
erable and impossible ? And however admirable the 
results might be, considered individually, would it not 
be self-defeating in so far as society and posterity are 
concerned ? 

The Common Argument. — It may, we think, be argued 
with much reason, that as in a nation so in a family, the 
kind of government is, on the whole, about as good as 
the general state of human nature permits it to be. It 
may be said that in the one case, as in the other, the 
average character of the people determines the quality 
of the control exercised. It may be inferred that in 
both cases amelioration of the average character leads 
to an amelioration of system ; and further, that were it 
possible to ameliorate the system without the average 
character being first ameliorated, evil, rather than good, 
would follow. It may be urged that such degree of 
harshness as children now experience from their parents 
and teachers is but a preparation for that greater harsh- 
ness which they will meet with on entering the world ; 
and that were it possible for parents and teachers to 



132 Education. 

behave towards them with perfect equity and entire 
sympathy, it would but intensify the sufferings which 
the selfishness of men must in after life inflict on 
them.* 

Improvement Must Go On. — " But does not this prove 
too much ?" some one will ask. " If no system of moral 
culture can forthwith make children altogether what 
they should be ; if, even were there a system that 
would do this, existing parents are too imperfect to 
carry it out ; and if even could such a system be suc- 
cessfully carried out, its results would be disastrously 
incongruous with the present state of society, — does it 
not follow that a reform in the system now in use is 
neither practicable nor desirable ? " No. It merely 
follows that reform in domestic government must go 
on, pari passu, with other reforms. It merely follows 
that methods of discipline neither can be nor should be 
ameliorated, except by instalments. It merely follows 
that the dictates of abstract rectitude will in practice 
inevitably be subordinated by the present state of hu- 

* This is the plea put in by some for the rough treatment experi- 
enced by boys at our public schools, where, as it is said, they are in- 
troduced to a miniature world whose imperfections and hardships pre- 
pare them for those of the real world ; and it must be admitted that 
the plea has some force. But it is a very insufficient plea. For whereas 
domestic and school discipline, though they should not be very much 
better than the discipline of adult life, should at any rate be somewhat 
better, the discipline which boys meet with at Eton, Winchester, Har- 
row, etc., is much worse than that of adult life — much more unjust, 
cruel, brutal. Instead of being an aid to human progress, which all 
culture should be, the culture of our public schools, by accustoming 
boys to a despotic form of government and an intercourse regulated 
by brute force, tends to fit them for a lower state of society than that 
which exists. And chiefly recruited as our legislature is from among 
those who are brought up at these schools, this barbarizing influence 
becomes a serious hindrance to national progress. 



Moral Education. 133 

man nature — by the imperfections alike of children, of 
parents, and of society, and can only be better fulfilled 
as the general character becomes better. 

The Right Must be Aimed at. — " At any rate, then," 
may rejoin our critic, " it is clearly useless to set up any 
ideal standard of family discipline. There can be no 
advantage in elaborating and recommending methods 
that are in advance of the time." Again we must 
contend for the contrary. Just as in the case of 
political government, though pure rectitude may be 
at present impracticable, it is requisite to know where 
the right lies, so that the changes we make may be to- 
wards the right instead of away from it ; so in the case 
of domestic government an ideal must be upheld, that 
there may be gradual approximations to it. We need 
fear no evil consequences from the maintenance of such 
an ideal. On the average, the constitutional conserva- 
tism of mankind is always strong enough to prevent a 
too rapid change. So admirable are the arrangements 
of things, that until men have grown up to the level of 
a higher belief they cannot receive it : nominally, they 
may hold it, but not virtually. And even when the 
truth gets recognized, the obstacles to conformity with 
it are so persistent as to outlive the patience of philan- 
thropists and even philosophers. We may be quite 
sure, therefore, that the many difficulties standing in 
the way of a normal government of children will always 
put an adequate check upon the efforts to realize it. 

Moral Education. — With these preliminary explana- 
tions, let us go on to consider the true aims and methods 
of moral education — moral education, strictly so called, 
we mean ; for we do not propose to enter upon the 
question of religious education as an aid to the education 
exclusively moral. This we omit, as a topic better dealt 
with separately. After a few pages devoted to the set- 



134 Education. 

tlement of general principles, during the perusal of 
which we bespeak the reader's patience, we shall aim 
by illustrations to make clear the right methods of pa- 
rental behavior in the hourly occurring difficulties of 
family government. 

The True Method. — When a child falls, or runs its 
head against the table, it suffers a pain, the remem- 
brance of which tends to make it more careful for the 
future ; and by an occasional repetition of like experi- 
ences it is eventually disciplined into a proper guidance 
of its movements. If it lays hold of the fire-bars, 
thrusts its fingers into the candle-flame, or spills boil- 
ing water on any part of its skin, the resulting burn or 
scald is a lesson not easily forgotten. So deep an im- 
pression is produced by one or two such events, that 
afterwards no persuasion will induce it again to disre- 
gard the laws of its constitution in these ways. 

Now in these and like cases Nature illustrates to us 
in the simplest way the true theory and practice of 
moral discipline — a theory and practice which, however 
much they may seem to the superficial like those com- 
monly received, we shall find on examination to differ 
from them very widely. 

Right and Wrong in these Cases. — Observe, in the 
first place, that in bodily injuries and their penalties 
we have misconduct and its consequences reduced to 
their simplest forms. Though, according to their pop- 
ular acceptations, right and wrong are words scarcely 
applicable to actions that have none but direct bodily 
effects, yet whoever considers the matter will see that 
such actions must be as much classifiable under these 
heads as any other actions. From whatever basis they 
start, all theories of morality agree in considering that 
conduct whose total results, immediate and remote, are 
beneficial, is good conduct ; while conduct whose total 



Moral Education. 135 

results, immediate and remote, are injurious, is bad 
conduct. The happiness or misery caused by it are the 
ultimate standards by which all men judge of behavior. 
We consider drunkenness wrong because of the phys- 
ical degeneracy and accompanying moral evils entailed 
on the transgressor and his dependents. Did theft 
uniformly give pleasure both to taker and to loser, we 
should not find it in our catalogue of sins. Were it 
conceivable that benevolent actions multiplied human 
pains, we should condemn them — should not consider 
them benevolent. It needs but to read the first news- 
paper leader, or listen to any conversation touching 
social affairs, to see that acts of parliament, political 
movements, philanthropic agitations, in common with 
the doings of individuals, are judged by their antici- 
pated results in multiplying the pleasures or pains of 
men. And if on looking on all secondary superin- 
duced ideas we find these to be our ultimate tests of 
right and wrong, we cannot refuse to class purely phys- 
ical actions as right or wrong according to the bene- 
ficial or detrimental results they produce. 

The Punishment a Penalty. — Note, in the second 
place, the character of the punishments by which these 
physical transgressions are prevented. Punishments, 
we call them, in the absence of a better word ; for they 
are not punishments in the literal sense. They are not 
artificial and unnecessary inflictions of pain, but are 
simply the beneficent checks to actions that are essen- 
tially at variance with bodily welfare — checks in the 
absence of which life would quickly be destroyed by 
bodily injuries. It is the peculiarity of these penalties, 
if we must so call them, that they are nothing more 
than the unavoidable consequences of the deeds which they 
follow : they are nothing more than the inevitable re- 
actions entailed by the child's actions. 



136 Education. 

The Effect. — Let it be further borne in mind that 
these painful reactions are proportionate to the degree 
in which the organic laws have been transgressed. A 
slight accident brings a slight pain, a more serious one 
a greater pain. When a child tumbles over the door- 
step, it is not ordained that it shall suffer in excess of 
the amount necessary, with the view of making it still 
more cautious than the necessary suffering will make 
it. But from its daily experience it is left to learn the 
greater or less penalties of greater or less errors, and to 
behave accordingly. 

They Always Follow the Act. — And then mark, lastly, 
that these natural reactions which follow the child's 
wrong actions are constant, direct, unhesitating, and 
not to be escaped. No threats ; but a silent, rigorous 
performance. If a child runs a pin into its finger, pain 
follows. If it does it again, there is again the same 
result : and so on perpetually. In all its dealings with 
surrounding inorganic nature it finds this unswerving 
persistence, which listens to no excuse, and from which 
there is no appeal ; and very soon recognizing this 
stern though beneficent discipline, it becomes extremely 
careful not to transgress. 

For the Adult as for the Child Still more signifi- 
cant will these general truths appear, when we remem- 
ber that they hold throughout adult life as well as 
throughout infantine life. It is by an experimentally- 
gained knowledge of the natural consequences that 
men and women are checked when they go wrong. 
After home education has ceased, and when there are 
no longer parents and teachers to forbid this or that 
kind of conduct, there comes into play a discipline like 
that by which the young child is taught its first lessons 
in self-guidance. ' If the youth entering upon the busi- 
ness of life idles away his time and fulfils slowly or 



Moral Education. 1 3 7 

unskilfully the duties intrusted to him, there by and 
by follows the natural penalty : he is discharged, and 
left to suffer for a while the evils of relative poverty. 
On the unpunctual man, failing alike his appointments 
of business and pleasure, there continually falls the 
consequent inconveniences, losses, and deprivations. 
The avaricious tradesman who charges too high a rate 
of profit loses his customers, and so is checked in his 
greediness. Diminishing practice teaches the inatten- 
tive doctor to bestow more trouble on his patients. The 
too credulous creditor and the over-sanguine speculator 
alike learn by the difficulties which rashness entails on 
them the necessity of being more cautious in their 
engagements. And so throughout the life of every 
citizen. 

Nature's Discipline. — In the quotation so often made 
apropos of these cases — "The burnt child dreads the 
fire" — we see not only that the analogy between this 
social discipline and Nature's early discipline of infants 
is universally recognized, but we also see an implied 
conviction that this discipline is of the most efficient 
kind. Nay more, this conviction is not only implied, 
but distinctly stated. Every one has heard others con- 
fess that only by "dearly bought experience" had they 
been induced to give up some bad or foolish course of 
conduct formerly pursued. Every one has heard, in the 
criticisms passed on the doings of this spendthrift or 
the other speculator, the remark that advice was use- 
less, and that nothing but "bitter experience " would 
produce any effect : nothing, that is, but suffering the 
unavoidable consequences. And if further proof be 
needed that the penalty of the natural reaction is not 
only the most efficient, but that no humanly-devised 
penalty can replace it, we have such further proof in 
the notorious ill-success of our various penal systems. 



138 Education. 

Out of the many methods of criminal discipline that 
have been proposed and legally enforced, none have 
answered the expectations of their advocates. Not only 
have artificial punishments failed to produce reforma- 
tion, but they have in many cases increased the crimi- 
nality. The only successful reformatories are those pri- 
vately-established ones which have approximated their 
regime to the method of Nature — which have done little 
more than administer the natural consequences of crim- 
inal conduct: the natural consequences being, that by 
imprisonment or other restraint the criminal shall have 
his liberty of action diminished as much as is needful 
for the safety of society ; and that he shall be made 
to maintain himself while living under this restraint. 
Thus we see not only that the discipline by which the 
young child is so successfully taught to regulate its 
movements is also the discipline by which the great 
mass of adults are kept in order and more or less im- 
proved, but that the discipline humanly devised for 
the worst adults fails when it diverges from this divine- 
ly-ordained discipline, and begins to succeed when it 
approximates to it. 

The Guiding Principle. — Have we not here, then, the 
guiding principle of moral education? Must we not 
infer that the system so beneficent in its effects, alike 
during infancy and maturity, will be equally beneficent 
throughout youth? Can any one believe that the 
method which answers so well in the first and the last 
divisions of life will not answer in the intermediate 
division ? Is it not manifest that as " ministers and 
interpreters of Nature" it is the function of parents to 
see that their children habitually experience the true 
consequences of their conduct — the natural reactions : 
neither warding them off, nor intensifying them, nor 



Moral Education. 139 

putting artificial consequences in place of them ? No 
unprejudiced reader will hesitate in his assent. 

As it Appears in the Family — Probably, however, not 
a few will contend that already most parents do this ; 
that the punishments they inflict are, in the majority of 
cases, the true consequences of ill-conduct; that pa- 
rental anger, venting itself in harsh words and deeds, is 
the result of a child's trangressions ; and that in the 
suffering, physical or moral, which the child is subject 
to it experiences the natural reaction of its misbe- 
havior. Along with much error this assertion doubt- 
less contains some truth. It is unquestionable that the 
displeasure of fathers and mothers is a true consequence 
of juvenile delinquency, and that the manifestation of 
it is a normal check upon such delinquency. It is un- 
questionable that the scoldings and threats and blows 
which a passionate parent visits on offending little ones 
are effects actually produced in such a parent by their 
offences, and so are in some sort to be considered as 
among the natural reactions of their wrong actions. 
And we are by no means prepared to say that these 
modes of treatment are not relatively right — right, that 
is in relation to the uncontrollable children of ill-con- 
trolled adults ; and right in relation to a state of socie- 
ty in which such ill-controlled adults make up the mass 
of the people. As already suggested, educational sys- 
tems, like political and other institutions, are generally 
as good as the state of human nature permits. The 
barbarous children of barbarous parents are probably 
only to be restrained by the barbarous methods which 
such parents spontaneously employ ; while submission 
to these barbarous methods is perhaps the best prepa- 
ration such children can have for the barbarous society 
in which they are presently to play a part. Conversely, 
the civilized members of a civilized society will spon- 



140 



Education. 



taneously manifest their displeasure in less violent 
ways ; will spontaneously use milder measures — meas- 
ures strong enough for their better-natured children. 
Thus it is doubtless true that, in so far as the expression 
of parental feeling is concerned, the principle of the 
natural reaction is always more or less followed. The 
system of domestic government ever gravitates towards 
its right form. 

Two Errors. — But now observe two important facts. 
In the first place, observe that, in states of rapid tran- 
sition like ours,' which witness a long-drawn battle be- 
tween old and new theories and old and new practices, 
the educational methods in use are apt to be consider- 
ably out of harmony with the times. In deference to 
dogmas fit only for the ages that uttered them, many 
parents inflict punishments that do violence to their 
own feelings, and so visit on their children awnatural 
reactions ; while other parents, enthusiastic in their 
hopes of immediate perfection, rush to the opposite 
extreme. And then observe, in the second place, that 
the discipline on which we are insisting is not so much 
the experience of parental approbation or disapproba- 
tion, which in most cases is only a secondary conse- 
quence of a child's conduct ; but it is the experience of 
those results which would naturally flow from the con- 
duct in the absence of parental opinion or interference. 

The truly instructive and salutary consequences are 
not those inflicted by parents when they take upon 
themselves to be Nature's proxies; but they are those 
inflicted by Nature herself. We will endeavor to make 
this distinction clear by a few illustrations, which, while 
they show what we mean by natural reactions as con- 
trasted with artificial ones, will afford some directly 
practical suggestions. 



Moral Education. 141 

Application when a " Litter" is Made. — In every 
family where there are young children there almost 
daily occur cases of what mothers and servants call 
"making a litter." A child has had out its box of 
toys, and leaves them scattered about the floor. Or a 
handful of flowers, brought in from a morning walk, is 
presently seen dispersed over tables and chairs. Or a 
little girl, making doll's-clothes, disfigures the room 
with shreds. In most cases the trouble of rectifying 
this disorder falls anywhere but in the right place : if 
in the nursery, the nurse herself, with many grumblings 
about "tiresome little things," etc., undertakes the 
task ; if below stairs, the task usually devolves either 
on one of the elder children or on the housemaid ; the 
transgressor being visited with nothing more than a 
scolding. In this very simple case, however, there are 
many parents wise enough to follow out, more or less 
consistently, the normal course — that of making the 
child itself collect the toys or shreds. 

The labor of putting things in order is the true con- 
sequence of having put them in disorder. Every trader 
in his office, every wife in her household, has daily 
experience of this fact. And if education be a prepara- 
tion for the business of life, then every child should 
also, from the beginning, have daily experience of this 
fact. If the natural penalty be met by any refractory 
behavior (which it may perhaps be where the general 
system of moral discipline previously pursued has been 
bad), then the proper course is to let the child feel the 
ulterior reaction consequent on its disobedience. Hav- 
ing refused or neglected to pick up and put away the 
things it has scattered about, and having thereby 
entailed the trouble of doing this on some one else, the 
child should, on subsequent occasions, be denied the 
means of giving this trouble. When next it petitions 



142 Education. 

for its toy-box, the reply of its mamma should be, 
" The last time you had your toys you left them lying 
on the floor, and Jane had to pick them up. Jane is 
too busy to pick up every day the things you leave 
about ; and I cannot do it myself. So that, as you will 
not put away your toys when you have done with them, 
I cannot let you have them." 

Effect of the Penalty.— This is obviously a natural 
consequence, neither increased nor lessened, and must 
be so recognized by a child. The penalty comes, too, 
at the moment when it is most keenly felt. A new- 
born desire is balked at the moment of anticipated 
gratification, and the strong impression so produced 
can scarcely fail to have an effect on the future con- 
duct, — an effect which, by consistent repetition, will do 
whatever can be done in curing the fault. Add to 
which, that by this method a child is early taught the 
lesson which cannot be learnt too soon, that in this 
world of ours pleasures are rightly to be obtained only 
by labor. 

Application to Tardiness. — Take another case. Not 
long since we had frequently to listen to the repri- 
mands visited on a little girl who was scarcely ever 
ready in time for the daily walk. Of eager disposition, 
and apt to become thoroughly absorbed in the occupa- 
tion of the moment, Constance never thought of putting 
on her things until the rest were ready. The governess 
and the other children had almost invariably to wait ; 
and from the mamma there almost invariably came the 
same scolding. Utterly as this system failed, it never 
occurred to the mamma to let Constance experience the 
natural penalty. Nor, indeed, would she try it when it 
was suggested to her. In the world the penalty of 
being behind time is the loss of some advantage that 
would else have been gained : the train is gone ; or the 



Moral Education. 143 

steamboat is just leaving its moorings ; or the best 
things in the market are sold ; or all the good seats in 
the concert-room are filled. And every one, in cases 
perpetually occurring, may see that it is the prospective 
deprivations entailed by being too late which prevent 
people from being too late. Is not the inference ob- 
vious? Should not these prospective deprivations con- 
trol the child's conduct also? If Constance is not 
ready at the appointed time, the natural result is that 
of being left behind, and losing her walk. And no one 
can, we think, doubt that after having once or twice 
remained at home while the rest were enjoying them- 
selves in the fields, and after having felt that this loss 
of a much-prized gratification was solely due to want 
of promptitude, some amendment would take place. 
At any rate, the measure would be more effective than 
that perpetual scolding which ends only in producing 
callousness. 

Application to Injuries Done. — Again, when children, 
with more than usual carelessness, break or lose the 
things given to them, the natural penalty — the penalty 
which makes grown-up persons more careful — is the con- 
sequent inconvenience. The want of the lost or dam- 
aged article and the cost of supplying its place are the 
experiences by which men and women are disciplined in 
these matters ; and the experience of children should be 
as much as possible assimilated to theirs. We do not 
refer to that early period at which toys are pulled to 
pieces in the process of learning their physical proper- 
ties, and at which the results of carelessness cannot be 
understood ; but to a later period, when the meaning 
and advantages of property are perceived. When a boy 
old enough to possess a penknife uses it so roughly as to 
snap the blade, or leaves it in the grass by some hedge- 
side where he was cutting a stick, a thoughtless parent 



144 Education. 

or some indulgent relative will commonly forthwith buy 
him another, not seeing that by doing this a valuable 
lesson is lost. In such a case a father may properly 
explain that penknives cost money, and that to get 
money requires labor ; that he cannot afford to pur- 
chase new penknives for one who loses or breaks them ; 
and that until he sees evidence of greater carefulness 
he must decline to make good the loss. A parallel dis- 
cipline may be used as a means of checking extrava- 
gance. 

Above Artificial Penalties. — These few familar in- 
stances, here chosen because of the simplicity with 
which they illustrate our point, will make clear to every 
one the distinction between those natural penalties 
which we contend are the truly efficient ones, and 
those artificial penalties which parents commonly sub- 
stitute for them. Before going on to exhibit the higher 
and subtler applications of this principle, let us note its 
many and great superiorities over the principle, or rather 
the empirical practice, which prevails in most families. 

Ideas Formed of Cause and Effect.— In the first place, 
right conceptions of cause and effect are early formed, 
and by frequent and consistent experience are eventu- 
ally rendered definite and complete. Proper conduct 
in life is much better guaranteed when the good and 
evil consequences of actions are rationally understood 
than when they are merely believed on authority. A 
child who finds that disorderliness entails the subse- 
quent trouble of putting things in order, or who misses 
a gratification from dilatoriness, or whose want of care 
is followed by the loss or breakage of some much-prized 
possession, not only experiences a keenly-felt conse- 
quence, but gains a knowledge of causation ; both the 
one and the other being just like those which adult life 
will bring. Whereas a child who in such cases receives 



Moral Education. 145 

some reprimand or some factitious penalty not only 
experiences a consequence for which it often cares very 
little, but lacks that instruction respecting the essential 
natures of good and evil conduct which it would else 
have gathered. 

Effect of Wrong Standards. — It is a vice of the common 
system of artificial rewards and punishments, long since 
noticed by the clear-sighted, that by substituting for 
the natural results of misbehavior certain threatened 
tasks or castigations, it produces a radically wrong 
standard of moral guidance. Having throughout in- 
fancy and boyhood always regarded parental or tutorial 
displeasure as the result of a forbidden action, the youth 
has gained an established association of ideas between 
such action and such displeasure, as cause and effect ; 
and consequently when parents and tutors have abdi- 
cated, and their displeasure is not to be feared, the 
restraint on a forbidden action is in great measure 
removed : the true restraints, the natural reactions, 
having yet to be learnt by sad experience. As writes one 
who has had personal knowledge of this short-sighted 
system : "Young men let loose from school, particularly 
those whose parents have neglected to exert their influ- 
ence, plunge into every description of extravagance : 
they know no rule of action, they are ignorant of the 
reasons for moral conduct, they have no foundation to 
rest upon, and until they have been severely disciplined 
by the world are extremely dangerous members of 
society." 

Founded on Justice. — Another great advantage of this 
natural system of discipline is, that it is a system of 
pure justice, and will be recognized by every child as 
such. Whoso suffers nothing more than the evil which 
obviously follows naturally from his own misbehavior, 
is much less likely to think himself wrongly treated 



146 Education. 

than if he suffers an evil artificially inflicted on him ; 
and this will be true of children as of men. Take the 
case of a boy who is habitually reckless of his clothes — 
scrambles through hedges without caution, or is utterly 
regardless of mud. If he is beaten or sent to bed he is 
apt to regard himself as ill-used ; and his mind is more 
likely to be occupied by thinking over his injuries than 
repenting of his trangressions. But suppose he is re- 
quired to rectify as far as he can the harm he has done 
— to clean off the mud with which he has covered him- 
self, or to mend the tear as well as he can. Will he not 
feel that the evil is one of his own producing ? Will he 
not while paying this penalty be continuously conscious 
of the connection between it and its cause ? And will 
he not, spite his irritation, recognize more or less clearly 
the justice of the arrangement ? If several lessons of this 
kind fail to produce amendment ; if suits of clothes are 
prematurely spoiled ; if, pursuing this same system of 
discipline, a father declines to spend money for new ones 
until the ordinary time has elapsed ; and if, meanwhile, 
there occur occasions on which, having no decent clothes 
to go in, the boy is debarred from joining the rest of 
the family on holiday excursions and fete days, — it is 
manifest that while he will keenly feel the punishment, 
he can scarcely fail to trace the chain of causation, and 
to perceive that his own carelessness is the origin of it ; 
and seeing this, he will not have that same sense of in- 
justice as when there is no obvious connection between 
the transgression and its penalty. 

The Punishment Does not Come from the Parent. — 
Again, the tempers both of parents and children are 
much less liable to be ruffled under this system than 
under the ordinary system. Instead of letting children 
experience the painful results which naturally follow 
from wrong conduct, the usual course pursued by 



Moral Education. 147 

parents is to inflict themselves certain other painful 
results. A double mischief arises from this. Making, 
as they do, multiplied family laws, and identifying 
their own supremacy and dignity with the maintenance 
of these laws, it happens that every transgression 
comes to be regarded as an offence against themselves, 
and a cause of anger on their part. Add to which the 
further irritations which result from taking upon them- 
selves, in the shape of extra labor or cost, those evil 
consequences which should have been allowed to fall 
on the wrong-doers. Similarly with the children. 
Penalties which the necessary reaction of things brings 
round upon them — penalties which are inflicted by im- 
personal agency, produce an irritation that is compara- 
tively slight and transient ; whereas penalties which 
are voluntarily inflicted by a parent, and are afterwards 
remembered as caused by him or her, produce an irri- 
tation both greater and more continued. Just consider 
how disastrous .would be the result if this empirical 
method were pursued from the beginning. Suppose it 
were possible for parents to take upon themselves the 
physical sufferings entailed on their children by igno- 
rance and awkwardness ; and that while bearing these 
evil consequences they visited on their children certain 
other evil consequences, with the view of teaching them 
the impropriety of their conduct. Suppose that when 
a child, who had been forbidden to meddle with the 
kettle, spilt some boiling water on its foot, the mother 
vicariously assumed the scald and gave a blow in place 
of it ; and similarly in all other cases. Would not the 
daily mishaps be sources of far more anger than now? 
Would not there be chronic ill-temper on both sides? 
Yet an exactly parallel policy is pursued in after years. 
A father who punishes his boy for carelessly or wilfully 
breaking a sister's toy, and then himself pays for a new 



148 Education. 

toy, does substantially this same thing — inflict an arti- 
ficial penalty on the transgressor, and takes the natural 
penalty on himself: his own feelings and those of the 
transgressor being alike needlessly irritated. If he 
simply required restitution to be made, he would pro- 
duce far less heartburning. If he told the boy that a 
new toy must be bought at his, the boy's, cost, and that 
his supply of pocket-money must be withheld to the 
needful extent, there would be much less cause for 
ebullition of temper on either side ; while in the dep- 
rivation afterwards felt the boy would experience the 
equitable and salutary consequence. In brief, the sys- 
tem of discipline by natural reactions is less injurious 
to temper, alike because it is perceived on both sides to 
be nothing more than pure justice, and because it more 
or less substitutes the impersonal agency of nature for 
the personal agency of parents. 

The Parent is Held in Esteem. — Whence also follows 
the manifest corollary, that under this system the 
parental and filial relation will be a more friendly and 
therefore a more influential one. Whether in parent or 
child, anger, however caused, and to whomsoever di- 
rected, is more or less detrimental. But anger in a 
parent towards a child and in a child towards a parent 
is especially detrimental, because it weakens that bond 
of sympathy which is essential to a beneficent control. 
In virtue of the general law of association of ideas, it 
inevitably results, both in young and old, that dislike is 
contracted towards things which in our experience are 
habitually connected with disagreeable feelings. Or 
where attachment originally existed, it is weakened, or 
destroyed, or turned into repugnance, according to the 
quantity of painful impressions received. 

Parents who Punish are Disliked. — Parental wrath, 
with its accompanying reprimands and castigations, 



Moral Education. 149 

cannot fail, if often repeated, to produce filial alienation; 
while the resentment and sulkiness of children cannot 
fail to weaken the affection felt for them, and may even 
end in destroying it. Hence the numerous cases in which 
parents (and especially fathers, who are commonly de- 
puted to express the anger and inflict the punishment) 
are regarded with indifference, if not with aversion ; 
and hence the equally numerous cases in which children 
are looked upon as inflictions. Seeing, then, as all 
must do, that estrangement of this kind is fatal to a 
salutary moral culture, it follows that parents cannot 
be too solicitous in avoiding occasions of direct antag- 
onism with their children — occasions of personal resent- 
ment. And therefore they cannot too anxiously avail 
themselves of this discipline of natural consequences — - 
this system of letting the penalty be inflicted by the 
laws of things ; which, by saving the parent from the 
function of a penal agent, prevents these mutual exas- 
perations and estrangements. 

This Method has Many Advantages Thus we see 

that this method of moral culture by experience of the 
normal reactions, which is the divinely-ordained method 
alike for infancy and for adult life, is equally applicable 
during the intermediate childhood and youth. And 
among the advantages of this method we see — 

First. That it gives that rational comprehension of 
right and wrong conduct which results from actual ex- 
perience of the good and bad consequences caused by 
them. 

Second. That the child, suffering nothing more than 
the painful effects brought upon it by its own wrong 
actions, must recognize more or less clearly the justice 
of the penalties. 

Third. That, recognizing the justice of the penalties, 
and receiving those penalties through the working of 



150 Education. 

things, rather than at the hands of an individual, its 
temper will be less disturbed ; while the parent occupy- 
ing the comparatively passive position of taking care 
that the natural penalties are felt, will preserve a com- 
parative equanimity. 

Fourth. That mutual exasperation being thus in 
great measure prevented, a much happier and a more 
influential state of feeling will exist between parent 
and child. 

As to Serious Misconduct.—" But what is to be done 
with more serious misconduct ? " some will ask. " How 
is this plan to be carried out when a petty theft has 
been committed ? or when a lie has been told ? or when 
some younger brother or sister has been ill-used ?" 

Before replying to these questions, let us consider the 
bearings of a few illustrative facts. 

Example of Penalty for Disobedience. — Living in the 
family of his brother-in-law, a friend of ours had under- 
taken the education of his little nephew and niece. 
This he had conducted, more perhaps from natural 
sympathy than from reasoned-out conclusions, in the 
spirit of the method above set forth. The two children 
were in-doors his pupils and out-of-doors his compan- 
ions. They daily joined him in walks and botanizing 
excursions, eagerly sought out plants for him, looked 
on while he examined and identified them, and in this 
and other ways were ever gaining both pleasure and 
instruction in his society. In short, morally considered, 
he stood to them much more in the position of parent 
than either their father or mother did. Describing to 
us the results of this policy, he gave, among other in- 
stances, the following. One evening, having need for 
some article lying in another part of the house, he asked 
his nephew to fetch it for him. Deeply interested as 
the boy was in some amusement of the moment, he, 



Moral Education. 151 

contrary to his wont, either exhibited great reluctance 
or refused, we forget which. His uncle, disapproving 
of a coercive course, fetched it himself, merely exhibit- 
ing by his manner the annoyance this ill-behavior gave 
him. And when, later in the evening, the boy made 
overtures for the usual play, they were gravely repelled 
— the uncle manifested just that coldness of feeling 
naturally produced in him, and so let the boy experi- 
ence the necessary consequences of his conduct. Next 
morning at the usual time for rising, our friend heard a 
new voice outside the door, and in walked his little 
nephew with the hot water ; and then the boy, peering 
about the room to see what else could be done, ex- 
claimed, " Oh ! you want your boots," and forthwith 
rushed downstairs to fetch them. In this and other 
ways he showed a true penitence for his misconduct ; 
he endeavored by unusual services to make up for the 
service he had refused ; his higher feelings had of them- 
selves conquered his lower ones, and acquired strength 
by the conquest ; and he valued more than before the 
friendship he thus regained. 

Other Examples. — This gentleman is now himself a 
father, acts on the same system, and finds it answer 
completely. He makes himself thoroughly his chil- 
dren's friend. The evening is longed for by them be- 
cause he will be at home ; and they especially enjoy the 
Sunday because he is with them all day. Thus possess- 
ing their perfect confidence and affection, he finds that 
the simple display of his approbation or disapprobation 
gives him abundant power of control. If on his return 
home he hears that one of his boys has been naughty, 
he behaves towards him with that comparative coldness 
which the consciousness of the boy's misconduct natu- 
rally produces ; and he finds this a most efficient punish- 
ment. The mere withholding of the usual caresses is a 



152 Education. 

source of the keenest distress — produces a much more 
prolonged fit of crying than a beating would do. And 
the dread of this purely moral penalty is, he says, ever 
present during his absence : so much so, that frequently 
during the day his children inquire of their mamma 
how they have behaved, and whether the report will be 
good. Recently, the eldest, an active urchin of five, in 
one of those bursts of animal spirits common in healthy 
children, committed sundry extravagances during his 
mamma's absence — cut off part of his brother's hair and 
wounded himself with a razor taken from his father's 
dressing-case. Hearing of these occurrences on his re- 
turn, the father did not speak to the boy either that 
night or next morning. Not only was the tribulation 
great, but the subsequent effect was, that when, a few 
days after, the mamma was about to go out, she was 
earnestly entreated by the boy not to do so ; and on 
inquiry, it appeared his fear was that he might again 
transgress in her absence. 

True Relation of Parent and Child. — We have in- 
troduced these facts before replying to the question, 
"What is to be done with the graver offences?" for the 
purpose of first exhibiting the relation that may and 
ought to be established between parents and children ; 
for on the existence of this relation depends the suc- 
cessful treatment of these graver offences. And as a 
further preliminary we must now point out that the 
establishment of this relation will result from adopting 
the system we advocate. Already we have shown that 
by letting a child experience simply the painful reac- 
tions of its own wrong actions a parent in great measure 
avoids assuming the attitude of an enemy, and escapes 
being regarded as one ; but it still remains to be shown 
that where this course has been consistently pursued 



Moral Education. 153 

from the beginning a strong feeling of active friend- 
ship will be generated. 

Ordinary Relation — Its Effect. — At present mothers 
and fathers are mostly considered by their offspring as 
friend-enemies. Determined as their impressions inevi- 
tably are by the treatment they receive, and oscillating 
as that treatment does between bribery and thwart- 
ing, between petting and scolding, between gentleness 
and castigation, children necessarily acquire conflicting 
beliefs respecting the parental character. A mother 
commonly thinks it quite sufficient to tell her little boy 
that she is his best friend ; and assuming that he is in 
duty bound to believe her, concludes that he will forth- 
with do so. " It is all for your good ;" "I know what 
is proper for you better than you do yourself;" "You 
are not old enough to understand it now, but when you 
grow up you will thank me for doing what I do ; " — 
these, and like assertions, are daily reiterated. Mean- 
while the boy is daily suffering positive penalties, and 
is hourly forbidden to do this, that, and the other, 
which he was anxious to do. By words he hears that 
his happiness is the end in view ; but from the ac- 
companying deeds he habitually receives more or less 
pain. Utterly incompetent as he is to understand that 
future which his mother has in view, or how this treat- 
ment conduces to the happiness of that future, he 
judges by such results as he feels ; and finding these 
results anything but pleasurable, he becomes sceptical 
respecting these professions of friendship. And is it 
not folly to expect any other issue ? Must not the child 
judge by such evidence as he has got? and does not 
this evidence seem to warrant his conclusion ? The 
mother would reason in just the same way if similarly 
placed. If in the circle of her acquaintance she found 
some one who was constantly thwarting her wishes, 



154 Education. 

uttering sharp reprimands, and occasionally inflicting 
actual penalties on her, she would pay but little atten- 
tion to any professions of anxiety for her welfare which 
accompanied these acts. Why, then, does she suppose 
that her boy will conclude otherwise ? 

Application of the Principle — But now observe how 
different will be the results if the system we contend 
for be consistently pursued — if the mother not only 
avoids becoming the instrument of punishment, but 
plays the part of a friend, by warning her boy of the 
punishments which Nature will inflict. Take a case ; 
and that it may illustrate the mode in which this policy 
is to be early initiated, let it be one of the simplest 
cases. Suppose that, prompted by the experimental 
spirit so conspicuous in children, whose proceedings in- 
stinctively conform to the inductive method of inquiry 
— suppose that so prompted the child is amusing him- 
self by lighting pieces of paper in the candle and 
watching them burn. If his mother is of the ordinary 
unreflective stamp, she will either, on the plea of keep- 
ing the child " out of mischief," or from fear that he 
will burn himself, command him to desist ; and in case 
of non-compliance will snatch the paper from him. On 
the other hand, should he be so fortunate as to have a 
mother of sufficient rationality, who knows that this 
interest with which the child is watching the paper 
burn results from a healthy inquisitiveness, without 
which he would never have emerged out of infantine 
stupidity, and who is also wise enough to consider the 
moral results of interference, she will reason thus : " If 
I put a stop to this I shall prevent the acquirement of 
a certain amount of knowledge. It is true that I may 
save the child from a burn ; but what then ? He is sure 
to burn himself some time ; and it is quite essential to 
his safety in life that he should learn by experience the 



Moral Education. 155 

properties of flame. Moreover, if I forbid him from 
running this present risk, he is sure hereafter to run 
the same or a greater risk when no one is present lo 
prevent him ; whereas, if he should have any accident 
now that I am by, I can save him from any great injury ; 
add to which the advantage that he will have in future 
some dread of fire, and will be less likely to burn him- 
self to death, or set the house in a flame when others 
are absent. 

" Furthermore, were I to make him desist, I should 
thwart him in the pursuit of what is in itself a purely 
harmless, and indeed instructive, gratification ; and he 
would be sure to regard me with more or less ill-feel- 
ing. Ignorant as he is of the pain from which I would 
save him, and feeling only the pain of a balked desire, 
he could not fail to look upon rr.e as the cause of that 
pain. To save him from a hurt which he cannot con- 
ceive, and which has therefore no existence for him, I 
inflict upon him a hurt which he feels keenly enough ; 
and so become, from his point of view, a minister of 
evil. 

" My best course, then, is simply to warn him of the 
danger, and to be ready to prevent any serious damage." 
And following out this conclusion, she says to the child, 
" I fear you will hurt yourself if you do that." Sup- 
pose, now, that the child perseveres, as he will very 
probably do ; and suppose that he ends by burning 
himself. What are the results ? In the first place he 
has gained an experience which he must gain eventually, 
and which for his own safety he cannot gain too soon. 
And in the second place he has found that his mother's 
disapproval or warning was meant for his welfare : he 
has a further positive experience of her benevolence, a 
further reason for placing confidence in her judgment 
and her kindness, a further reason for loving her. 



156 Education. 

The Parent an Adviser. — Of course in those occasional 
hazards where there is a risk of broken limbs or other 
serious bodily injury forcible prevention is called for. 
But leaving out these extreme cases, the system pur- 
sued should be not that of guarding a child against the 
small dangers into which it daily runs, but that of 
advising and warning it against them. And by consist- 
ently pursuing this course a much stronger filial affec- 
tion will be generated than commonly exists. If here, 
as elsewhere, the discipline of the natural reactions is 
allowed to come into play ; if in all those out-of-door 
scramblings and in-door experiments, by which chil- 
dren are liable to hurt themselves, they are allowed to 
persevere, subject only to dissuasion more or less ear- 
nest according to the risk, — there cannot fail to arise 
an ever-increasing faith in the parental friendship and 
guidance. 

Parents Avoid Odium. — Not only, as before shown, 
does the adoption of this principle enable fathers and 
mothers to avoid the chief part of that odium which 
attaches to the infliction of positive punishment ; but, 
as we here see, it enables them further to avoid the 
odium that attaches to constant thwartings, and even 
to turn each of those incidents which commonly cause 
squabbles into a means of strengthening the mutual 
good feeling. Instead of being told in words, which 
deeds seem to contradict, that their parents are their 
best friends, children will learn this truth by a consist- 
ent daily experience ; and so learning it, will acquire a 
degree of trust and attachment which nothing else can 
give. 

As to Grave Offences. — And now having indicated the 
much more sympathetic relation which must result from 
the habitual use of this method, let us return to the 



Moral Education. 157 

question above put : How is this method to be applied 
to the graver offences ? 

Less Frequent under this System. — Note, in the first 
place, that these graver offences are likely to be both 
less frequent and less grave under the regime we have 
described than under the ordinary regime. The perpet- 
ual ill-behavior of many children is itself the conse- 
quence of that chronic irritation in which they are kept 
by bad management. The state of isolation and an- 
tagonism produced by frequent punishment necessarily 
deadens the sympathies ; necessarily, therefore, opens 
the way to those transgressions which the sympathies 
should check. That harsh treatment which children of 
the same family inflict on each other is often, in great 
measure, a reflex of the harsh treatment they receive 
from adults — partly suggested by direct example, and 
partly generated by the ill-temper and the tendency to 
vicarious retaliation which follow chastisements and 
scoldings. It cannot be questioned that the greater 
activity of the affections and happier state of feeling, 
maintained in children by the discipline we have de- 
scribed, must prevent their sins against each other from 
being either so great or so frequent. Moreover, the 
still more reprehensible offences, as lies and petty thefts, 
will by the same causes be diminished. Domestic es- 
trangement is a fruitful source of such transgressions. 
It is a law of human nature, visible enough to all who 
observe, that those who are debarred the higher grati- 
fications fall back upon the lower ; those who have no 
sympathetic pleasures seek selfish ones ; and hence, 
conversely, the maintenance of happier relations be- 
tween parents and children is calculated to diminish the 
number of those offences of which selfishness is the 
origin. 



158 Education. 

Application of the System. — When, however, such of- 
fences are committed, as they will occasionally be even 
under the best system, the discipline of consequences 
may still be resorted to ; and if there exist that bond of 
confidence and affection which we have described, this 
discipline will be found efficient. For what are the 
natural consequences, say, of a theft? They are of two 
kinds — direct and indirect. The direct consequence, as 
dictated by pure equity, is that of making restitution. 
An absolutely just ruler (and every parent should aim 
to be one) will demand that, wherever it is possible, a 
wrong act shall be undone by a right one ; and in the 
case of theft this implies either the restoration of the 
thing stolen, or, if it is consumed, then the giving of an 
equivalent— which in the case of a child maybe effected 
out of its pocket-money. The indirect and more serious 
consequence is the grave displeasure of parents — a con- 
sequence which inevitably follows among all peoples 
sufficiently civilized to regard theft as a crime ; and 
the manifestation of this displeasure is, in this instance, 
the most severe of the natural reactions produced by 
the wrong action. 

" But," it will be said, " the manifestation of parental 
displeasure, either in words or blows, is the ordinary 
course in these cases : the method leads here to nothing 
new." Very true. Already we have admitted that, in 
some directions, this method is spontaneously pursued. 
Already we have shown that there is a more or less 
manifest tendency for educational systems to gravitate 
towards the true system. And here we may remark, as 
before, that the intensity of this natural reaction will, 
in the beneficent order of things, adjust itself to the 
requirements — that this parental displeasure will vent 
itself in violent measures during comparatively barbar- 
ous times, when the children are also comparatively 



Moral Education. 159 

barbarous ; and will express itself less cruelly in those 
more advanced social states in which, by implication, 
the children are amenable to milder treatment. 

When Parental Displeasure will be Effective But 

what it chiefly concerns us here to observe is, that the 
manifestation of strong parental displeasure, produced 
by one of these graver offences, will be potent for good 
just in proportion to the warmth of the attachment 
existing between parent and child. Just in proportion 
as the discipline of the natural consequences has been 
consistently pursued in other cases will it be efficient 
in this case. Proof is within the experience of all, if 
they will look for it. 

For does not every man know that when he has 
offended another person, the amount of genuine regret 
he feels (of course, leaving worldly considerations out 
of the question) varies with the degree of sympathy he 
has for that person ? Is he not conscious that when the 
person offended stands to him in the position of an en- 
emy, the having given him annoyance is apt to be a 
source rather of secret satisfaction than of sorrow? 
Does he not remember that where umbrage has been 
taken by some total stranger he has felt much less 
concern than he would have done had such umbrage 
been taken by one with whom he was intimate ? While, 
conversely, has not the anger of an admired and cher- 
ished friend been regarded by him as a serious misfor- 
tune, long and keenly regretted ? 

Parental Love a Check — Clearly, then, the effects of 
parental displeasure upon children must similarly de- 
pend upon the pre-existing relationship. Where there 
is an established alienation, the feeling of a child who 
has transgressed is a purely selfish fear of the evil con- 
sequences likely to fall upon it in the shape of physical 
penalties or deprivations ; and after these evil conse- 



160 Education. 

quences have been inflicted, there are aroused an antag- 
onism and dislike which are morally injurious, and tend 
further to increase the alienation. On the contrary, 
where there exists a warm filial affection produced by 
a consistent parental friendship — a friendship not dog- 
matically asserted as an excuse for punishments and 
denials, but daily exhibited in ways that a child can 
comprehend — a friendship which avoids needless thwart- 
ings, which warns against impending evil consequences, 
and which sympathizes with juvenile pursuits — there 
the state of mind caused by parental displeasure will 
not only be salutary as a check to future misconduct of 
like kind, but will also be intrinsically salutary. The 
moral pain consequent upon having, for the time being, 
lost so loved a friend will stand in place of the physical 
pain usually inflicted ; and where this attachment exists, 
will prove equally, if not more, efficient. While instead 
of the fear and vindictiveness excited by the one course, 
there will be excited by the other more or less of sym- 
pathy with parental sorrow, a genuine regret for having 
caused it, and a desire, by some atonement, to re-estab- 
lish the habitual friendly relationship. Instead of 
bringing into play those purely egotistic feelings whose 
predominance is the cause of criminal acts, there will 
be brought into play those altruistic feelings which 
check criminal acts. Thus the discipline of the natural 
consequences is applicable to grave as well as trivial 
faults ; and the practice of it conduces not simply to 
the repression, but to the eradication of such faults. 

Harshness does not Reform. — In brief, the truth is 
that savageness begets savageness, and gentleness be- 
gets gentleness. Children who are unsympathetically 
treated become relatively unsympathetic ; whereas 
treating them with due fellow-feeling is a means of 
cultivating their fellow-feeling. With family govern- 



Moral Education. 161 

ments as with political ones, a harsh despotism itself 
generates a great part of the crimes it has to repress ; 
while conversely a mild and liberal rule not only avoids 
many causes of dissension, but so ameliorates the tone 
of feeling as to diminish the tendency to transgression. 

Locke. — As John Locke long since remarked, " Great 
severity of punishment does but very little good, nay, 
great harm, in education ; and I believe it will be found 
that, ceteris paribus, those children who have been most 
chastised seldom make the best men." 

Prisoners who are Whipped — In confirmation of 
which opinion we may cite the fact, not long since made 
public by Mr. Rogers, Chaplain of the Pentonville 
Prison, that those juvenile criminals who have been 
whipped are those who most frequently return to 
prison. On the other hand, as exhibiting the beneficial 
effects of a kinder treatment, we will instance the fact 
stated to us by a French lady, in whose house we re- 
cently stayed in Paris. Apologizing for the disturb- 
ance daily caused by a little boy who was unmanageable 
both at home and at school, she expressed her fear that 
there was no remedy save that which had succeeded in 
the case of an elder brother ; namely, sending him to 
an English school. She explained that at various 
schools in Paris this elder brother had proved utterly 
untractable ; that in despair they had followed the 
advice to send him to England ; and that on his return 
home he was as good as he had before been bad. And 
this remarkable change she ascribed entirely to the 
comparative mildness of the English discipline. 

After this exposition of principles, our remaining 
space may best be occupied by a few of the chief 
maxims and rules deducible from them ; and with a 
view to brevity we will put these in a more or less hor- 
tatory form. 



162 Education. 

Moral Goodness not to be Expected. — Do not expect 
from a child any great amount of moral goodness. 
During early years every civilized man passes through 
that phase of character exhibited by the barbarous 
race from which he is descended. As the child's fea- 
tures — flat nose, forward-opening nostrils, large lips, 
wide-apart eyes, absent frontal sinus, etc. — resemble for 
a time those of the savage, so, too, do his instincts. 
Hence the tendencies to cruelty, to thieving, to lying, 
so general among children— tendencies which, even 
without the aid of discipline, will become more or less 
modified just as the features do. The popular idea 
that children are " innocent," while it may be true in so 
far as it refers to evil knowledge, is totally false in so far 
as it refers to evil impulses, as half an hour's observation 
in the nursery will prove to any one. Boys when left 
to themselves, as at a public school, treat each other 
far more brutally than men do ; and were they left to 
themselves at an earlier age their brutality would be 
still more conspicuous. 

Nor to Aim at Moral Precocity. — Not only is it un- 
wise to set up a high standard for juvenile good con- 
duct, but it is even unwise to use very urgent incite- 
ments to such good conduct. Already most people 
recognize the detrimental results of intellectual pre- 
cocity; but there remains to be recognized the truth 
that there is a moral precocity which is also detrimental. 
Our higher moral faculties, like our higher intellectual 
ones, are comparatively complex. By consequence they 
are both comparatively late in their evolution. And 
with the one as with the other, a very early activity 
produced by stimulation will be at the expense of the 
future character. Hence the not uncommon fact that 
those who during childhood were instanced as models 
of juvenile goodness by and by undergo some disas- 



Moral Education. 163 

trous and seemingly inexplicable change, and end by 
being not above but below par; while relatively ex- 
emplary men are often the issue of a childhood by no 
means so promising. 

Moderate Results to be Aimed at. — Be content, there- 
fore, with moderate measures and moderate results. 
Constantly bear in mind the fact that a higher morality, 
like a higher intelligence, must be reached by a slow 
growth; and you will then have more patience with 
those imperfections of nature which your child hourly 
displays. You will be less prone to that constant scold- 
ing, and threatening, and forbidding, by which many 
parents induce a chronic domestic irritation, in the 
foolish hope that they will thus make their children 
what they should be. 

Let the Child have the Discipline of Experience. — 
This comparatively liberal form of domestic govern- 
ment, which does not seek despotically to regulate all 
the details of a child's conduct, necessarily results from 
the system for which we have been contending. Satisfy 
yourself with seeing that your child always suffers the 
natural consequences of his actions, and you will avoid 
that excess of control in which so many parents err. 
Leave him wherever you can to the discipline of ex- 
perience, and you will so save him from that hothouse 
•virtue which over-regulation produces in yielding na- 
tures, or that demoralizing antagonism which it pro- 
duces in independent ones. 

Effect on Parents. — By aiming in all cases to admin- 
ister the natural reactions to your child's actions, you 
will put an advantageous check upon your own temper. 
The method of moral education pursued by many, we 
fear by most, parents is little else than that of venting 
their anger in the way that first suggests itself. The 
slaps and rough shakings and sharp words with 



1 64 Education. 

which a mother commonly visits her offspring's small 
offences (many of them not offences considered intrin- 
sically) are very generally but the manifestations of 
her own ill-controlled feelings — result much more from 
the promptings of those feelings than from a wish to 
benefit the offenders. While they are injurious to her 
own character, these ebullitions tend, by alienating her 
children and by decreasing their respect for her, to 
diminish her influence over them. But by pausing in 
each case of transgression to consider what is the 
natural consequence, and how that natural consequence 
may best be brought home to the transgressor, some 
little time is necessarily obtained for the mastery of 
yourself ; the mere blind anger first aroused in you set- 
tles down into a less vehement feeling, and one not so 
likely to mislead you. 

The Parent must Sympathize with the Child.— Do 
not, however, seek to behave as an utterly passionless 
instrument. Remember that besides the natural conse- 
quences of your child's conduct which the working of 
things tends to bring round on him, your own approba- 
tion or disapprobation is also a natural consequence, 
and one of the ordained agencies for guiding him. The 
terror which we have been combating is that of substi- 
tuting parental displeasure and its artificial penalties for 
the penalties which nature has established. But while 
it should not be substituted for these natural penalties, 
it by no means follows that it should not, in some form, 
accompa?iy them. The secondary kind of punishment 
should not usurp the place of the primary kind ; but, in 
moderation, it may rightly supplement the primary 
kind. Such amount of disapproval or sorrow or in- 
dignation as you feel should be expressed in words or 
manner or otherwise ; subject, of course, to the ap- 
proval of your judgment. The degree and kind of 



Moral Education. 165 

feeling produced in you will necessarily depend upon 
your own character, and it is therefore useless to say it 
should be this or that. All that can be recommended 
is, that you should aim to modify the feeling into that 
which you believe ought to be entertained. Beware, 
however, of the two extremes — not only in respect of 
the intensity, but in respect of the duration of your dis- 
pleasure. On the one hand, anxiously avoid that weak 
impulsiveness, so general among mothers, which scolds 
and forgives almost in the same breath. On the other 
hand, do not unduly continue to show estrangement of 
feeling, lest you accustom your child to do without 
your friendship and so lose your influence over him. 
The moral reactions called forth from you by your 
child's actions you should as much as possible assimi- 
late to those which you conceive would be called forth 
from a parent of perfect nature. 

Few Commands. — Be sparing of commands. Com- 
mand only in those cases in which other means are in- 
applicable, or have failed. " In frequent orders the 
parent's advantage is more considered than the child's," 
says Richter. As in primitive societies a breach of law 
is punished, not so much because it is intrinsically 
wrong as because it is a disregard of the king's author- 
ity — a rebellion against him, so in many families the 
penalty visited on a transgressor proceeds less from rep- 
robation of the offence than from anger at the disobe- 
dience. Listen, to the ordinary speeches — " How dare 
you disobey me?" "I tell you I'll make you do it, sir." 
" I'll soon teach you who is master" — and then consider 
what the words, the tone, and the manner imply. A 
determination to subjugate is much more conspicuous 
in them than an anxiety for the child's welfare. For 
the time being the attitude of mind differs but little 
from that of the despot bent on punishing a recalcitrant 



166 Education. 

subject. The right-feeling parent, however, like the 
philanthropic legislator, will not rejoice in coercion, but 
will rejoice in dispensing with coercion. He will do 
without law in all cases where other modes of regulat- 
ing conduct can be successfully employed ; and he will 
regret the having recourse to law when it is necessary. 
As Richter remarks — " The best rule in politics is said 
to be ' pas trop gouverner' : it is also true in education." 
And in spontaneous conformity with this maxim, par- 
ents whose lust of dominion is restrained by a true sense 
of duty will aim to make their children control them- 
selves wherever it is possible, and will fall back upon 
absolutism only as a last resort. 

Enforce Law when Made.— But whenever you do com- 
mand, command with decision and consistency. If the 
case is one which really cannot be otherwise dealt 
with, then issue your fiat, and having issued it, never 
afterwards swerve from it. Consider well beforehand 
what you are going to do ; weigh all the consequences ; 
think whether your firmness of purpose will be suffi- 
cient ; and then, if you finally make the law, enforce it 
uniformly at whatever cost. Let your penalties be like 
the penalties inflicted by inanimate nature— inevitable. 
The hot cinder burns a child the first time he seizes it ; 
it burns him the second time ; it burns him the third 
time ; it burns him every time ; and he very soon learns 
not to touch the hot cinder. If you are equally consist- 
ent — if the consequences which you tell your child will 
follow certain acts, follow with like uniformity, he will 
soon come to respect your laws as he does those of Na- 
ture. And this respect once established will prevent 
endless domestic evils. 

Inconsistency. — Of errors in education one of the 
worst is that of inconsistency. As in a community 
crimes multiply when there is no certain administration 






Moral Education. 167 

of justice ; so in a family an immense increase of trans- 
gressions results from a hesitating or irregular infliction 
of penalties. A weak mother, who perpetually threat- 
ens and rarely performs; who makes rules in haste and 
repents of them at leisure ; who treats the same offence 
now with severity and now with leniency, according as 
the passing humor dictates — is laying up miseries both 
for herself and her children. She is making herself 
contemptible in their eyes ; she is setting them an exam- 
ple of uncontrolled feelings ; she is encouraging them 
to transgress by the prospect of probable impunity; she 
is entailing endless squabbles and accompanying dam- 
age to her own temper and the tempers of her little 
ones ; she is reducing their minds to a moral chaos, 
which after years of bitter experience will with diffi- 
culty bring into order. Better even a barbarous form 
of domestic government carried out consistently, than 
a humane one inconsistently carried out. Again we 
say, avoid coercive measures whenever it is possible to 
do so ; but when you find despotism really necessary, 
be despotic in good earnest. 

Aim at Self-government. — Bear constantly in mind 
the truth that the aim of your discipline should be to 
produce a self-governing being — not to produce a being 
-ta be governed by others. Were your children fated to 
pass their lives as slaves, you could not too much ac- 
custom them to slavery during their childhood ; but as 
they are by and by to be free men, with no one to con- 
trol their daily conduct, you cannot too much accustom 
them to self-control while they are still under your eye. 
This it is which makes the system of discipline by 
natural consequences so especially appropriate to the 
social state which we in England have now reached. 
Under early, tyrannical forms of society, when one of 
the chief evils the citizen had to fear was the anger of his 



1 68 Education. 

superiors, it was well that during childhood parental 
vengeance should be a predominant means of govern- 
ment. But now that the citizen has little to fear from 
any- one — now that the good or evil which he experi- 
ences throughout life is mainly that which in the nature 
of things results from his own conduct, it is desirable 
that from his first years he should begin to learn, 
experimentally, the good or evil consequences which 
naturally follow this or that conduct. 

Substitute Self-government — Aim, therefore, to di- 
minish the amount of parental government as fast as you 
can substitute for it in your child's mind that self-gov- 
ernment arising from a foresight of results. In infancy 
a considerable amount of absolutism is necessary. A 
three-year-old urchin playing with an open razor cannot 
be allowed to learn by this discipline of consequences ; 
for the consequences may in such case be too serious. 
But as intelligence increases, the number of instances 
calling for peremptory interference may be, and should 
be, diminished, with the view of gradually ending 
them as maturity is approached. All periods of transi- 
tion are dangerous ; and the most dangerous is the 
transition from the restraint of the family-circle to the 
non-restraint of the world. Hence the importance of 
pursuing the policy we advocate ; which, alike by culti- 
vating a child's faculty of self-restraint, by continually 
increasing the degree in which it is left to its self-con- 
straint, and by so bringing it, step by step, to a state of 
unaided self-restraint, obliterates the ordinary sudden 
and hazardous change from externally-governed youth 
to internally-governed maturity. Let the history of 
your domestic rule typify, in little, the history of our 
political rule : at the outset, autocratic control, where 
control is really needful ; by and by an incipient con- 
stitutionalism, in which the liberty of the subject gains 



Moral Education. 169 

some express recognition ; successive extensions of this 
liberty of the subject ; gradually ending in parental 
abdication. 

Self-will Not Objectionable. — Do not regret the ex- 
hibition of considerable self-will on the part of your 
children. It is the correlative of that diminished coer- 
civeness so conspicuous in modern education. The 
greater tendency to assert freedom of action on the 
one side corresponds to the smaller tendency to tyran- 
nize on the other. They both indicate an approach to 
the system of discipline we contend for, under which 
children will be more md more led to rule themselves 
by the experience of natural consequences ; and they 
are both the accompaniments of our more advanced 
social state. The independent English boy is the father 
of the independent English man ; and you cannot 
have the last without the first. German teachers say 
that they had rather manage a dozen German boys 
than one English one. Shall we, therefore, wish that 
our boys had the manageableness of the German ones, 
and with it the submissiveness and political serfdom of 
adult Germans ? Or shall we not rather tolerate in our 
boys those feelings which make them free men, and 
modify our methods accordingly? 

Education a Complex Thing — Lastly, always remember 
that to educate rightly is not a simple and easy thing, 
but a complex and extremely difficult thing — the hardest 
task which devolves upon adult life. The rough-and- 
ready style of domestic government is indeed practi- 
cable by the meanest and most uncultivated intellects. 
Slaps and sharp words are penalties that suggest them- 
selves alike to the least reclaimed barbarian and the 
most stolid peasant. Even brutes can use this method 
of discipline — as you may see in the growl and half-bite 
with which a bitch will check a too-exigeant puppy. 



i -jo Education. 



But if you would carry out with success a rational and 
civilized system, you must be prepared for considerable 
mental exertion — for some study, some ingenuity, some 
patience, some self-control. You will have habitually 
to trace the consequences of conduct — to consider what 
are the results which in adult life follow certain kind 
of acts ; and then you will have to devise methods by 
which parallel results shall be entailed on the parallel 
acts of your children. You will daily be called upon 
to analyze the motives of juvenile conduct : you must 
distinguish between acts that are really good and those 
which, though externally simulating them, proceed from 
inferior impulses : while you must be ever on your guard 
against the cruel mistake not unfrequently made, of 
translating neutral acts into transgressions, or ascribing 
worse feelings than were entertained. You must more 
or less modify your method to suit the disposition of 
each child ; and must be prepared to make further 
modifications as each child's disposition enters on a 
new phase. Your faith will often be taxed to maintain 
the requisite perseverance in a course which seems to 
produce little or no effect. 

Motives must be Looked at. — Especially if you are 
dealing with children who have been wrongly treated, 
you must be prepared for a lengthened trial of patience 
before succeeding with better methods ; seeing that 
that which is not easy even, where a right state of feel- 
ing has been established from the beginning, becomes 
doubly difficult when a wrong state of feeling has to be 
set right. Not only will you have constantly to analyze 
the motives of your children, but you will have to 
analyze your own motives — to discriminate between 
those interna] suggestions springing from a true pater- 
nal solicitude, and those which spring from your own 






Moral Education. 1 7 1 

selfishness, from your love of ease, from your lust of 
dominion. 

Educate Yourself. — And then, more trying still, you 
will have not only to detect, but to curb these baser 
impulses. In brief, you will have to carry on your 
higher education at the same time that you are educat- 
ing your children. Intellectually you must cultivate to 
good purpose that most complex of subjects — human 
nature and its laws, as exhibited in your children, in 
yourself, and in the world. Morally, you must keep in 
constant exercise your higher feelings and restrain your 
lower. It is a truth yet remaining to be recognized, 
that the last stage in the mental development of each 
man and woman is to be reached only through the 
proper discharge of the parental duties. And when 
this truth is recognized, it will be seen how admirable 
is the ordination in virtue of which human beings are 
led by their strongest affections to subject themselves 
to a discipline which they would else elude. 

Such Education Demands the Highest Ideals. — While 
some will probably regard this conception of education 
as it should be, with doubt and discouragement, others 
will, we think, perceive in the exalted ideal which it in- 
volves evidence of its truth. That it cannot be realized 
by the impulsive, the unsympathetic, and the short- 
sighted, but demands the higher attributes of human 
nature, they will see to be evidence of its fitness for 
the more advanced states of humanity. Though it calls 
for much labor and self-sacrifice, they will see that it 
promises an abundant return of happiness, immediate 
and remote. They will see that while in its injurious 
effects on both parent and child a bad system is twice 
cursed, a good system is twice blessed — it blesses him 
that trains and him that's trained. 

It will be seen that we have said nothing in this 



172 Education. 

Chapter about the transcendental distinction between 
right and wrong, of which wise men know so little, and 
children nothing. All thinkers are agreed that we may 
find the criterion of right in the effect of actions, if we 
do not find the rule there ; and that is sufficient for the 
purpose we have had in view. Nor have we introduced 
the religious element. We have confined our inquiries 
to a nearer and a much more neglected field, though a 
very important one. Our readers may supplement our 
thoughts in any way they please : we are only con- 
cerned that they should be accepted as far as they go. 



Physical Education. 173 



CHAPTER IV. 



PHYSICAL EDUCATION. 



Much Said as to Management of Animals. — Equally at 
the squire's table after the withdrawal of the ladies, at 
the farmers' market-ordinary, and at the village ale- 
house, the topic which, after the political question of 
the day, excites perhaps the most general interest, is 
the management of animals. Riding home from hunt- 
ing, the conversation is pretty sure to gravitate towards 
horse-breeding, and pedigrees, and comments on this or 
that "good point ;" while a day on the moors is very 
unlikely to pass without something being said on the 
treatment of dogs. When crossing the fields together 
from church, the tenants of adjacent farms are apt to 
pass from criticisms on the sermon to criticisms on the 
weather, the crops, and the stock ; and thence to slide 
into discussions on the various kinds of fodder and their 
feeding qualities. Hodge and Giles, after comparing 
notes over their respective pig-styes, show by their re- 
marks that they have been more or less observant of 
their masters' beasts and sheep, and of the effects pro- 
duced on them by this or that kind of treatment. Nor 
is it only among the rural population that the regula- 
tions of the kennel, the stable, the cow-shed, and the 
sheep-pen are favorite subjects. In towns, too, the 
numerous artisans who keep dogs, the young men who 
are rich enough to now and then indulge their sporting 
tendencies, and their more staid seniors who talk over 
agricultural progress or read Mr, Mechi's annual reports 



174 Education. 

and Mr. Caird's letters to the Times, form, when added 
together, a large portion of the inhabitants. Take the 
adult males throughout the kingdom, and a great 
majority will be found to show some interest in the 
breeding, rearing, or training of animals of one kind or 
other. 

Little Said About Children. — But during after-dinner 
conversations, or at other times of like intercourse, who 
hears anything said about the rearing of children ? 
When the country gentleman has paid his daily visit to 
the stable and personally inspected the condition and 
treatment of his horses, when he has glanced at his 
minor live-stock and given directions about them, how 
often does he go up to the nursery and examine into its 
dietary, its hours, its ventilation ? On his library 
shelves may be found White's "Farriery," Stephen's 
"Book of the Farm," Nimrod "On the Condition of 
Hunters," and with the contents of these he is more or 
less familiar; but how many books has he read on the 
management of infancy and childhood ? The fattening 
properties of oil-cake, the relative values of hay and 
chopped straw, the dangers of unlimited clover, are 
points on which every landlord, farmer, and peasant has 
some knowledge ; but what proportion of them know 
much about the qualities of the food they give their 
children, and its fitness to the constitutional needs of 
growing boys and girls? Perhaps the business inter- 
ests of these classes will be assigned as accounting for 
this anomaly. The explanation is inadequate, however; 
see that the same contrast holds more or less among 
other classes. Of a score of townspeople few if any 
would prove ignorant of the fact that it is undesirable 
to work a horse soon after it has eaten ; and yet of this 
same score, supposing them all to be fathers, probably 
not one would be found who had considered whether 



Physical Education. 175 

the time elapsing between his children's dinner and 
their resumption of lessons was sufficient. Indeed, on 
cross-examination nearly every man would disclose the 
latent opinion that the regimen of the nursery was no 
concern of his. " Oh, I leave all those things to the 
women," would probably be the reply. And in most 
cases the tone and manner of this reply would convey 
the implication that such cares are not consistent with 
masculine dignity. 

Every Other Subject Discussed.— Consider the fact 
from any but the conventional point of view, and it will 
seem strange that while the raising of first-rate bullocks 
is an occupation on which men of education willingly 
bestow much time, inquiry, and thought, the bringing 
up of fine human beings is an occupation tacitly voted 
unworthy of their attention. Mammas who have been 
taught little but languages, music, and accomplishments, 
aided by nurses full of antiquated prejudices, are held 
competent regulators of the food, clothing, and exercise 
of children. Meanwhile the fathers read books and 
periodicals, attend agricultural meetings, try experi- 
ments, and engage in discussions, all with the view of 
discovering how to fatten prize pigs! Infinite pains will 
be taken to produce a racer that shall win the Derby ; 
none to produce a modern athlete. Had Gulliver 
narrated of the Laputans that the men vied with each 
other in learning how best to rear the offspring of 
other creatures, and were careless of learning how best 
to rear their own offspring, he would have paralleled 
any of the other absurdities he ascribes to them. 

Need of Attention to the Physical Side.— The matter is 
a serious one, however. Ludicrous as is the antithesis, 
the fact it expresses is not less disastrous. As remarks 
a suggestive writer, the first requisite to success in life 
is "to be a good animal ;" and to be a nation of good 



176 Education. 

animals is the first condition to national prosperity. 
Not only is it that the event of a war often turns on the 
strength and hardiness of soldiers, but it is that the 
contests of commerce are in part determined by the bod- 
ily endurance of producers. Thus far we have found 
no reason to fear trials of strength with other races in 
either of these fields. But there are not wanting signs 
that our powers will presently be taxed to the utter- 
most. Already, under the keen competition of modern 
life, the application required of almost every one is such 
as few can bear without more or less injury. Already 
thousands break down under the high pressure they are 
subject to. If this pressure continues to increase, as it 
seems likely to do, it will try severely all but the sound- 
est constitutions. Hence it is becoming of especial 
importance that the training of children should be so 
carried on as not only to fit them mentally for the 
struggle before them, but also to make them physically 
fit to bear its excessive wear and tear. 

Attention Aroused. — Happily the matter is beginning 
to attract attention. The writings of Mr. Kingsley in- 
dicate a reaction against over-culture— carried, as reac- 
tions usually are, somewhat too far. Occasional letters 
and leaders in the newspapers have shown an awaken- 
ing interest in physical training. And the formation 
of a school, significantly nicknamed that of " muscular 
Christianity," implies a growing opinion that our pres- 
ent methods of bringing up children do not sufficiently 
regard the welfare of the body. The topic is evidently 
ripe for discussion. 

Modern Science Must be Applied to the Rearing of 
Children. — To conform the regimen of the nursery and 
the school to the established truths of modern science — 
this is the desideratum. It is time that the benefits 
which our sheep and oxen have for years past derived 



Physical Education . 177 

from the investigations of the laboratory should be 
participated in by our children. Without calling in 
question the great importance of horse-training and 
pig-feeding, we would suggest that, as the rearing of 
well-grown men and women is also of some moment, 
the conclusions indicated by theory and indorsed by 
practice ought to be acted on in the last case as in the 
first. Probably not a few will be startled — perhaps of- 
fended — by this collocation of ideas. But it is a fact 
not to be disputed, and to which we had best reconcile 
ourselves, that man is subject to the same organic laws 
as inferior creatures. No anatomist, no physiologist, no 
chemist, will for a moment hesitate to assert that the 
general principles which rule over the vital processes in 
animals equally rule over the vital processes in man. 
And a candid admission of this fact is not without its 
reward — namely, that the truths established by obser- 
vation and experiment on brutes become more or less 
available for human guidance. Rudimentary as is the 
Science of Life, it has already attained to certain fun- 
damental principles underlying the development of all 
organisms, the human included. That which has now 
to be done, and that which we shall endeavor in some 
measure to do, is to show the bearing of these funda- 
mental principles upon the physical training of child- 
hood and youth. 

Reactions. — The rhythmical tendency which is trace- 
able in all departments of social life; which is illustrated 
in the access of despotism after revolution, or, among 
ourselves, in the alternation of reforming epochs and 
conservative epochs; which, after a dissolute age, brings 
an age of asceticism, and conversely ; which, in com- 
merce, produces the regularly recurring inflations and 
panics ; which carries the devotees of fashion from one 
absurd extreme to the opposite one, — this rhythmical 



178 Education. 

tendency affects also our table-habits, and by implica- 
tion the dietary of the young. After a period distin- 
guished by hard drinking and hard eating has become 
a period of comparative sobriety, which in teetotalism 
and vegetarianism exhibits extreme forms of its protest 
against the riotous living of the past. And along with 
this change in the regimen of adults has come a parallel 
change in the regimen for boys and girls. In past gen- 
erations the belief was that the more a child could be 
induced to eat, the better ; and even now, among farm- 
ers and in remote districts, where traditional ideas most 
linger, parents may be found who tempt their children 
to gorge themselves. But among the educated classes, 
who chiefly display this reaction towards abstemious- 
ness, there may be seen a decided leaning to the under- 
feeding, rather than the over-feeding, of children. In- 
deed their disgust for bygone animalism is more clearly 
shown in the treatment of their offspring than in the 
treatment of themselves ; seeing that while their dis- 
guised asceticism is, in so far as their personal conduct 
is concerned, kept in check by their appetites, it has full 
play in legislating for juveniles. 

Under-feeding. — That over-feeding and under-feed- 
ing are both bad, is a truism. Of the two, however, the 
last is the worst. As writes a high authority, " the 
effects of casual repletion are less prejudicial, and more 
easily corrected, than those of inanition."* Add to 
which, that where there has been no injudicious inter- 
ference, repletion wili^ seldom occur. " Excess is the 
vice rather of adults than of the young, who are rarely 
either gourmands or epicures, unless through the fault 
of those who rear them." f This system of restriction, 



* " Cyclopaedia of Practical Medicine. 
f Ibid. 



Physical Education. 1 7 9 

which many parents think so necessary, is based upon 
very inadequate observation, and very erroneous rea- 
soning. There is an over-legislation in the nursery as 
well as an over-legislation in the State, and one of the 
most injurious forms of it is this limitation in the quan- 
tity of food. 

Follow Appetite — " But are children to be allowed to 
surfeit themselves? Shall they be suffered to take their 
fill of dainties and make themselves ill, as they certainly 
will do ? " As thus put, the question admits of but one 
reply. But as thus put, it assumes the point at issue. 
We contend that, as appetite is a good guide to all the 
lower creation, as it is a good guide to the infant, as 
it is a good guide to the invalid, as it is a good guide 
to the differently-placed races of men, and as it is a good 
guide for every adult who leads a healthful life, it may 
safely be inferred that it is a good guide for childhood. 
It would be strange indeed were it here alone untrust- 
worthy. 

Examples. — Probably not a few will read this reply 
with some impatience, being able, as they think, to cite 
facts totally at variance with it. It will appear absurd 
if we deny the relevancy of these facts ; and yet the 
paradox is quite defensible. The truth is, that the in- 
stances of excess which such persons have in mind are 
usually the consequences of the restrictive system they 
seem to justify. They are the sensual reactions caused 
by a more or less ascetic regimen. They illustrate on 
a small scale that commonly remarked fact, that those 
who during youth have been subject to the most rigor- 
ous discipline, are apt afterwards to rush into the wild- 
est extravagances. They are analogous to those fright- 
ful phenomena, once not uncommon in convents, where 
nuns suddenly lapsed from the extremest austerities 
into an almost demoniac wickedness. They simply 



i So Education. 

exhibit the uncontrollable vehemence of a long-denied 
desire. 

Love of Sweets. — Consider the ordinary tastes and 
the ordinary treatment of children. The love of sweets 
is conspicuous and almost universal among them. 
Probably ninety-nine people in a hundred presume 
that there is nothing more in this than gratification of 
the palate, and that, in common with other sensual 
desires, it should be discouraged. The physiologist, 
however, whose discoveries lead him to an ever-increas- 
ing reverence for the arrangements of things, will sus- 
pect that there is something more in this love of sweets 
than the current hypothesis supposes ; and a little 
inquiry confirms the suspicion. Any work on organic 
chemistry shows that sugar plays an important part in 
the vital processes. Both saccharine and fatty matters 
are eventually oxidized in the body ; and there is an 
accompanying evolution of heat. Sugar is the form to 
which sundry other compounds have to be reduced 
before they are available as heat-making food ; and this 
formation of sugar is carried on in the body. Not only 
is starch changed into sugar in the course of digestion, 
but it has been proved by M. Claude Bernard that the 
liver is a factory in which other constituents of food are 
transformed into sugar. Now, when to the fact that 
children have a marked desire for this valuable heat- 
food, we join the fact that they have usually a marked 
dislike to that food which gives out the greatest amount 
of heat during its oxidation (namely, fat), we shall see 
strong reason for thinking that excess of the one com- 
pensates for defect of the other — that the organism 
demands more sugar because it cannot deal with much 
fat. 

Love of Acid. — Again, children are usually very fond 
of vegetable acids. Fruits of all kinds are their delight; 



Physical Education. 181 

and, in the absence of anything better, they will devour 
unripe gooseberries and the sourest of crabs. Now, not 
only are vegetable acids, in common with mineral ones, 
very good tonics, and beneficial as such when taken in 
moderation, but they have, when administered in their 
natural forms, other advantages. " Ripe fruit," says 
Dr. Andrew Combe, " is more freely given on the Con- 
tinent than in this country ; and, particularly when the 
bowels act imperfectly, it is often very useful." 

See, then, the discord between the instinctive wants 
of children and their habitual treatment. Here are 
two dominant desires, which there is good reason to 
believe express certain needs of the juvenile consti- 
tution ; and not only are they ignored in the nursery 
regimen, but there is a general tendency to forbid the 
gratification of them. Bread-and-milk in the morning, 
tea and bread-and-butter at night, or some dietary 
equally insipid, is rigidly adhered to ; and any minis- 
tration to the palate is thought not only needless, 
but wrong. What is the necessary consequence ? 
When on fete-days there is an unlimited access to good 
things — when a gift of pocket-money brings the con- 
tents of the confectioner's window within reach, or 
when by some accident the free run of a fruit-garden is 
obtained, then the long-denied, and therefore intense, 
desires lead to great excesses. There is an impromptu 
carnival, caused not only by the release from past re- 
straints, but also by the consciousness that a long Lent 
will begin on the morrow. And then, when the evils 
of repletion display themselves, it is argued that chil- 
dren must not be left to the guidance of their appetites! 
These disastrous results of artificial restrictions are 
themselves cited as proving the need for further restric- 
tions ! • 



182 



Education. 



How to Prevent Excess. — We contend, therefore, that 
the reasoning commonly used to justify this system of 
interference is vicious. We contend that, were chil- 
dren allowed daily to partake of these more sapid edi- 
bles, for which there is a physiological requirement, 
they would rarely exceed, as they now mostly do when 
they have the opportunity : were fruit, as Dr. Combe 
recommends, " to constitute apart of the regular foods 
(given, as he advises, not between meals, but along 
with them), there would be none of that craving which 
prompts the devouring of such fruits as crabs and sloes. 
And similarly in other cases. 

The Standard. — Not only is it that the a priori reasons 
for trusting the appetites of children are so strong, 
and that the reasons assigned for distrusting them are 
invalid, but it is that no other guidance is worthy of 
any confidence. What is the value of this parental 
judgment, set up as an alternative regulator? When 
to "Oliver asking for more" the mamma or the gov- 
erness replies in the negative, on what data does she 
proceed ? She thinks he has had enough. But where 
are her grounds for so thinking? Has she some secret 
understanding with the boy's stomach — some clairvoyant 
power enabling her to discern the needs of his body ? 
If not, how can she safely decide ? Does she not know 
that the demand of the system for food is determined 
by numerous and involved causes— varies with the tem- 
perature, with the hygrometric state of the air, with the 
electric state of the air — varies also according to the ex- 
ercise taken, according to the kind and quality of food 
eaten at the last meal, and according to the "rapidity 
with which the last meal was digested ? How can she 
calculate the result of such a combination of causes? 
As we heard said by the father of a five-year-old boy, 
who stands a head taller than most of his age, and is 



Physical Education. 183 

proportionately robust, rosy, and active : " I can see no 
artificial standard by which to mete out his food. If 
I say, 'this much is enough/ it is a mere guess; and 
the guess is as likely to be wrong as right. Conse- 
quently, having no faith in guesses, I let him eat his 
fill." And, certainly, any one judging of his policy by 
its effects would be constrained to admit its wisdom. 

In truth, this confidence, with which most parents 
take upon themselves to legislate for the stomachs of 
their children, proves their unacquaintance with the 
principles of physiology : if they knew more they would 
be more modest. " The pride of science is humble 
when compared with the pride of ignorance." If any 
one would learn how little faith is to be placed in 
human judgments, and how much in the pre-estab- 
lished arrangements of things, let him compare the 
rashness of the inexperienced physician with the cau- 
tion of the most advanced, or let him dip into Sir 
John Forbes' work, " On Nature and Art, in the Cure 
of Disease," and he will then see that, in proportion 
as men gain a greater knowledge of the laws of life, 
they come to have less confidence in themselves and 
more in Nature. 

Low Diet Supposed Best. — Turning from the question 
of quantity of food to that of quality, we may discern the 
same ascetic tendency. Not simply a more or less re- 
stricted diet, but a comparatively low diet, is thought 
proper for children. The current opinion is, that they 
should have but little animal food. Among the less 
wealthy classes, economy seems to have dictated this 
opinion — the wish has been father to the thought. 
Parents not affording to buy much meat, and liking 
meat themselves, answer the petitions of juveniles with 
''Meat is not good for little boys and girls;" and this, 
at first probably nothing but a convenient excuse, has 



184 Education. 

by repetition grown into an article of faith. While 
the classes with whom cost is not a consideration have 
been swayed partly by the example of the majority, 
partly by the influence of nurses drawn from the lower 
classes, and in some measure by the reaction against 
past animalism. 

The Reverse Needed. — If, however, we inquire for 
the basis of this opinion, we find little or none. It is 
a dogma repeated and received without proof, like that 
which for thousands of years insisted on the necessity 
of swaddling-clothes. It may indeed be true that, to 
the young child's stomach, not yet endowed with much 
muscular power, meat, which requires considerable 
trituration before it can be made into chyme, is an 
unfit aliment. But this objection does not tell against 
animal food from which the fibrous part has been ex- 
tracted ; nor does it apply when, after the lapse of two 
or three years, considerable muscular vigor has been 
acquired. And while the evidence in support of this 
dogma, partially valid in the case of very young chil- 
dren, is not valid in the case of other children, who 
are, nevertheless, ordinarily treated in conformity with 
the dogma, the adverse evidence is abundant and con- 
clusive. The verdict of science is exactly opposite to 
the popular opinion. We have put the question to two 
of our leading physicians and to several of the most 
distinguished physiologists, and they uniformly agree 
in the conclusion, that children should have a diet not 
less nutritive, but if anything more nutritive, than that 
of adults. 

The Reason. — The grounds for this conclusion are 
obvious, and the reasoning simple. It needs but to 
compare the vital processes of a man with those of a 
boy, to see at once that the demand for sustenance is 
relatively greater in the boy than in the man. What 



Physical Education, 185 

are the ends for which a man requires food ? Each day 
his body undergoes more or less wear — wear through 
muscular exertion, wear of the nervous system through 
mental actions, wear of the viscera in carrying on the 
functions of life ; and the tissue thus wasted has to be 
renewed. Each day, too, by perpetual radiation, his 
body loses a large amount of heat ; and as, for the 
continuance of the vital actions, the temperature of the 
body must be maintained, this loss has to be compen- 
sated by a constant production of heat : to which end 
certain constituents of the food are unceasingly under- 
going oxidation. To make up for the day's waste, and 
to supply fuel for the day's expenditure of heat, are, 
then, the sole purposes for which the adult requires 
food. 

The Young Waste More Rapidly. — Consider, now, the 
case of the boy. He, too, wastes the substance of his 
body by action ; and it needs but to note his restless 
activity to see that, in proportion to his bulk, he prob- 
ably wastes as much as a man. He, too, loses heat by 
radiation ; and, as his body exposes a greater surface 
in proportion to its mass than does that of a man, and 
therefore loses heat more rapidly, the quantity of heat- 
food he requires is, bulk for bulk, greater than that 
required by a man. So that even had the boy no other 
vital processes to carry on than the man has, he would 
need, relatively to his size, a somewhat larger supply 
of nutriment. But, besides repairing his body and 
maintaining its heat, the boy has to make new tissue — 
to grow. After waste and thermal loss have been pro- 
vided for, such surplus of nutriment as remains gees 
to the further building up of the frame; and only in 
virtue of this surplus is normal growth possible — the 
growth that sometimes takes place in the absence of 
such surplus causing a manifest prostration consequent 



1 86 Education. 

upon defective repair. How peremptory is the demand 
of the unfolding organism for materials, is seen alike 
in that " school-boy hunger," which after-life rarely 
parallels in intensity, and in the comparatively quick 
return of appetite. And if there needs further evidence 
of 'this extra necessity for nutriment, we have it in the 
fact that during the famines following shipwrecks and 
other disasters the children are the first to die. 

The Best Food Needed.— This relatively greater need 
for nutriment being admitted, as it must perforce be, 
the question that remains is: Shall we meet it by giving 
an excessive quantity of what may be called dilute 
food, or a more moderate quantity of concentrated 
food ? The nutriment obtainable from a given weight 
of meat is obtainable only from a larger weight of 
bread or from a still larger weight of potatoes, and so 
on. To fulfil the requirement, the quantity must be 
increased as the nutritiveness is diminished. Shall we, 
then, respond to the extra wants of the growing child 
by giving an adequate quantity of food as good as that 
of adults? Or, regardless of the fact that its stomach 
has to dispose of a relatively larger quantity even of 
this good food, shall we further tax it by giving an 
inferior food in still greater quantity ? 

Nutritious Food. — The answer is tolerably obvious. 
The more the labor of digestion can be economized, the 
more energy is left for the purposes of growth and 
action. The functions of the stomach and intestines 
cannot be performed without a large supply of blood 
and nervous power ; and in the comparative lassitude 
that follows a hearty meal every adult has proof that 
this supply of blood and nervous power is at the ex- 
pense of the system at large. If the requisite nutri- 
ment is furnished by a great quantity of innutritious 
food, more work is entailed on the viscera than when 



Physical Education. 187 

it is furnished by a moderate quantity of nutritious 
food. This extra work is so much sheer loss — a loss 
which in children shows itself either in diminished 
energy, or in smaller growth, or in both. The inference 
is, then, that they should have a diet which combines, 
as much as possible, nutritiveness and digestibility. * 

Adverse Facts Considered. — It is doubtless true that 
boys and girls may be brought up upon an exclusively, 
or almost exclusively, vegetable diet. Among the upper 
classes are to be found children to whom comparatively 
little meat is given, and who, nevertheless, grow and 
appear in good health. Animal food is scarcely tasted 
by the offspring of laboring people ; and yet they reach 
a healthy maturity. But these seemingly adverse facts 
have by no means the weight commonly supposed. 

In the first place, it does not follow that those who 
in early years flourish on bread and potatoes will 
eventually reach a fine development ; and a comparison 
between the agricultural laborers and the gentry in 
England, or between the middle and lower classes in 
France, is by no means in favor of vegetable feeders. 

In the second place, the question is not only a ques- 
tion of bulk, but also a question of quality. A soft, 
flabby flesh makes as good a show as a firm one ; but 
though to the careless eye a child of full, flaccid tissue 
may appear the equal of one whose fibres are well 
toned, a trial of strength will prove the difference. 
Obesity in adults is often a sign of feebleness. Men 
lose weight in training. And hence the appearance of 
these low-fed children is by no means conclusive. 

In the third place, not only size, but energy has to be 
considered. Between children of the meat-eating classes 
and those of the bread-and-potato-eating classes there 
is a marked contrast in this respect. Both in mental 



1 88 Education. 

and physical vivacity the low-fed peasant-boy is greatly 
inferior to the better-fed son of a gentleman. 

Energy and Nutrition. — If we compare different classes 
of animals, or different races of men, or the same animals 
or men when differently fed, we find still more distinct 
proof that the degree of energy essentially depends on the 
nutritive ness of the food. 

The Cow. — In a cow, subsisting on so innutritive a 
food as grass, we see that the immense quantity re- 
quired to be eaten necessitates an enormous digestive 
system ; that the limbs, small in comparison with the 
bod) T , are burdened by its weight ; that in carrying 
about this heavy body and digesting this excessive 
quantity of food a great amount of force is expended ; 
and that, having but little energy remaining, the crea- 
ture is slusfgish. 

The Horse. — Compare with the cow a horse — an ani- 
mal of nearly allied structure, but adapted to a more 
concentrated food. Here we see that the body, and 
more especially its abdominal region, bears a much 
smaller ratio to the limbs ; that the powers are not 
taxed by the support of such massive viscera, nor the 
digestion of so bulky a food ; and that, as a conse- 
quence, there is great locomotive energy and consider- 
able vivacity. 

The Sheep. — If, again, we contrast the stolid inactiv- 
ity of the graminivorous sheep with the liveliness of the 
dog, subsisting upon flesh or farinaceous food, or a mix- 
ture of the two, we see a difference similar in kind, but 
still greater in degree. And after walking through the 
Zoological Gardens, and noting the restlessness with 
which the carnivorous animals pace up and down their 
cages, it needs but to remember that none of the her- 
bivorous animals habitually display this superfluous 



Physical Education. 189 

energy, to see how clear is the relation between concen- 
tration of food and degree of activity. 

Relation to Food. — That these differences are not di- 
rectly consequent upon differences of constitution, as 
some may argue, but are directly consequent upon 
differences in the food which the creatures are consti- 
tuted to subsist on, is proved by the fact that they are 
observable between different divisions of the same 
species. Take the case of mankind. The Australians, 
Bushmen, and others of the lowest savages who live on 
roots and berries, varied by larvae of insects and the 
like meagre fare, are comparatively puny in stature, 
have large abdomens, soft and undeveloped muscles, 
and are quite unable to cope with Europeans, either in 
a struggle or in prolonged exertion. Count up the wild 
races who are well grown, strong and active, as the 
Kaffirs, North American Indians, and Patagonians, and 
you find them large consumers of flesh. The ill-fed 
Hindoo goes down before the Englishman fed on more 
nutritive food, to whom he is as inferior in mental as 
in physical energy. And generally, we think, the his- 
tory of the world shows that the well-fed races have 
been the energetic and dominant races. 

As to Animals — The Horse. — Still stronger, however, 
becomes the argument, when we find that the same in- 
dividual animal becomes capable of more or less exer- 
tion according as its food is more or less nutritious. 
This has been clearly demonstrated in the case of the 
horse. Though flesh may be gained by a grazing horse, 
strength is lost — as putting him to hard work proves. 
" The consequence of turning horses out to grass is 
relaxation of the muscular system." " Grass is a very 
good preparation for a bullock for Smithfield market, 
but a very bad one for a hunter." It was well known 
of old that, after passing the summer months in the 



190 Education. 

fields, hunters required some months of stable-feeding 
before becoming able to follow the hounds, and that 
they did not get into good condition until the begin- 
ning of the next spring. And the modern practice is 
that insisted on by Mr. Apperley — " Never to give a 
hunter what is called 'a summer's run at grass,' and, 
except under particular and very favorable circumstan- 
ces,. never to turn him out at all." That is to say, never 
give him poor food : great energy and endurance are 
to be obtained only by the continuous use of very 
nutritive food. So true is this, that, as proved by Mr. 
Apperley, prolonged high-feeding will enable a middling 
horse to equal, in his performances, a first-rate horse 
fed in the ordinary way. To which various evidences 
add the familiar fact that, when a horse is required to 
do double duty, it is the practice to give him beans — a 
food containing a larger proportion of nitrogenous or 
flesh-making material than his habitual oats. 

As to Laborers. — Once more, in the case of individual 
men the truth has been illustrated with equal, or still 
greater, clearness. We do not refer to men in training 
for feats of strength, whose regimen, however, thor- 
oughly conforms to the doctrine. We refer to the 
experience of railway contractors and their laborers. 
It has been for years past a well-established fact that 
the English navvy, eating largely of flesh, is far more 
efficient than a Continental navvy living on a less 
nutritive food : so much more efficient, that English 
contractors for Continental railways have habitually 
taken their laborers with them. That difference of diet 
and not difference of race caused this superiority, has 
been of late distinctly shown. For it has turned out 
that when the Continental navvies live in the same style 
as their English competitors they presently rise, more 
or less nearly, to a par with them in efficiency. To 



Physical Education. 191 

which fact let us here add the converse one, to which 
we can give personal testimony based upon six months' 
experience of vegetarianism, that abstinence from meat 
entails diminished energy of both body and mind. 

Conclusions as to Children.— Do not these various evi- 
dences distinctly indorse our argument respecting the 
feeding of children ? Do they not imply that, even 
supposing the same stature and bulk to be attained on 
an innutritive as on a nutritive diet, the quality of tissue 
is greatly inferior? Do they not establish the position 
that, where energy as well as growth has to be main- 
tained, it can only be done by high feeding ? Do they 
not confirm the a priori conclusion that, though a child 
of whom little is expected in the way of bodily or men- 
tal activity may thrive tolerably well on farinaceous 
substances, a child who is daily required, not only to 
form the due amount of new tissue, but to supply the 
waste consequent on great muscular action, and the 
further waste consequent on hard exercise of brain, 
must live on substances containing a larger ratio of 
nutritive matter? And is it not an obvious corollary, 
that denial of this better food will be at the expense 
either of growth, or of bodily activity, or of mental ac- 
tivity — as constitution and circumstances may deter- 
mine? We believe no logical intellect will question it. 
To think otherwise is to entertain in a disguised form 
the old fallacy of the perpetual-motion schemers — that 
it is possible to get power out of nothing. 

Variety in Food — Before leaving the question of food, 
a few words must be said on another requisite — variety. 
In this respect the dietary of the young is very faulty. 
If not, like our soldiers, condemned to " twenty years 
of boiled beef," our children have mostly to bear a 
monotony which, though less extreme and less lasting, 
is quite as clearly at variance with the laws of health. 



192 Education. 

At dinner, it is true, they usually have food that is 
more or less mixed, and that is changed day by day. 
But week after week, month after month, year after 
year, comes the same breakfast of bread-and-milk, or, 
it may be, oatmeal porridge. And with like persistence 
the day is closed, perhaps with a second edition of the 
bread-and-milk, perhaps with tea and bread-and-butter. 

Demands of Diversity in Diet. — This practice is op- 
posed to the dictates of physiology. The satiety pro- 
duced by an often-repeated dish, and the gratification 
caused by one long a stranger to the palate, are not 
meaningless, as many carelessly assume ; but they are 
the incentives to a wholesome diversity of diet. It is a 
fact, established by numerous experiments, that there is 
scarcely any one food, however good, which supplies in 
due proportions or right forms all the elements required 
for carrying on the vital processes in a normal manner ; 
from whence it is to be inferred that frequent change 
of food is desirable to balance the supply of all the ele- 
ments. It is a further fact, well known to physiologists, 
that the enjoyment given by a much-liked food is a 
nervous stimulus, which, by increasing the action of the 
heart and so propelling the blood with increased vigor, 
aids in the subsequent digestion. And these truths are 
in harmony with the maxims of modern cattle-feeding, 
which dictate a rotation of diet. 

Variety at Each Meal. — Not only, however, is peri- 
odic change of food very desirable ; but, for the same 
reasons, it is very desirable . that a mixture of food 
should be taken at each meal. The better balance of 
ingredients, and the greater nervous stimulation, are 
advantages which hold here as before. If facts are 
asked for, we may name as one, the comparative ease 
with which the stomach disposes of a French dinner, 
enormous in quantity but extremely varied in material. 



Physical Education. 193 

Few will contend that an equal weight of one kind of 
food, however well cooked, could be digested with as 
much facility. If any desire further facts, they may 
find them in every modern book on the management of 
animals. Animals thrive best when each meal is made 
up of several things. And indeed among men of 
science the truth has been long ago established. The 
experiments of Goss and Stark "afford the most deci- 
sive proof of the advantage, or rather the necessity, of 
a mixture of substances, in order to produce the com- 
pound which is the best adapted for the action of the 
stomach." * 

As to the Trouble. — Should any object, as probably 
many will, that a rotating dietary for children, and one 
which also requires a mixture of food at each meal, 
would entail too much trouble, we reply, that no 
trouble is thought too great which conduces to the 
mental development of children, and that for their 
future welfare good bodily development is equally im- 
portant. Moreover, it seems alike sad and strange that 
a trouble which is cheerfully taken in the fattening of 
pigs should be thought too great in the rearing of 
children. 

Considerations and Suggestions. — One more paragraph, 
with the view of warning those who may propose to 
adopt the regimen indicated. The change must not be 
made suddenly ; for continued low-feeding so enfeebles 
the system as to disable it from at once dealing with a 
high diet. Deficient nutrition is itself a cause of dys- 
pepsia. This is true even of animals. "When calves 
are fed with skimmed milk, or whey, or other poor food, 
they are liable to indigestion." \ Hence, therefore, 



* "Cyclopaedia of Anatomy and Physiology." 
•j- Morton's " Cyclopaedia of Agriculture." 



194 Education. 

where the energies are low, the transition to a generous 
diet must be gradual : each increment of strength 
gained, justifying a further increase of nutriment. 
Further, it should always be borne in mind that the 
concentration of nutriment may be carried too far. A 
bulk sufficient to fill the stomach is one requisite of a 
proper meal ; and this requisite negatives a diet defi- 
cient in those waste matters which give adequate mass. 
Though the size of the digestive organs is less in the 
well-fed civilized races than in the ill-fed savage ones, 
and, though their size may eventually diminish still 
further, yet for the time being the bulk of the ingesta 
must be determined by the existing capacity. But, 
paying due regard to these two qualifications, our con- 
clusions are — that the food of children should be highly 
nutritive, that it should be varied at each meal and at 
successive meals, and that it should be abundant. 

As to Clothing. — With clothing as with food, the es- 
tablished tendency is towards an improper scantiness. 
Here, too, ascetism peeps out. There is a current 
theory, vaguely entertained, if not put into a definite 
formula, that the sensations are to be disregarded. 
They do not exist for our guidance, but to mislead 
us, seems to be the prevalent belief reduced to its 
naked form. It is a grave error : we are much more 
beneficently constituted. It is not obedience to the 
sensations, but disobedience to them, which is the 
habitual cause of bodily evils. It is not the eating 
when hungry, but the eating in the absence of ap- 
petite, which is bad. It is not the drinking when 
thirsty, but the continuing to drink when thirst has 
ceased, that is the vice. Harm results not from breath- 
ing that fresh air which every healthy person enjoys ; 
but from continuing to breathe foul air, spite of the 
protest of the lungs. Harm results not from taking 



Physical Education. 195 

that active exercise which, as every child shows us, na- 
ture strongly prompts, but from a persistent disregard 
of nature's promptings. Not that mental activity which 
is spontaneous and enjoyable does the mischief, but 
that which is persevered in after a hot or aching head 
commands desistance. Not that bodily exertion which 
is pleasant or indifferent does injury, but that which 
is continued when exhaustion forbids. It is true that 
in those who have long led unhealthy lives the sensa- 
tions are not trustworthy guides. People who have for 
years been almost constantly in-doors, who have exer- 
cised their brains very much and their bodies scarcely 
at all, who in eating have obeyed their clocks without 
consulting their stomachs, may very likely be misled by 
their vitiated feelings. But their abnormal state is itself 
the result of transgressing their feelings. Had they 
from childhood up never disobeyed what we may term 
the physical conscience, it would not have been seared, 
but would have remained a faithful monitor. 

As to Hardening Children.— Among the sensations 
serving for our guidance are those of heat and cold ; 
and a clothing for children which does not carefully 
consult these sensations is to be condemned. The com- 
mon notion about " hardening" is a grievous delusion. 
Children are not unfrequently " hardened " out of the 
world ; and those who survive, permanently suffer either 
in growth or constitution. " Their delicate appearance 
furnishes ample indication of the mischief thus pro- 
duced, and their frequent attacks of illness might prove 
a warning even to unreflecting parents," says Dr. 
Combe. The reasoning on which this hardening theory 
rests is extremely superficial. Wealthy parents, seeing 
little peasant boys and girls playing about in the open 
air only half-clothed, and joining with this fact the gen- 
eral healthiness of laboring people, draw the unwarrant- 



196 Education. 

able conclusion that the healthiness is the result of the 
exposure, and resolve to keep their own offspring scant- 
ily covered ! It is forgotten that these urchins who 
gambol upon village-greens are in many respects favor- 
ably circumstanced — that their days are spent in almost 
perpetual ' play ; that they are always breathing fresh 
air ; and that their systems are not disturbed by 
over-taxed brains. For aught that appears to the 
contrary, their good health may be maintained, not in 
consequence of, but in spite of, their deficient clothing. 
This alternative conclusion we believe to be the true 
one, and that an inevitable detriment results from the 
needless loss of animal heat to which they are subject. 

Hardness and Growth. — For when, the constitution 
being sound enough to bear it, exposure does produce 
hardness, it does so at the expense of growth. This 
truth is displayed alike in animals and in man. The 
Shetland pony bears greater inclemencies than the 
horses of the south, but is dwarfed. Highland sheep 
and cattle, living in a colder climate, are stunted in 
comparison with English breeds. In both the arctic and 
antarctic regions the human race falls much below its 
ordinary height: the Laplander and Esquimaux are very 
short : and the Terra del Fuegians, who go naked in a 
cold latitude, are described by Darwin as so stunted and 
hideous, that " one can hardly make one's self believe 
they are fellow-creatures." 

Cause of Stunting. — Science clearly explains this 
dwarfishness produced by great abstraction of heat : 
showing that, food and other things being equal, it un- 
avoidably results. For, as before pointed out, to make 
up for that cooling by radiation which the body is con- 
stantly undergoing, there must be a constant oxidation 
of certain matters which form part of the food. And 
in proportion as the thermal loss is great, must the 



Physical Education. 197 

quantity of these matters required for oxidation be 
great. But the power of the digestive organs is limited. 
Hence it follows, that when they have to prepare a 
large quantity of this material needful for maintaining 
the temperature, they can prepare but a small quantity 
of the material which goes to build up the frame. Ex- 
cessive expenditure for fuel entails diminished means 
for other purposes : wherefore there necessarily results 
a body small in size, or inferior in texture, or both. 

Clothing — Liebig Cited. — Hence the great importance 
of clothing. As Liebig says: " Our clothing is, in refer- 
ence to the temperature of the body, merely an equiva- 
lent for a certain amount of food." By diminishing the 
loss of heat, it diminishes the amount of fuel needful 
for maintaining the heat ; and when the stomach has 
less to do in preparing fuel, it can do more in preparing 
other materials. This deduction is entirely confirmed 
by the experience of those who manage animals. Cold 
can be borne by animals only at the expense of fat, or 
muscle, or growth, as the case may be. " If fattening 
cattle are exposed to a low temperature, either their 
progress must be retarded, or a great additional expend- 
iture of food incurred." * Mr. Apperley insists strongly 
that, to bring hunters into good condition, it is neces- 
sary that the stable should be kept warm. And among 
those who rear racers it is an established doctrine that 
exposure is to be avoided. 

Effect of Cold — The scientific truth thus illustrated 
by ethnology, and recognized by agriculturists and 
sportsmen, applies with double force to children. In 
proportion to their smallness and the rapidity of their 
growth is the injury from cold great. In France, new- 
born infants often die in winter from being carried to 

* Morton's " Cyclopaedia of Agriculture." 



198 Education. 

the office of the rnaire for registration. " M. Quetelet 
has pointed out that in Belgium two infants die in 
January for one that dies in July." And in Russia the 
infant mortality is something enormous. Even when 
near maturity, the undeveloped frame is comparatively 
unable to bear exposure : as witness the quickness with 
which young soldiers succumb in a trying campaign. 
The rationale is obvious. We have already adverted to 
the fact that, in consequence of the varying relation 
between surface and bulk, a child loses a relatively 
larger amount of heat than an adult ; and here we must 
point out that the disadvantage under which the child 
thus labors is very great. Lehmann says: "If the 
carbonic acid excreted by children or young animals is 
calculated for an equal bodily weight, it results that 
children produce nearly twice as much acid as adults." 
Now the quantity of carbonic acid given off varies 
with tolerable accuracy as the quantity of heat pro- 
duced. And thus we see that in children the system, 
even when not placed at a disadvantage, is called upon 
to provide nearly double the proportion of material for 
generating heat. 

The Young Need to be Well Clothed.— See, then, the 
extreme folly of clothing the young scantily. What 
father, full-grown though he is, losing heat less rapidly 
as he does, and having no physiological necessity but 
to supply the waste of each day — what father, we ask, 
would think it salutary to go about with bare legs, bare 
arms, and bare neck ? Yet this tax upon the system, 
from which he would shrink, he inflicts upon his little 
ones, who are so much less able to bear it ! or, if he 
does not inflict it, sees it inflicted without protest. Let 
him remember that every ounce of nutriment needlessly 
expended for the maintenance of temperature is so 
much deducted from the nutriment going to build up 



Physical Education. 199 

the frame and maintain the energies ; and that even 
when colds, congestions, or other consequent disorders 
are escaped, diminished growth or less perfect structure 
is inevitable. 

Dr. Combe's Rule. — " The rule is, therefore, not to 
dress in an invariable way in all cases, but to put on 
clothing in kind and quantity sufficient in the individual 
case to protect the body effectually from an abiding sensation 
of cold, however slight." This rule, the importance of 
which Dr. Combe indicates by the italics, is one in 
which men of science and practitioners agree. We have 
met with none competent to form a judgment on the 
matter who do not strongly condemn the exposure of 
children's limbs. If there is one point above others in 
which " pestilent custom " should be ignored, it is this. 

The Rule of Fashion — Lamentable, indeed, is it to 
see mothers seriously damaging the constitution of 
their children out of compliance with an irrational 
fashion. It is bad enough that they should themselves 
conform to every folly which our Gallic neighbors 
please to initiate ; but that they should clothe their 
children in any mountebank dress which Le petit Cour- 
rier des Dames indicates, regardless of its insufficiency 
and unfitness, is monstrous. Discomfort more or less 
great is inflicted ; frequent disorders are entailed, 
growth is checked or stamina undermined, premature 
death not uncommonly caused, and all because it is 
thought needful to make frocks of a size and material 
dictated by French caprice. 

Play Forbidden. — Not only is it that for the sake of 
conformity mothers thus punish and injure their little 
ones by scantiness of covering, but it is that from an 
allied motive they impose a style of dress which forbids 
healthful activity. To please the eye, colors and fabrics 
are chosen totally unfit to bear that rough usage which 



200 Education. 

unrestrained play involves : and then to prevent dam- 
age the unrestrained play is interdicted. " Get up this 
moment : you will soil your clean frock," is the man- 
date issued to some urchin creeping about on the floor. 
"Come back : you will dirty your stockings," calls out 
the governess to one of her charges, who has left the 
footpath to scramble up a bank. Thus is the evil 
doubled. That they may come up to their mamma's 
standard of prettiness, and be admired by her visitors, 
children must have habiliments deficient in quantity 
and unfit in texture ; and that these easily-damaged 
habiliments may be kept clean and uninjured, the rest- 
less activity, so natural and needful for the young, is 
more or less restrained. The exercise which becomes 
doubly requisite when the clothing is insufficient, is cut 
short lest it should deface the clothing. 

Effects. — Would that the terrible cruelty of this sys- 
tem could be seen by those who maintain it. We do 
not hesitate to say that, through enfeebled health, de- 
fective energies, and consequent non-success in life, 
thousands are annually doomed to unhappiness by this 
unscrupulous regard for appearances : even when they 
are not, by early death, literally sacrificed to the 
Moloch of maternal vanity. We are reluctant to counsel 
strong measures, but really the evils are so great as to 
justify, or even to demand, a peremptory interference 
on the part of fathers. 

Conclusions. — Our conclusions are, then that while 
the clothing of children should never be in such excess 
as to create oppressive warmth, it should always be 
sufficient to prevent any general feeling of cold ;* that 

* It is needful to remark, that children whose legs and arms have 
been from the beginning habitually without covering cease to be con- 
scious that the exposed surfaces are cold ; just as by use we have all 



Physical Education. 201 

instead of the flimsy cotton, linen, or mixed fabrics 
commonly used, it should be made of some good non- 
conductor, such as coarse woollen cloth ; that it should 
be so strong as to receive little damage from the hard 
wear and tear which childish sports will give it ; and 
that its colors should be such as will not soon suffer 
from use and exposure. 

Bodily Exercise Believed In. — To the importance of 
bodily exercise most people are in some degree awake. 
Perhaps less needs saying on this requisite of physical 
education than on most others, — at any rate in so far as 
boys are concerned. Public schools and private schools 
alike furnish tolerably adequate playgrounds ; and 
there is usually a fair share of time for out-of-door 
games, and a recognition of them as needful. In this, 
if in no other direction, it seems admitted that the 
natural promptings of boyish instinct may advanta- 
geously be followed ; and indeed in the modern prac- 
tice of breaking the prolonged morning and afternoon's 
lessons by a few minutes' open-air recreation we see an 
increasing tendency to conform school regulations to 
the bodily sensations of the pupils. Here, then, little 
needs to be said in the way of expostulation or sugges- 
tion. 

Mainly for Boys. — But we have been obliged to qual- 
ify this admission by inserting the clause " in so far as 
boys are concerned." Unfortunately, the fact is quite 
otherwise in the case of girls. It chances, somewhat 
strangely, that we have daily opportunity of drawing a 
comparison. We have both a boys' and a girls' school 

ceased to be conscious that our faces are cold, even when out of doors. 
But though in such children the sensations no longer protest, it does 
not follow that the system escapes injury — any more than it follows 
that the Fuegian is undamaged by exposure because he bears with in- 
difference the melting of the falling snow on his naked body. 



202 Education. 

within view, and the contrast between them is remark- 
able. In one case nearly the whole of a large garden 
is turned into an open, gravelled space, affording ample 
scope for games, and supplied with poles and horizontal 
bars for gymnastic exercises. Every day before break- 
fast, again towards eleven o'clock, again at midday, 
again in the afternoon, and once more after school is 
over the neighborhood is awakened by a chorus of 
shouts and laughter as the boys rush out to play ; and 
for as long as they remain both eyes and ears give 
proof that they are absorbed in that enjoyable activity 
which makes the pulse bound and ensures the health- 
ful activity of every organ. 

How the Girls Exercise — How unlike is the picture 
offered by the " Establishment for Young Ladies " ! 
Until the fact was pointed out, we actually did not" 
know that we had a girls' school as close to us as the 
school for boys. The garden, equally large with the 
other, affords no signs whatever of any provision for 
juvenile recreation ; but is entirely laid out with prim 
grassplots, gravel-walks, shrubs, and flowers, after the 
usual suburban style. During five months we have not 
once had our attention drawn to the premises by a 
shout or a laugh. Occasionally girls may be observed 
sauntering along the paths with their lesson-books in 
their hands, or else walking arm-in-arm. Once, indeed, 
we saw one chase another round the garden ; but, with 
this exception, nothing like vigorous exertion has been 
visible. 

Why this Difference Why this astonishing differ- 
ence ? Is it that the constitution of the girl differs so 
entirely from that of a boy as not to need these active 
exercises? Is it that a girl has none of the prompt- 
ings to vociferous play by which boys are impelled ? 
Or is it that while in boys these promptings are to 



Physical Education. 203 

be regarded as securing that bodily activity with- 
out which there cannot be adequate development, to 
their sisters nature has given them for no purpose what- 
ever — unless it be for the vexation of schoolmistresses? 
Perhaps, however, we mistake the aim of those who 
train the gentler sex. We have a vague suspicion that 
to produce a robust physique is thought undesirable ; 
that rude health and abundant vigor are considered 
somewhat plebeian ; that a certain delicacy, a strength 
not competent to more than a mile or two's walk, an 
appetite fastidious and easily satisfied, joined with that 
timidity which commonly accompanies feebleness, are 
held more ladylike. We do not expect that any would 
distinctly avow this ; but we fancy the governess mind 
is haunted by an ideal young lady bearing not a little 
resemblance to this type. If so, it must be admitted 
that the established system is admirably calculated to 
realize this ideal. But to suppose that such is the ideal 
of the opposite sex is a profound mistake. That men 
are not commonly drawn towards masculine women, is 
doubtless true. That such relative weakness as calls 
for the protection of superior strength is an element of 
attraction, we quite admit. But the difference to which 
the feelings thus respond is the natural, pre-established 
difference, which will assert itself without artificial ap- 
pliances. And when, by artificial appliances, the degree 
of this difference is increased, it becomes an element 
of repulsion rather than attraction. 

Groundless Fears. — " Then girls should be allowed to 
run wild — to become as rude as boys, and grow up into 
romps and hoydens ! " exclaims some defender of the 
proprieties. This, we presume, is the ever-present dread 
of schoolmistresses. It appears, on inquiry, that at 
"Establishments for Young Ladies" noisy play like 
that daily indulged in by boys is a punishable offence ; 



204 Education. 

and it is to be inferred that this noisy play is forbidden 
lest unlady-like habits should be formed. The fear is 
quite groundless, however. For if the sportive activity 
allowed to boys does not prevent them from growing 
up into gentlemen, why should a like sportive activity 
allowed to girls prevent them from growing up into 
ladies? Rough as may have been their accustomed 
playground frolics, youths who have left school do not 
indulge in leapfrog in the street or marbles in the draw- 
ing-room. Abandoning their jackets, they abandon at 
the same time boyish games, and display an anxiety — 
often a ludicrous anxiety — to avoid whatever is not 
manly. If now, on arriving at the due age, this feeling 
of masculine dignity puts so efficient a restraint on the 
romping sports of boyhood, will not the feeling of fem- 
inine modesty, gradually strengthening as maturity is 
approached, put an efficient restraint on the like sports 
of girlhood? Have not women even a greater regard 
for appearances than men? and will there not conse- 
quently arise in them even a stronger check to what- 
ever is rough or boisterous ? How absurd is the sup- 
position that the womanly instincts would not assert 
themselves but for the rigorous discipline of school- 
mistresses ! 

Gymnastics Defective. — In this as in other cases, to 
.remedy the evils of one artificiality another artificiality 
has been introduced. The natural spontaneous exer- 
cise having been forbidden, and the bad consequences 
of no exercise having become conspicuous, there has 
been adopted a system of factitious exercise — gymnas- 
tics. That this is better than nothing we admit ; but 
that it is an adequate substitute for play we deny. The 
defects are both positive and negative. 

In the first place, these formal, muscular motions, 
necessarily much less varied than those accompanying 



Physical Education. 205 

juvenile sports, do not secure so equable a distribution 
of action to all parts of the body ; whence it results 
that the exertion, falling on special parts, produces 
fatigue sooner than it would else have done ; add to 
which, that, if constantly repeated, this exertion of 
special parts leads to a disproportionate development. 

Again, the quantity of exercise thus taken will be de- 
ficient, not only in consequence of uneven distribution, 
but it will be further deficient in consequence of lack 
of interest. Even when not made repulsive, as they 
sometimes are, by assuming the shape of appointed 
lessons, these monotonous movements are sure to be- 
come wearisome from the absence of amusement. Com- 
petition, it is true, serves as a stimulus, but it is not 
a lasting stimulus, like that enjoyment which accom- 
panies varied play. 

Both as to Quantity and Quality. — Not only, how- 
ever, are gymnastics inferior in respect of the quantify 
of muscular exertion which they secure ; they are still 
more inferior in respect of the quality. This com- 
parative want of enjoyment to which we have just 
referred as a cause of early desistance from artificial 
exercises, is also a cause of inferiority in the effects 
they produce on the system. The common assump- 
tion that so long as the amount of bodily action is 
the same, it matters not whether it be pleasurable or 
otherwise, is a grave mistake. An agreeable mental 
excitement has a highly invigorating influence. See 
the effect produced upon an invalid by good news or 
by the visit of an old friend. Mark how careful medi- 
cal men are to recommend lively society to debilitated 
patients. Remember how beneficial to the health is 
the gratification produced by change of scene. The 
truth is that happiness is the most powerful of tonics. 
By accelerating the circulation of the blood it facili- 



206 Education. 

tates the performance of every function, and so tends 
alike to increase health when it exists, and to restore it 
when it has been lost. 

Play Better Than Gymnastics — Hence the essential 
superiority of play to gymnastics. The extreme in- 
terest felt by children in their games, and the riotous 
glee with which they carry on their rougher frolics, are 
of as much importance as the accompanying exertion. 
And as not supplying these mental stimuli, gymnastics 
must be fundamentally defective. 

Granting then, as we do, that formal exercises of the 
limbs are better than nothing ; granting, further, that 
they may be used with advantage as supplementary 
aids, — we yet contend that such formal exercises can 
never supply the place of the exercises prompted by 
nature. For girls as well as boys, the sportive activi- 
ties to which the instincts impel are essential to bodily 
welfare. Whoever forbids them forbids the divinely- 
appointed means to physical development. 

Deterioration of the Race. — A topic still remains— one 
perhaps more urgently demanding consideration than 
any of the foregoing. It is asserted by not a few, that 
among the educated classes the younger adults and 
those who are verging upon maturity are, on the 
average, neither so well grown nor so strong as their 
seniors. When first we heard this assertion, we were 
inclined to disregard it as one of the many manifesta- 
tions of the old tendency to exalt the past at the ex- 
pense of the present. Calling to mind the facts that, 
as measured by ancient armor, modern men are proved 
to be larger than ancient men, and that the tables of 
mortality show no diminution, but rather an increase 
in the duration of life, we paid little attention to what 
seemed a groundless belief. Detailed observation, how- 
ever, has greatly shaken our opinion. Omitting from 



Physical Education. 207 

the comparison the laboring classes-, we have noticed a 
majority of cases in which the children do not reach the 
stature of their parents ; and in massiveness, making 
due allowance for difference of age, there seems a like 
inferiority. In health, the contrast appears still greater. 
Men of past generations, living riotously as they did, 
could bear much more than men of the present genera- 
tion, who live soberly, can bear. Though they drank 
hard, kept irregular hours, were regardless of fresh air, 
and thought little of cleanliness, our recent ancestors 
were capable of prolonged application without injury, 
even to a ripe old age : witness the annals of the bench 
and the bar. Yet we who think much about our bodily 
welfare, who eat with moderation and do not drink to 
excess, who attend to ventilation and use frequent 
ablutions, who make annual excursions, and have the 
benefit of greater medical knowledge, we are continu- 
ally breaking down under our work. Paying consider- 
able attention to the laws of health, we seem to be 
weaker than our grandfathers, who in many respects 
defied the laws of health. And judging from the ap- 
pearance and frequent ailments of the rising genera- 
tion, they are likely to be even less robust than our- 
selves. 

Causes. — What is the meaning of this ? Is it that 
past over-feeding, alike of adults and juveniles, was less 
injurious than the under-feeding to which we have 
adverted as now so general ? Is it that the deficient 
clothing which this delusive hardening theory has en- 
couraged is to blame ? Is it that the greater or less 
discouragement of juvenile sports, in deference to a 
false refinement, is the cause ? From our reasonings it 
may be inferred that each of these has probably had a 
share in producing the evil. But there has been yet 
another detrimental influence at work, perhaps more 



208 Education. 

potent than any of the others : we mean — excess of 
mental application. 

Pressure of Life. — On old and young the pressure of 
modern life puts a still-increasing strain. In all busi- 
nesses and professions, intenser competition taxes the 
energies and abilities of every adult ; and, with the view 
of better fitting the young to hold their place under 
this intenser competition, they are subject to a more 
severe discipline than heretofore. The damage is thus 
doubled. Fathers, who find not only that they are run 
hard by their multiplying competitors, but that while 
laboring under this disadvantage they have to maintain 
a more expensive style of living, are all the year round 
obliged to work early and late, taking little exercise, 
and getting but short holidays. The constitutions, 
shaken by this long-continued over-application, they 
bequeath to their children. And then these compara- 
tively feeble children, predisposed as they are to break 
down even under an ordinary strain upon their ener- 
gies, are required to go through a curriculum much 
more extended than that prescribed for the unenfeebled 
children of past generations. 

Over-study of Children. — That disastrous consequen- 
ces must result from this cumulative transgression 
might be predicted with certainty ; and that they do 
result, every observant person knows. Go where you 
will, and before long there come under your notice 
cases of children or youths, of either sex, more or less 
injured by undue study. Here, to recover from a state 
of debility thus produced, a year's rustication has been 
found necessary. There you find a chronic congestion 
of the brain, that has already lasted many months, and 
threatens to last much longer. Now you hear of a fever 
that resulted from the over-excitement in some way 
brought on at school. And, again, the instance is that 



Physical Education. 209 

of a youth who has already had once to desist from his 
studies, and who, since he has returned to them, is fre- 
quently taken out of his class in a fainting fit. We 
state facts — facts that have not been sought for, but 
have been thrust upon our observation during the last 
two years, and that, too, with a very limited range. 

An Instance. — Nor have we by any means exhausted 
the list. Quite recently we had the opportunity of 
marking how the evil becomes hereditary : the case 
being that of a lady of robust parentage, whose system 
was so injured by the regime of a Scotch boarding- 
school, where she was under-fed and over-worked, that 
she invariably suffers from vertigo on rising in the 
morning ; and whose children, inheriting this enfeebled 
brain, are several of them unable to bear even a moder- 
ate amount of study without headache or giddiness. 

Another Instance. — At the present time we have daily 
under our eyes a young lady whose system has been 
damaged for life by the college-course through which 
she has passed. Taxed as she was to such an extent 
that she had no energy left for exercise, she is, now that 
she has finished her education, a constant complainant. 
Appetite small and very capricious, mostly refusing 
meat ; extremities perpetually cold, even when the 
weather is warm ; a feebleness which forbids anything 
but the slowest walking, and that only for a short 
time; palpitation on going up-stairs; greatly impaired 
vision — these, joined with checked growth and lax 
tissue, are among the results entailed. 

And to her case we may add that of her friend and 
fellow-student — who is similarly weak, who is liable to 
faint even under the excitement of a quiet party of 
friends, and who has at length been obliged by her 
medical attendant to desist from study entirely. 



210 Education. 

Effects of Over-exertion on the Young.— If injuries so 
conspicuous are thus frequent, how very general must 
be the smaller and inconspicuous injuries ! To one case 
where positive illness is directly traceable to over-appli- 
cation, there are probably at least half-a-dozen cases 
where the evil is unobtrusive and slowly accumulating 
— cases where there is frequent derangement of the 
functions, attributed to this or that special cause, or to 
constitutional delicacy ; cases where there is retarda- 
tion and premature arrest of bodily growth ; cases 
where a latent tendency to consumption is brought out 
and established ; cases where a predisposition is given 
to that now common cerebral disorder brought on by 
the hard work of adult life. How commonly consti- 
tutions are thus undermined, will be clear to all who, 
after noting the frequent ailments of hard-worked pro- 
fessional and mercantile men, will reflect on the disas- 
trous effects which undue application must produce 
upon the undeveloped systems of the young. The 
young are competent to bear neither as much hardship, 
nor as much physical exertion, nor as much mental ex- 
tion, as the full-grown. Judge, then, if the full-grown 
so manifestly suffer from the excessive mental exertion 
required of them, how great must be the damage which 
a mental exertion, often equally excessive, inflicts upon 
the young ! 

Example of School-drill. — Indeed, when we examine 
the merciless school-drill to which many children are 
subjected, the wonder is, not that it does great injury, 
but that it can be borne at all. Take the instance given 
by Sir John Forbes from personal knowledge, and 
which he asserts, after much inquiry, to be an average 
sample of the middle-class girl's-school system through- 
out England. Omitting the detailed divisions of time, 
we quote the summary of the twenty-four hours : 



Physical Education. 2 1 t 

In bed . 9 hours (the younger 10) 

In school, at their studies and tasks . . g " 

In school, or in the house, the older at op- 
tional studies or work, the younger at play. 2i " (the younger 2|) 

At meals . . . . . . i| " 

Exercise in the open air, in the shape of a 
formal walk, often with lesson-books in 
hand, and even this only when the weather 
is fine at the appointed time . . 1 " 



24 



Results. — Dr. Forbes. — And what are the results of 
this " astounding regimen," as Sir John Forbes terms 
it? Of course feebleness, pallor, want of spirits, gen- 
eral ill-health. But he describes something more. This 
utter disregard of physical welfare, out of extreme 
anxiety to cultivate the mind, this prolonged exercise 
of the brain and deficient exercise of the limbs, he 
found to be habitually followed, not only by disordered 
functions, but by malformation. He says : " We lately 
visited, in a large town, a boarding-school containing 
forty girls, and we learnt, on close and accurate in- 
quiry, that there was not one of the girls who had been 
at the school two years (and the majority had been as 
long) that was not more or less crooked!"* 

A Training-college Visited. — It may be that since 
1833, when this was written, some improvement has 
taken place. We hope it has. But that the system is 
still common — nay, that it is in some cases carried even 
to a greater extreme than ever — we can personally 
testify. We recently went over a training-college for 
young men — one of those instituted of late years for 
the purpose of supplying schools with well-disciplined 
teachers. Here, under official supervision, where some- 

* "Cyclopaedia of Practical Medicine," vol. i. pp. 697, 698. 



212 . Education. 

thing better than the judgment of private school- 
mistresses might have been looked for, we found the 
daily routine to be as follows : 

At 6 o'clock the students are called; 
" 7 to 8 studies; 

" 8 to. 9 Scripture reading, prayers, and breakfast; 
" 9 to 12 studies; 
" 12 to ij leisure, nominally devoted to walk or other exercise, but 

often spent in study; 
" i i to 2 dinner, the meal commonly occupying twenty minutes; 
" 2 to 5 studies; 
" 5 to 6 tea and relaxation; 
" 6 to S£ studies; 

" 8^ to g% private studies in preparing lessons for the next day; 
" io to bed. 

Thus, out of the twenty-four hours, eight are devoted 
to sleep ; four and a quarter are occupied in dressing, 
prayers, meals, and the brief periods of rest accompany- 
ing them ; ten and a half are given to study ; and one 
and a quarter to exercise, which is optional and often 
avoided. Not only, however, is it that the ten and a 
half hours of recognized study are frequently increased 
to eleven and a half by devoting to books the time set 
apart for exercise, but some of the students who are 
not quick in learning get up at four o'clock in the 
morning to prepare their lessons, and are actuallv 
encouraged by their teachers to do this ! The course 
to be passed through in a given time is so extensive, 
the teachers, whose credit is at stake in getting their 
pupils well through the examinations, are so urgent, 
and the difficulty of satisfying the requirements is so 
great, that pupils are not uncommonly induced to 
spend twelve and thirteen hours a day in mental labor! 

The Effects. — It needs no prophet to see that the 
bodily injury inflicted must be great. As we were told 



Physical Education. 213 

by one of the inmates, those who arrive with fresh com- 
plexions quickly become blanched. Illness is frequent : 
there are always some on the sick-list. Failure of appe- 
tite and indigestion are very common. Diarrhoea is a 
prevalent disorder — not uncommonly a third of the 
whole number of students suffering under it at the 
same time. Headache is generally complained of, and 
by some is borne almost daily for months. While a 
certain percentage break down entirely, and go away. 

Founded in Ignorance. — That this should be the 
regimen of what is in some sort a model institution, 
established and superintended by the embodied enlight- 
enment of the age, is a startling fact. That the severe 
examinations, joined with the short period assigned for 
preparation, should practically compel recourse to a 
system which inevitably undermines the health of all 
who pass through it, is proof, if not of cruelty, then of 
woful ignorance. 

Doubtless the case is in a great degree exceptional — 
perhaps to be paralleled only in other institutions of 
the same class. But that cases so extreme should exist 
at all, indicates pretty clearly how great is the extent 
to which the minds of the rising generation are over- 
tasked. Expressing as they do the ideas of the educated 
community, these training-colleges, even in the absence 
of all other evidence, would conclusively imply a pre- 
vailing tendency to an unduly urgent system of culture. 

The Order and Rate in Mental Unfolding must be 
Obeyed. — It seems strange that there should be so little 
consciousness of the dangers of over-education during 
youth, when there is so general a consciousness of the 
dangers of over-education during childhood. Most 
parents are more or less aware of the evil consequences 
that follow infant precocity. In every society may be 
heard reprobation of those who too early stimulate the 



214 Education. 

minds of their little ones. And the dread of this early- 
stimulation is great in proportion as there is adequate 
knowledge of the effects : witness the implied opinion 
of one of our most distinguished professors of physiol- 
ogy, who told us that he did not intend his little boy to 
learn any lessons until he was eight years old. But 
while to all it is a familiar truth that a forced develop- 
ment of intelligence in childhood entails disastrous re- 
sults, — either physical feebleness, or ultimate stupidity, 
or early death, — it appears not to be perceived that 
throughout youth the same truth holds. Yet it is 
certain that it must do so. There is a given order in 
which, and a given rate at which, the faculties unfold. 
If the course of education conforms itself to that order 
and rate, well. If not, — if the higher faculties are early 
taxed by presenting an order of knowledge more com- 
plex and abstract than can be readily assimilated ; or if, 
by excess of culture, the intellect in general is developed 
to a degree beyond that which is natural to the age, — 
the abnormal result so produced will inevitably be 
accompanied by some equivalent, or more than equiva- 
lent, evil. 

Nature will Punish. — For Nature is a strict account- 
ant ; and if you demand of her in one direction more 
than she is prepared to lay out, she balances the account 
by making a deduction elsewhere. If you will let her 
follow her own course, taking care to supply, in right 
quantities and kinds, the raw materials of bodily and 
mental growth required at each age, she will eventually 
produce an individual more or less evenly developed. 
If, however, you insist on premature or undue growth 
of any one part, she will, with more or less protest, con- 
cede the point ; but that she may do your extra work, 
she must leave some of her more important work un- 
done. Let it never be forgotten that the amount of 



Physical Education. 2 1 5 

vital energy which the body at any moment possesses 
is limited ; and that, being limited, it is impossible to 
get from it more than a fixed quantity of results. In a 
child or youth the demands upon this vital energy are 
various and urgent. As before pointed out, the waste 
consequent on the day's bodily exercise has to be re- 
paired ; the wear of brain entailed by the day's study 
has to be made good ; a certain additional growth of 
body has to be provided for, and also a certain addi- 
tional growth of brain : add to which the amount of 
energy absorbed in the digestion of the large quantity 
of food required for meeting these many demands. 

Some Considerations. — Now, that to divert an excess 
of energy into any one of these channels is to abstract it 
from the others, is not only manifest a priori, but may 
be shown a posteriori from the experience of every one. 
Every one knows, for instance, that the digestion of a 
heavy meal makes such a demand on the system as to 
produce lassitude of mind and body, ending not unfre- 
quently in sleep. Every one knows, too, that excess of 
bodily exercise diminishes the power of thought ; that 
the temporary prostration following any sudden exer- 
tion, or the fatigue produced by a thirty miles' walk, is 
accompanied by a disinclination to mental effort ; that 
after a month's pedestrian tour the mental inertia is 
such that some days are required to overcome it ; and 
that in peasants who spend their lives in muscular labor 
-the activity of mind is very small. Again, it is a truth 
familiar to all, that during those fits of extreme rapid 
growth which sometimes occur in childhood the great 
abstraction of energy is shown in the attendant prostra- 
tion, bodily and mental. 

Effects of Over-activity of the Brain.— Once more, the 
facts that violent muscular exertion after eating will 
stop digestion, and that children who are early put to 



216 Education. 

hard labor become stunted, similarly exhibit the antag- 
onism — similarly imply that excess of activity in one 
direction involves deficiency of it in other directions. 
Now, the law which is thus manifest in extreme cases 
holds in all cases. These injurious abstractions of en- 
ergy as certainly take place when the undue demands 
are slight and constant as when they are great and 
sudden. Hence if in youth the expenditure in mental 
labor exceeds that which nature had provided for, the 
expenditure for other purposes falls below what it 
should have been, and evils of one kind or other are 
inevitably entailed. Let us briefly consider these evils. 

Further Discussion. — Supposing the over-activity of 
brain not to be extreme, but to exceed the normal ac- 
tivity only in a moderate degree, there will be nothing 
more than some slight reaction on the development of 
the body : the stature falling a little below that which 
it would else have reached, or the bulk being less 
than it would have been, or the quality of tissue 
being not so good. One or more of these effects must 
necessarily occur. The extra quantity of blood sup- 
plied to the brain, not only during the period of mental 
exertion, but during the subsequent period in which the 
waste of cerebral substance is being made good, is 
blood that would else have been circulating through 
the limbs and viscera, and the amount of growth or re- 
pair for which that blood would have supplied materials 
is lost. This physical reaction being certain, the ques- 
tion is, whether the gain resulting from the extra culture 
is equivalent to the loss ; — whether defect of bodily 
growth, or the want of that structural perfection which 
gives high vigor and endurance, is compensated for by 
the additional knowledge gained. 

Growth and Development. — When the excess of mental 
exertion is greater, there follow results far more serious, 



Physical Education. 217 

telling not only against bodily perfection, but against 
the perfection of the brain itself. It is a physiological 
law, first pointed out by M. Isidore St. Hilaire, and to 
which attention has been drawn by Mr. Lewes in his 
essay on " Dwarfs and Giants," that there is an antagon- 
ism between growth and development. . By growth, as used 
in this antithetical sense, is to be understood increase 
of size; by development, increase of structure. And the 
law is, that great activity in either of these processes 
involves retardation or arrest of the other. A familiar 
illustration is furnished by the cases of the caterpillar 
and the chrysalis. In the caterpillar there is extremely 
rapid augmentation of bulk ; but the structure is 
scarcely at all more complex when the caterpillar is 
full-grown than when it is small. In the chrysalis the 
bulk does not increase : on the contrary, weight is lost 
during this stage of the creature's life ; but the elabora- 
tion of a more complex structure goes on with great 
activity. 

Applications of the Rule. — The antagonism, here so 
clear, is less traceable in higher creatures, because the 
two processes are carried on together. But we see it 
pretty well illustrated among ourselves by contrasting 
the sexes. A girl develops in body and mind rapidly, 
and ceases to grow comparatively early. A boy's 
bodily and mental development is slower, and his 
growth greater. At the age when the one is mature, 
finished, and having all faculties in full play, the other, 
whose vital energies have been more directed towards 
increase of size, is relatively incomplete in structure, 
and shows it in a comparative awkwardness, bodily and 
mental. Now this law is true not only of the organism 
as a whole, but of each separate part. The abnormally 
rapid advance of any part in respect of structure in- 
volves premature arrest of its growth, and this hap- 



218 Education. 

pens with the organ of the mind as certainly as with 
any other organ. The brain, which during early years 
is relatively large in mass but imperfect in structure, 
will, if required to perform its functions with undue 
activity, undergo a structural advance greater than is 
appropriate to the age ; but the ultimate effect will be 
a falling short of the size and power that would else 
have been attained. And this is a part cause — probably 
the chief cause — why precocious children, and youths 
who up to a certain time were carrying all before them, 
so often stop short and disappoint the high hopes of 
their parents. 

Effect of Brain on the Body — But these results of 
over-education, disastrous as they are, are perhaps less 
disastrous than the results produced upon the health — 
the undermined constitution, the enfeebled energies, 
the morbid feelings. Recent discoveries in physiology 
have shown how immense is the influence of the brain 
over the functions of the body. The digestion of the 
food, the circulation of the blood, and through these all 
other organic processes, are profoundly affected by 
cerebral excitement. Whoever has seen repeated, as 
we have, the experiment first performed by Weber, 
showing the consequence of irritating the vagus nerve 
which connects the brain with the viscera; whoever has 
seen the action of the heart suddenly arrested by the 
irritation of this nerve, slowly recommencing when the 
irritation is suspended, and again arrested the moment 
it is renewed, — will have a vivid conception of the de- 
pressing influence which an overwrought brain exer- 
cises on the body. The effects thus physiologically 
explained are indeed exemplified in ordinary experi- 
ence. There is no one but has felt the palpitation 
accompanying hope, fear, anger, joy ; no one but has 
observed how labored becomes the action of the heart 



Physical Education. 2 1 9 

when these feelings are very violent. And though there 
are many who have never themselves suffered that ex- 
treme emotional excitement which is followed by arrest 
of the heart's action and fainting, yet everyone knows 
them to be cause and effect. 

As to Digestion. — It is a familiar fact, too, that dis- 
turbance of the stomach is entailed by mental excite- 
ment exceeding a certain intensity. Loss of appetite is 
a common result alike of very pleasurable and very 
painful states of mind. When the event producing a 
pleasurable or painful state of mind occurs shortly after 
a meal, it not unfrequently happens either that the 
stomach rejects what has been eaten, or digests it with 
great difficulty and under prolonged protest. And as 
every one who taxes his brain much can testify, even 
purely intellectual action will, when excessive, produce 
analogous effects. Now the relation between brain and 
body which is so manifest in these extreme cases holds 
equally in ordinary, less-marked cases. Just as these 
violent but temporary cerebral excitements produce 
violent but temporary disturbances of the viscera, so 
do the less violent but chronic cerebral excitements 
produce less violent but chronic visceral disturbances. 
This is not simply an inference — it is a truth to which 
every medical man can bear witness, and it is one to 
which a long and sad experience enables us to give per- 
sonal testimony. 

The Heart Affected also. — Various degrees and forms 
of bodily derangement, often taking years of enforced 
idleness to set partially right, result from this prolonged 
over-exertion of mind. Sometimes the heart is chiefly 
affected : habitual palpitations, a pulse much enfeebled, 
and very generally a diminution in the number of beats 
from seventy-two to sixty, or even fewer. Sometimes 
the conspicuous disorder is of the stomach — a dyspepsia 



220 Education. 

which makes life a burden, and is amenable to no 
remedy but time. In many cases both heart and 
stomach are implicated. Mostly the sleep is short and 
broken, and very generally there is more or less mental 
depression. 

Children More Affected than Adults — Consider, then, 
how great must be the damage inflicted by undue men- 
tal excitement on children and youths. More or less of 
this constitutional disturbance will inevitably follow an 
exertion of brain beyond that which nature had pro- 
vided for ; and when not so excessive as to produce 
absolute illness, is sure to entail a slowly accumulating 
degeneracy of physique. With a small and fastidious 
appetite, an imperfect digestion, and an enfeebled circu- 
lation, how can the developing body flourish ? The 
due performance of every vital' process depends on the 
adequate supply of good blood. Without enough good 
blood, no gland can secrete properly, no viscuscan fully 
discharge its office. Without enough good blood, no 
nerve, muscle, membrane, or other tissue can be effi- 
ciently repaired. Without enough good blood, growth 
will neither be sound nor sufficient. Judge, then, how 
bad must be the consequences when to a growing body 
the weakened stomach supplies blood that is deficient 
in quantity and poor in quality, while the debilitated 
heart propels this poor and scanty blood with unnatu- 
ral slowness. 

As to Effects of Cramming.— And if, as all who can- 
didly investigate the matter must admit, physical de- 
generacy is a consequence of excessive study, how grave 
is the condemnation to be passed upon this cramming 
system above exemplified. It is a terrible mistake, 
from whatever point of view regarded. It is a mistake 
in so far as the mere acquirement of knowledge is 
concerned : for it is notorious that the mind, like the 



Physical Education. 2 2 1 

body, cannot assimilate beyond a certain rate ; and if 
you ply it with facts faster than it can assimilate them, 
they are very soon rejected again : they do not become 
permanently built into the intellectual fabric, but fall 
out of recollection after the passing of the examination 
for which they were got up. 

It is a mistake, too, because it tends to make study 
distasteful. Either through the painful associations 
produced by ceaseless mental toil, or through the ab- 
normal state of brain it leaves behind, it often generates 
as aversion to books ; and instead of that subsequent 
self-culture induced by a rational education, there 
comes a continued retrogression. 

It is a mistake, also, inasmuch as it assumes that the 
acquisition of knowledge is everything, and forgets that 
a much more important matter is the organization of 
knowledge, for which time and spontaneous thinking 
are requisite. Just as Humboldt remarks respecting 
the progress of intelligence in general, that " the inter- 
pretation of nature is obscured when the description 
languishes under too great an accumulation of insulated 
facts," so it may be remarked respecting the progress 
of individual intelligence, that the mind is overburdened 
and hampered by an excess of ill-digested information. 

What Knowledge is Valuable. — It is not the knowledge 
stored up as intellectual fat which is of value, but that 
which is turned into intellectual muscle. But the mis- 
take is still deeper. Even were the system good as a 
system of intellectual training, which it is not, it would 
still be bad, because, as we have shown, it is fatal to 
that vigor of physique which is needful to make intel- 
lectual training available in the struggle of life. Those 
who, in eagerness to cultivate their pupils' minds, are 
reckless of their bodies, do not remember that success 
in the world depends much more upon energy than 



222 Education. 

upon information, and that a policy which in cram- 
ming with information undermines energy is self-de- 
feating. The strong will and untiring activity which 
result from abundant animal vigor go far to compen- 
sate even for great defects of education ; and when 
joined with that quite adequate education which may 
be obtained without sacrificing health, they insure an 
easy victory over competitors enfeebled by excessive 
study— prodigies of learning though they may be. 

Example of the Engine. — A comparatively small and 
ill-made engine, worked at high-pressure, will do more 
than a larger and well-finished one worked at low-pres- 
sure. What folly is it, then, while finishing the engine, 
so to damage the boiler that it will not generate steam! 
Once more, the system is a mistake, as involving a false 
estimate of welfare in life. Even supposing it were a 
means to worldly success, instead of a means to worldly 
failure, yet in the entailed ill-health it would inflict a 
more than equivalent curse. What boots it to have at- 
tained wealth if the wealth is accompanied by ceaseless 
ailments? What is the worth of distinction if it has 
brought hypochondria with it ? Surely none needs tell- 
ing that a good digestion, a bounding pulse, and high 
spirits are elements of happiness which no external ac- 
vantages can outbalance. Chronic bodily disorder 
casts a gloom over the brightest prospects ; while the 
vivacity of strong health gilds even misfortune. We 
contend, then, that this over-education is vicious in 
every way — vicious, as giving knowledge that will soon 
be forgotten ; vicious, as producing a disgust for knowl- 
edge ; vicious, as neglecting that organization of 
knowledge which is more important than its acquisi- 
tion ; vicious, as weakening or destroying that energy 
without which a trained intellect is useless ; vicious, as 



Physical Education. 223 

entailing that ill-health for which even success would 
not compensate, and which makes failure doubly bitter. 

Effects on Women. — On women the effects of this 
forcing system are, if possible, even more injurious than 
on men. Being in great measure debarred from those 
vigorous and enjoyable exercises of body by which boys 
mitigate the evils of excessive study, girls feel these 
evils in their full intensity. Hence the much smaller 
proportion of them who grow up well-made and healthy. 
In the pale, angular, flat-chested young ladies, so abun- 
dant in London drawing-rooms, we see the effect of 
merciless application unrelieved by youthful sports ; 
and this physical degeneracy exhibited by them hinders 
their welfare far more than their many accomplishments 
aid it. Mammas anxious to make their daughters at- 
tractive could scarcely choose a course more fatal than 
this, which sacrifices the body to the mind. Either they 
disregard the tastes of the opposite sex, or else their 
conception of those tastes is erroneous. 

What Men Desire in Women. — Men care comparatively 
little for erudition in women, but very much for physi- 
cal beauty, and good-nature, and sound sense. How 
many conquests does the blue-stocking make through 
her extensive knowledge of history ? What man ever 
fell in love with a woman because she understood Ital- 
ian ? Where is the Edwin who was brought to Angel- 
ina's feet by her German ? But rosy cheeks and laugh- 
ing eyes are great attractions. A finely-rounded figure 
draws admiring glances. The liveliness and good- 
humor that overflowing health produces go a great 
way towards establishing attachments. Every one 
knows cases where bodily perfections, in the absence of 
all other recommendations, have incited a passion that 
carried all before it ; but scarcely any one can point to 
a case where mere intellectual acquirements, apart from 



224 Education. 

moral or physical attributes, have aroused such a feel- 
ing. 

Physical Attractions are Powerful. — The truth is, that 
out of the many elements uniting in various propor- 
tions to produce in a man's breast that complex emo- 
tion which we call love, the strongest are those produced 
by physical attractions ; the next in order of strength 
are those produced by moral attractions, the weakest 
are those produced by intellectual attractions, and 
even these are dependent much less upon acquired 
knowledge than on natural faculty — quickness, wit, in- 
sight. If any think the assertion a derogatory one, and 
inveigh against the masculine character for being thus 
swayed, we reply that they little know what they say 
when they thus call in question the Divine ordinations. 
Even were there no obvious meaning in the arrange- 
ment, we might be sure that some important end was 
subserved. But the meaning is quite obvious to those 
who examine. 

Why This is So. — It needs but to remember that one 
of Nature's ends, or rather her supreme end, is the wel- 
fare of posterity ; it needs but to remember that, in so 
far as posterity are concerned, a cultivated intelligence 
based upon a bad physique is of little worth, seeing that 
its descendants will die out in a generation or two ; it 
needs but to bear in mind that a good physique, however 
poor the accompanying mental endowments is worth 
preserving, because throughout future generations the 
mental endowments may be indefinitely developed — it 
needs but to contemplate these truths to see how im- 
portant is the balance of instincts above described. 
But, purpose apart, the instincts being thus balanced, 
it is a fatal folly to persist in a system which under- 
mines a girl's constitution that it may overload her 
memory. 



Physical Education. 225 

Educate High, but not to Deterioration. — Educate as 
highly as possible — the higher the better — providing 
no bodily injury is entailed (and we may remark in 
passing, that a high standard might be so reached 
were the parrot-faculty cultivated less and the human 
faculty more, and were the discipline extended over 
that now wasted period between leaving school and 
being married). But to educate in such a manner 
or to such extent as to produce physical degeneracy, 
is to defeat the chief end for which the toil and cost 
and anxiety are submitted to. By subjecting their 
daughters to this high-pressure system parents fre- 
quently ruin their prospects in life. Not only do they 
inflict on them enfeebled health, with all its pains and 
disabilities and gloom, but very often they actually 
doom them to celibacy. 

Conclusion. — Our general conclusion is, then, that the 
ordinary treatment of children is in various ways 
seriously prejudicial. It errs in deficient feeding, in 
deficient clothing, in deficient exercise (among girls at 
least), and in excessive mental application. Consider- 
ing the regime as a whole, its tendency is too exacting : 
it asks too much and gives too little. In the extent to 
which it taxes the vital energies it makes the juvenile 
life much more like the adult life than it should be. It 
overlooks the truth that as in the foetus the entire 
vitality is expended in the direction of growth ; as in 
the infant the expenditure of vitality in growth is so 
great as to leave extremely little for either physical or 
mental action, — so throughout childhood and youth 
growth is the dominant requirement to which all others 
must be subordinated : a requirement which dictates 
the giving of much and the taking away of little ; a re- 
quirement which therefore restricts the exertion of body 
and mind to a degree proportionate to the rapidity of 



226 Education. 

growth ; a requirement which permits the mental and 
physical activities to increase only as fast as the rate of 
growth diminishes. 

Over-respect for Mind . — Regarded from another 
point of view, this high-pressure education manifestly 
results from our passing phase of civilization. In 
primitive times, when aggression and defence were the 
leading social activities, bodily vigor with its accom- 
panying courage were the desiderata, and then educa- 
tion was almost wholly physical : mental cultivation 
was little cared for, and indeed, as in our own feudal 
ages, was often treated with contempt. But now that 
our state is relatively peaceful— -now that muscular 
power is of use for little else than manual labor, while 
social success of nearly every kind depends very much 
on mental power, our education has become almost ex- 
clusively mental. Instead of respecting the body and 
ignoring the mind, we now respect the mind and ignore 
the body. Both these attitudes are wrong. We do not 
yet sufficiently realize the truth that as in this life of 
ours the physical underlies the mental, the mental 
must not be developed at the expense of the physical. 
The ancient and modern conceptions must be combined. 

Health a Duty. — Perhaps nothing will so much 
hasten the time when body and mind will both be ade- 
quately cared for as a diffusion of the belief that the 
preservation of health is a duty. Few seem conscious 
that there is such a thing as physical morality. Men's 
habitual words and acts imply the idea that they are at 
liberty to treat their bodies as they please. Disorders 
entailed by disobedience to Nature's dictates they re- 
gard simply as grievances — not as the effects of a con- 
duct more or less flagitious. Though the evil conse- 
quences inflicted on their dependents and on future 
generations are often as great as those caused by crime, 



Physical Education. 



227 



yet they do not think themselves in any degree crim- 
inal. It is true that in the. case of drunkenness the 
viciousness of a purely bodily transgression is recog- 
nized; but none appear to infer that if this bodily trans- 
gression is vicious, so too is every bodily transgression. 
The fact is, that all breaches of the laws of health are 
physical sins. When this is generally seen, then, and 
perhaps not till then, will the physical training of the 
young receive all the attention it deserves. 




The School Journal 

is published weekly at $2.50 a year and is in its 23rd year. 
It is the oldest, best known and widest circulated educational 
weekly in the U. S. The Journal is filled with ideas that will 
surely advance the teachers' conception of education. The best 
brain work on the work of professional teaching is found in it 
— not theoretical essays, nor pieces scissored out of other 
journals — The School Journal has its own special writers — 
the ablest in the world. 

THE PRIMARY SUPPLEnENT 

of The Journal, is published in separate form monthly from 
September to June at $1.00. It is the ideal paper for primary 
teachers, being devoted almost exclusively to original primary 
methods and devices. 

The Teachers' Institute 

is published monthly, at $1.25 a year ; 12 large 44 page papers 
constitute a year — most other educational monthlies publish 10, 
some 9. It is edited in the same spirit and from the same cand- 
point as the Journal, and has ever since it was started in 
1878 been the most popular educational monthly published, circu- 
lating in every state. Every line is to the point. It is finely 
printed and crowded with illustrations made for it. Every 
study taught by the average teacher is covered in each issue. 

EDUCATIONAL FOUNDATIONS. 

This is not a paper: it is a series of small monthly volumes 
that bear on Professional Teaching. It is useful for those who 
want to study the foundations of education ; for Normal Schools, 
Training Classes, Teachers' Institutes and individual teachers. 
If you desire to teach professionally you will want it. Hand- 
some paper covers, 96 pp. each month. During 1892-93 Her- 
bert Spencer's famous book on "Education" will be printed 
in it 32 pp. at a time. This alone is worth at least $1.00. 

OUR TIMES. 

Was started two years ago to give a resume of the important news 
of the month — not the murders, the scandals, etc., but the news 
that bears upon the progress of the world and specially written 
for the schoolroom. In Sept. 1892 it was doubled in size, the 8 
extra pages giving many fresh dialogues, recitations and dec- 
lamations, and exercises for special days. This material alone 
during tne year would cost at least 50 cents in the cheapest 
book form. Club rates, 40 cents. 
*** Select the paper suited to your needs and send fot a free sample. 
Samples of all the papers 25 cents. 

E. L. KELLOGG & CO., New York and Chicago. 



Our 
Price to 
Teachers 



Best Books for Teachers, 

CLASSIFIED LIST UNDER SUBJECTS. 

To aid teachers to procure the books best suited to their purpose, we 
give below a list of our publications classified under subjects. The division 
is sometimes a difficult one to make, so that we have in many cases placed 
the same book under several titles ; for instance, Currie's Early Education 
appears under Principles and Practice of Education, and also 
Primary Education. Recent books are starred, thus * 

HISTOEY OF EDUCATION, GEEAT EDU- 

CATOES, ETC. RetaiL 

♦Allen's Historic Outlines of Education, - - paper .15 .13 

♦Browning's Aspects of Education Best edition. cloth .25 .20 

" Educational Theories, - - - cl. .50 .40 

♦Kellogg's Life of Pestalozzi, - paper .15 .13 

♦Lang's Comenius, ______ paper .15 .13 

* " Basedow, ------- paper .15 .12 

♦Phelps' Life of David P. Page, - - - - paper .15 .13 

Quick's Educational Reformers, Best edition. - cl. 1.00 .80 

♦Reinhart's History of Education, - cl. .25 .20 

PSYCHOLOGY AND EDUCATION 

Allen's Mind Studies for Young Teachers, - cl. .50 .40 

Allen's Temperament in Education, - cl. .50 .40 

Perez's First Three Years of Childhood. Best edition, cl. 1.50 1.30 

Welch's Teachers' Psychology, - - - - cl. 1.25 1.00 

" Talks on Psychology, - cl. .50 .40 

PEINCIPLES OF EDUCATION 

Carter's Artificial Stupidity in School, - - paper .15 .12 

Huntington's Unconscious Tuition, - - - paper .15 .13 

Payne's Lectures on Science and Art of Education, cl. 1.00 .80 

♦Reinhart's Principles of Education, - - - cl. .25 .20 

♦Spencer's Education. Best edition. - cl. 1.00 .80 

Tate's Philosophy of Education. Best edition. - cl. 1.50 1.30 

♦Teachers' Manual Series, 22 nos. ready, each, paper .15 .12 

PEINCIPLES AND PEACTICE OF 

Currie's Early Education, ----- 

Fitch's Art of Questioning, ------ 

" Art of Securing Attention 
" Lectures on Teaching, - 
Hughes' Mistakes in Teaching. Best edition. 

" Securing and Retaining Attention, Best 
♦Parker's Talks at Chautauqua. Nearly ready. 

" Talks on Teaching, - 

" Practical Teacher, - - - - - 
Quick's How to Train the Memory, - 
♦Reinhart's Principles of Education, 

♦ " Civics in Education, - - 
Southwick's Quiz Manual of Teaching, 
Yonge's Practical Work in School, - * - 



By 
Mail 
Extra 
.01 
.03 
.05 
.01 
.01 
.01 
.01 
.08 
.03 



.05 
.05 
.10 
.10 

.05 



EDUCATION 
cl. 1.25 1.00 
.15 

15 



paper 
paper 



cl. 1.2> 

cl. .50 

ed. cl. .50 
cl. 

cl. 1.25 

cl. 1.50 



.13 
.13 
1.00 
.40 
.40 



paper 
cl. 
cl. 
cl. 

paper 



METHODS OF TEACHING 

♦Augsburg's Easy Drawings for Geog. Class, - paper 

" Easy Things to Draw, - paper 

Calkins' Ear and Voice Training, - cl. 

Dewey's How to Teach Manners, - cl. 

Gladstone's Object Teaching, - paper 

Johnson's Education by Doing, - cl. 

♦Kellogg's How to Write Compositions - - paper 

" Map Drawing. Nearly ready. - cl. 

McMurry's How to Conduct the Recitation, - paper 

Patridge's Quincy Methods, Illustrated. - - cl. 

Seeley's Grube Method of Teaching Arithmetic, cl. 

" Grube Idea in Teaching Arithmetic - cl. 

Shaw and Donnell's School Devices, - - cl. 

Woodhull's Easy Experiments in Science, - cl. 



.15 
.15 
.25 

.75 
.15 



.50 
.50 
.15 

.75 
.15 

15 
1.75 
1.00 

.30 
1.25 

.50 



1.00 
1.30 
.13 
.13 
.20 
.60 
.12 



.40 
.34 
.40 
.40 
.13 
.60 
.13 

.12 
1.40 

.80 

.34 
l.OO 

.40 



.01 
.01 
.OS 
.03 

.10 
.10 

•01 



.08 
.01 
.01 
pd. 
.05 
.05 

.09 

.14 
.01 
.01 
.03 
.05 
.01 



.1(5 
.03 
.05 
.05 
.01 
.or. 

.01 
.01 

.1:; 
.07 
03 

.10 
.05 



SCHOOL MANAGEMENT 

Kellogg's School Management. - cl. .75 

Hughes' How to Keep Order, - paper .15 

Sidgwick's Stimulus in School, - paper .15 

KINDERGARTEN EDUCATION 

Autobiography of Froebel, - cl. .50 

Hoffman's Kindergarten Gifts, - paper .15 



PRIMARY EDUCATION 

Calkins' Ear and Voice Training, - cl. .50 

Currie's Early Education, ----- cl. 1.25 

Gladstone's Object Teaching, - " - paper .15 

Johnson's Education by Doing, - cl. .75 

Parker's Talus on Teaching, - cl. 1.25 

Patndge's Quincy Methods, - cl. 1.75 

Seeley's Grube Method of Teaching Arithmetic, cl. 1.00 

" Grube Idea in Primary Arithmetic, - cl. .30 

MANUAL TRAINING 

Butler's Argument for Manual Training, - - paper .15 

Leland's Practical Education, - cl. 2.00 

Love's Industrial Education, - cl. 1.50 

*TJpham's Fifty Lessons in Woodworking, - cl. .50 



QUESTION BOOKS FOR TEACHERS 



Analytical Question Series. Geography, - 
" " C. S. History, 

" " " Grammar, 

N. Y. State Examination Questions, - 
Shaw's National Question Book, 
Souttiwick's Handy Helps,- 



cl. 
cl. 

cl. 
cl. 

cl. 



.50 

.50 

.50 

1.00 

1.00 
.75 



.60 
.12 
.12 



.40 
.1* 



.40 

1.00 

.13 

.60 

1.00 

1.40 

.80 

.34 



.13 
1.60 
1.30 

.40 



.40 
.40 
.40 
.80 
1.75 
.80 
.60 



.05 
.01 
.01 



.05 
.01 



.05 
.08 
.01 
.05 
.09 
.13 
.07 
.03 



.01 
.10 
.12 
.05 



.05 
.05 
.05 
.08 
pd. 
.08 
.05 



.01 



.05 
.03 
.03 
.01 
.12 
.02 
.03 
.03 
.03 



Southwick's Quiz Maaual of Teaching. Best edition, cl. 

PHYSICAL EDUCATION and SCHOOL HYGIENE 

*Ba)lin's Physical Education. (In preparation.') 

Groff' s School Hygiene, _____ paper .15 .13 

MISCELLANEOUS 

Allen's Temperament in Education, - - - cl. .50 .40 

Augsburg's Easy Things to Draw, - paper .30 .34 

•Blaikie On S"lf Culture, ----- c l. .25 .30 

Fitch's Improvement in Education, - paper .15 .13 

Gardner's Town and Country School Buildings, cl. 2.50 3.00 

Lubbock's Best 100 Books, ----- paper .20 .16 

Pooler's N. Y. School Law, ----- cl. .30 .34 

Reinhart's Civics of Education, - - - - cl. .25 .30 

Wilhelm's Student's Calendar, - paper .30 .34 

SINGING AND DIALOGUE BOOKS 

Reception Day Series, 6 Nos. (Set *1.40 postpaid.) Each. .30 .34 

Song Treasures. ---____ paper .15 .13 

♦Primary Song Book, new ------ .15 .13 

SCHOOL APPARATUS 

" Standard " Manikin. (Sold by subscription.) Price on application. 

" Man Wonderful " Manikin, - 5.00 pd. 

Standard Blackboard Stencils, 500 different nos., 

from 5 to 50 cents each. Send for special catalogue. 
"Unique" Pencil Sharpener, - 1.50 .10 

Standard Physician's Manikin. (Sold by subscription.) 

Kg*™ 64- page descriptive catalogue of these books free to any address. 
Large 128-page descriptive catalogue of all best educational books and 
teacher's helps published, with prices and special rates to teachers, 6 cents. 

E. L. KELLOGG & CO., New York & Chicago. 



.03 
.03 

.01 



SEND AT J. ORDERS TO 

U E. L. KELLOGG & CO., NEW YORK & CHICAGO. 

Fitch's Lectures on Teaching- 

Lectures on Teaching. By J. G. Fitch, M.A., one of Her 
Majesty's Inspectors of Schools. England. Cloth, 16mo, 
395 pp. Price, $1.25 ; to teachers, $1.00 ; by mail, postpaid. 

Mr. Fitch takes as his topic the application of principles to 
the art of teaching in schools. Here are no vague and gen- 
eral propositions, but on every page we find the problems of 
the school-room discussed with definiteness of mental grip. 
No one who has read a single lecture by this eminent man 
but will desire to read another. The book is full of sugges- 
tions that lead to increased power. 

1. These lectures are highly prized in England. 

2. There is a valuable preface by Thos. Hunter, President 
of N. Y. City Normal College. 

3. The volume has been at once adopted by several State 
Reading Circles. 

EXTRACT FROM AMERICAN PREFACE. 
" Teachers everywhere among English-speaking people have hailed 
Mr. Fitch's work as an invaluable aid for almost every kind of instruc- 
tion and school organization. It combines the theoretical and the prac- 
tical ; it is based on psychology ; it gives admirable advice on every- 
thing connected with teaching — from the furnishing of a school-room 
to the preparation of questions for examination. Its style is singularly 
clear, vigorous and harmonious." 

Chicago Intelligence.— " All of its discussions are based on sound 
psychological principles and give admirable advice." 

Virginia Educational Journal.—" He tells what he thinks so as to 
be helpful to all who are striving to improve." 

Lynn Evening Item.—" He gives admirable advice." 

Philadelphia Eecord.— " It is not easy to imagine a more useful vol- 
ume." 

Wilmington Every Evening.—" The teacher will find in it a wealth 
of help and suggestion." 

Brooklyn Journal. — " His conception of the teacher is a worthy idea 
for all to bear in mind." 

New England Journal of Education : " This is eminently the work ol 
a man of wisdom and experience. He takes a broad and comprehensive 
view of the work of the teacher, and his suggestions on all topics are 
worthy of the most careful consideration." 

Brooklyn Eagle: "An invaluable aid for almost every kind of in- 
struction and school organization. It combines the theoretical and the 
practical ; it is baeed on psychology ; it gives admirable advice on every- 
thing connected with teaching, from the furnishing of a school-room to 
the preparation of questions for examination." 

Toledo Blade : " It is safe to say, no teacher can lay claim to being 
well informed who has not read this admirable work. Its appreciation 
is shown by i+s adoption by several Stat© Teachers' Heading Circles, as 
a work to be thoroughly read by its members." 



SEND ALL ORDERS TO 

E. L. KELL OGG & CO., NEW YORK & CHICAGO. 25 

Payne's Lectures on the Science and 

Art of Education. Reading Circle Edition. By Joseph 
Payne, the first Professor of the Science and Art of Edu- 
cation in the College of Preceptors, London, England. 
With portrait. 16mo, 350 pp., English cloth, with gold 
back stamp. Price, $1.00 ; to teachers, 80 cents ; by mail, 
7 cents extra. Elegant new edition from new plates. 

Teachers who are seeking t<3 
know the principles of education 
■will find them clearly set forth in 
this volume. It must be remem- 
bered that principles are the basis 
upon which all methodc of teach- 
ing must be founded. So valu- 
able is this book that if a teacher 
were to decide to own but three 
■works on education, this would 
be one of them. This edition 
contains all of Mr. Payne's writ- 
ings that are in any other Ameri- 
can abridged edition, and is the 
only one with his portrait. It is 
far superior to any other edition 
published. 
Joseph Payne. 

WHY THIS EDITION IS THE BEST 
(1.) The side-titles. These give the contents of tr.e page. 
(2.) The analysis of each lecture, with reference to the educa- 
tional points in it. (3.) The general analysis pointing out the 
three great principles found at the beginning. (4.) The index, 
where, under such heads as Teaching, Education, The Child, 
the important utterances of Mr. Payne are set forth. (5.) 
Its handy shape, large type, fine paper, and press- work and 
tasteful binding. All of these features make this a most val- 
uable book. To obtain all these features in one edition, it 
was found necessary to get out this new edition. 

Ohio Educational Monthly.— "It does not deal with shadowy uieoriea; 
It is intensely practical." 

Philadelphia Educational News.—" Ought to be in library of every 
progressive teacher." 

Educational Courant. — " To know how to teach, more v needed than 
a knowledge of the branches taught. This is especially valuable." 

Pennsylvania Journal of Education.— " Will be of practical value t» 
Normal Schools and Institute?" 




SEND ALL ORDERS TO 

K L. KELLOGG & CO. , NE W YORK & CHICAGO. 27 

Parkers Talks on Teaching. 

Notes of " lalks on Teaching" given by Col. Francis W. 
Parker (formerly Superintendent of schools of Quincy, 
Mass.), before the Martha's Vineyard Institute, Summer 
of 1882. Eeported by Lelia E. Patrldge. Square 16mo, 
5x6 1-2 inches, 192 pp., laid paper, English cloth. Price, 
$1.25 ; to teachers, $1.00 ; by mail, 9 cents extra. 
The methods of teaching employed in the schools of Quincy, 
Mass., were seen to be the methods of nature. As they were 
copied and explained, they awoke a great desire on the part 
of those who could not visit the schools to know the underly- 
ing principles. In other words, Colonel Parker was asked to 
explain why he had his teachers teach thus. In the summer 
of 1882, in response to requests, Colonel Parker gave a course 
of lectures before the Martha's Vineyard Institute, and these 
were reported by Miss Patridge, and published in this book. 

The book became famous ; 
more copies were sold of it in 
the same time than of any 
other educational book what- 
ever. The daily papers, which 
usually pass by such books 
with a mere mention, devoted 
columns to reviews of it. 

The following points will 
show why the teacher will 
want this book. 

1. It explains the " New 

Methods." There is a wide 

gulf between the new and the 

Hfe" old education. Even school 

%ff.-- ' boards understand this. 

Wr&,;- : 2. It gives the underlying 

principles of education. For it 

must be remembered that Col. Parker is not expounding his 

methods, but the methods of nature, 

3. It gives the ideas of man who is evidently an '* educa- 
tional genius," a man born to understand and expound educa- 
tion. We have fow such ; they are worth everything to the 
human race. 

4. It gives a biography of Col. Parker. This will help the 
teacher of education to comprehend the man and his motives. 

5. Tt has been adopted b*^ nearly every State Reading Circle 




SEND AT.T, ORDERS TO 

44 E. L. KELLOGG & CO., NEW YORK & CHICAGO. 



Tate's Philosophy of Education. 

The Philosophy of Education. By T. Tate. Kevised and 
Annotated by E. E. Sheib, Ph.D., Principal of the Louis- 
iana State Normal School. Unique cloth binding, laid 
paper, 831 pp. Price, §1.50 ; to teachers, $1.20 ; by mail, 7 
cents extra. 
There are few books that deal with the Science of Educa- 
tion. This volume is the work of a man who said there were 
great principles at the bottom of the work of the despised 
schoolmaster. It has set many a teacher to thinking, and in 
its new form will set many more. 

Our edition will be found far superior to any ether in every 
respect. The annotations of Mr. Sheib are invaluable. The 
more important part of the book are emphasized by leading 
the type. The type is clear, the size convenient, and print- 
ing, paper, and binding are most excellent. 

Mr. Philbrick so long superintendent of the Boston schools hold thia 
work in high esteem. 

Col. P. "W. Parker strongly recommends it. 

Jos. MacAlister, Supt. Public Schools, Philadelphia, says:— "It is one 
of the first books which a teacher deserves of understanding the scien- 
tific principles on which his work rests should study." 

Graded Examination Questions. 

For N. Y. State, from Sept., 1887, to Sept., 1889, with answers 
complete. First, Second, and Third Grades. Cloth, 12mo, 219 
pp. Price, $1.00; to teachers, 80 cents; by mail, 8 cents extra. 

This volume contains the Uniform Graded Examination Ques- 
tions, issued to the School Commissioners of the State by the 
Dept. of Public Instruction, commencing Sept., 1887, and ending 
Aug. 13 and 14, 1889. The answers are also given. These ques- 
tions have been adopted by all the school commissioners of the 
State; the test in each county thus becomes uniform. These 
questions are being used very largely in many other States, that 
pattern after New York, and will therefore be of far more than 
local interest. Indeed, teachers and school officers in all States 
are using these questions as a basis for their own examinations. 
Our edition is the best in arrangement, print, binding, and has 
an excellent contents and index. 

This book may be used to the best advantage by the teacher icho de- 
sires to advance in the profession, because the questions are carefully 
graded. After the lowest grade of questions have been successfidly 
answred, the next higher grade is studies. In our edition the answers 
are entirely separate from the questions i?i the back of the book. 



SEND ALL ORDERS TO 

R L. KELLOGG & CO., NEW YORK & CHICAGO. 

Quick's Educational Re fo rmers. 

By Kev. Robeet Heebekt Quick, M. A., of Trinity College, 
Cambridge, England. Bound in plain, but elegant cloth 
binding. 16mo, about 350 pp. $1.00; to teachers, 80 cts. ; by 
mail, 10 cts. extra. 

New edition with topical headings, chronological table and other aids 
for systematic study in normal schools and reading-circles. 

No book in the history of education has been so justly popular 
as this. Mr. Quick has the remarkable faculty of grasping the 
salient points of the work of the great educators, and restating 
their ideas in clear and vigorous language. 

This book supplies information that is contained in no other 
single volume, touching the progress of education in its earliest 
stages after the revival of learning. It is the work of a practical 
teacher, who supplements his sketches of famous educationists 
with some well-considered observations, that deserve the atten- 
tion of all who are interested in that subject. Beginning with 
Roger Ascham, it gives an account of the lives and schemes of 
most of the great thinkers and workers in the educational field, 
down to Herbert Spencer, with the addition ofa valuable appen- 
dix oi thoughts and suggestions on teaching. The list includes 
the names of Montaigne. Ratich, Milton, Comenius, Locke, Rous- 
seau, Basedow Pestalozzi. and Jacotot. In the lives and thoughts 
ol these eminent men is presented the whole philosophy of edu- 
cation, as developed in the progress of modern times. 

This book has been adopted by nearly every state reading-circle 
in the country, and purchased by thousands of teachers, and is 
used in many normal schools. 

Contents 1. Schools of the Jesuits; 2. Ascham, Montaigne, 
Ratich, Milton: 3. Comenius; 4. Locke* 5. Rousseau's Emile; 6. 
Basedow and the Philanthropin ; 7. Pestalozzi; 8. Jacotot ; 9. 
Herbert Spencer; 10. Thoughts and Suggestions about Teaching 
Children; 11. Some Remarks about Moral and Religious Educa- 
tion; 12. Appendix. 

OUR NEW EDITION. 

Be sure to get E. L. Kellogg's edition. There are other editions 
in the market that are not only higher in price, but very inferior in 
binding and typography and without the paragraph headings that 
are so useful. Our edition is complete with all these improve- 
ments, is beautifully printed and exquisitely bound in cloth, and 
the retail price is only $1.00, with discounts to teachers and read- 
ing-circles. 



SEND ALL ORDERS TO 

E. L. KELLOGG & CO., NEW YORK & CHICAGO. 45 

Teachers Manuals Series. 

Each, is printed in large, clear type, on good paper. Paper 

cover, price 15 cents; to teach- 
ers, 12 cents; by mail, 1 cent 
extra. 

There is a need of small vol- 
umes — " Educational tracts," that 
teachers can carry easily and study 
as they have opportunity. The 
following numbers have been al- 
ready published. 

It should be noted that while 
our editions of such of these little 
books that are not written specially 
for this series are as low in price 
as any other, the side-heads, top- 
ics, and analyses inserted by the 
editor, as well as the excellent 
paper and printing, make them 
far superior in every way to any 
other edition. 

J. G. Fitch, Inspector of the We would suggest that city super- 

Training Colleges of England, intendents or conducloi'S of institutes 

mpply each of tlieir teachers with copies of these little books. Special 

rates for quantities. 

No. i. Fitch's Art of Questioning. 

By J. G. Fitch, M.A., author of " Lectures on Teaching." 38 pp. 
Already widely known as the most useful and practical essay on this most 
important part of the teachers' lesson-hearing. 

No. 2. Fitch' s Art of Securing Attention. 

By J. G. Fitch, M. A. 39 pp. 

Of no less value than tbe author's "Art of Questioning." 

No. 3. Sidgwick's On Stimulus in School. 

By ARTHUR Sidgwick, M.A. 43 pp. 

"How can that dull, lazy scholar be pressed on to work up his lessons 
with a will?" This bright essay will tell how it can be done. 

No. 4. Yonge's Practical Work in School. 

By Charlotte M. Yonge, author of " Heir of Redclyffe," 35 pp. 
All who have read Miss Yonge's books will be glad to read of her views 
on School Work. 

No. 5. Fitch' s Improvement in the Art of Teaching, 

By J. G. Fitch, M.A. 25 pp. 

This thoughtful, earnest essay will bring courage and help to many a 
teacher who is struggling to do better work. It includes a course of study 
for Teachers' Training Classes. 




SEND ALL ORDERS TO 

46 E. L. KELLOGG & CO.. NEW TORE & CHICAGO. 

No. 6. Gladstone's Object Teaching. 

By J. H. Gladstone, of the London (Eng.) School Board. 25 pp. 
A short manual full of practical suggestions on Object Teaching. 

No. y. Huntington s Unconscious Tuition. 

Bishop Huntington has placed all teachers under profound obligations to 
him by writing this work. The earnest teacher has felt its earnest spirit, 
due to its interesting discussion of the foundation principles of education. 
It is wonderfully suggestive. 

No. 8. Hughes' How to Keep Order. 

By James L. Hcghes, author of " Mistakes in Teaching." 
Mr. Hughes is one of the few men who know what to say to help a young 
teacher. Thousands are to-day asking, "How shall we keep order?" 
Thousands are saying, " I can teach well enough, but I cannot keep order." 
To such we recommend this little book. 

No. g. Qiiick's How to Train the Memory. 

By Rev. R. H. Quick, author of " Educational Reformers." 
This book comes from school-room experience, and is not a matter of 
theory. Much attention has been lately paid to increasing the power of 
memory. The teacher must make it part of his business to store th6 
memory, hence he must know how to do it properly and according to the 
laws of the mind. 

No. io. Hoffman's Kindergarten Gifts. 

By Heinrich Hoffman, a pupil of Froebel. 

The author sets forth very clearly the best methods of using them for 
training the child's senses and power of observation. 

No. II. 'Butler' s Argument for Manual Training. 

By Nicholas Murray Butler, Pres. of N. Y. College for Training of 
Teachers. 
A clear statement of the foundation principles of Industrial Education. 

No. 12. Groff's School Hygiene. 

By Pres. G. G. Groff, of Bucknell University, Pa. 

No. 13. McMurry's How to Conduct the Recitation. 

By Chas McMurry, Prof, in State Normal School, TVlnona, Minn. 

In 34 pp. is explained the ideas of the Hubart school of educators as re- 
gards class teaching. These are now acknowledged to be the scientific 
method. Grube's plan for teaching primary arithmetic is in the same line. 

No. I4. Carter's Artificial Production of Stupidity 

in Schools. By R. Brudenell Carter, F. R. S. 

This celebrated paper has been so often referred to that we reprint it 
in neat form, with side-headings. 49 pp. 

No. 15. Kellogg s Pestalo^i : 

His Educational Work and Principles. By Amos M. Kellogg, editor 
of the School Journal. 29 pp. 

A clear idea is given in this book of what this great reformer and dis- 
coverer in education thought and did. His foundation principles are 
made specially prominent. 

No. 16. Lang's Basedow. 

32 pp. Same price as above. 

No 1 j. Lang's Commius. 

By Ossian H. Lang. 32 pp. Same price as above. 



SEND ALL ORDERS TO 

E. L. KELLOGG & CO., NEW YORK & OHLOAGO. 



17 



Welch's Teachers Psychology. 

A Treatise on the Intellectual Faculties, the Order of the 
Growth, and the Corresponding Series of Studies by which 
they are Educated. By the late A. S. Welch, Professor of 
Psychology, Iowa" Agricultural College, formerly Pres. of 
the Mich. Normal School. Cloth, 12mo, 300 pp., $1.25; to 
teachers, $1; by mail, 12 cents extra. Special terms to 
Normal Schools and Reading Circles. 

A mastery of the branches to be taught was once thought to be 
an all-sufficient preparation for teaching. But it is now seen that 
there must be a knowledge of the mind that is to be trained. 
Psychology is the foundation of intelligent pedagogy. Prof. 
Welch undertook to write a book that should deal with mind- 
unfolding, as exhibited in the 
school-room. He shows what is 
meant by attending, memorizing, 
judging, abstracting, imagining, 
classifying, etc., as it is done by 
the pupil over his text-books. First, 
there is the concept; then there is 
(1) gathering concepts, (2) storing 
concepts, (8) dividing concepts, 
(4) abstracting concepts, (5) build- 
ing concepts, (6) grouping con- 
cepts, (7) connecting concepts, 
^ (8) deriving concepts. Each of 
1^ these is clearly explained and il- 
lustrated ; the reader instead of 
being bewildered over strange 
terms comprehends that imagina- 
tion means a building up of con- 
cepts, and so of the other terms. 
A most valuable part of the book 
is its application to practical education. How to train these 
powers that deal with the concept — that is the question. There 
must be exercises to train the mind to gather, store, divide, abstract, 
build, group, connect, and derive concepts. The author shows 
what studies do this appropriately, and where there are mistakes 
made in the selection of studies. The book will prove a valuable 
one to the teacher who wishes to know the structure of the mind 
and the way to minister to its growth. It would seem that at 
last a psychology had been written that would be a real aid, in- 
stead of a hindrance, to clear knowledge. 




Welch. 



97 G 




j»*7X 




Albert S. Cook Library 



